Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A supplemental capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2027, out of the several funds specified in this act.PART 1GENERAL GOVERNMENTNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1001. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATECheney Project (40000010)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$345,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$345,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1002. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATETumwater Area Access (40000011)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$140,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$140,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1003. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATENew Capitol Campus Memorial (91000475)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The global war on terror memorial work group is established to study and make recommendations on a memorial on the capitol campus to honor service members who died in the global war on terror.(2) The global war on terror memorial work group consists of:(a) The secretary of state, or the secretary's designee;(b) Two members from the house of representatives, one appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one appointed by the house minority leader;(c) Two members from the senate, one appointed by the senate majority leader and one appointed by the senate minority leader;(d) The director of the department of veterans affairs, or the director's designee;(e) The director of the department of enterprise services, or the director's designee;(f) The director of the Washington state military department, or the director's designee;(g) A representative of the capitol campus design advisory committee who is not the secretary of state or a legislative member already appointed to the work group;(h) Three representatives from veterans' organizations, appointed by the secretary of state;(i) One surviving family member of a service member who was killed in Operation Iraqi Freedom, Operation Enduring Freedom, or Operation New Dawn, or who died by suicide after serving in these wars, appointed by the secretary of state; and(j) The state archivist, or the state archivist's designee, in a nonvoting consultancy role.(3) The global war on terror memorial work group must convene its initial meeting before July 15, 2026, and must meet at least quarterly thereafter. At its initial meeting, the members shall select two cochairs from among its membership.(4) The global war on terror memorial work group must provide the capitol committee with a report detailing:(a) Recommended name for the memorial;(b) Recommended names of individuals to be honored at the memorial;(c) Recommended locations on the capitol campus where the memorial could be constructed, including any permit requirements or other restrictions that may exist for each location;(d) Recommendations for a sculptor to design and carve or cast the memorial;(e) Potential draft designs for the memorial;(f) Recommended funding sources to carry out the purposes of this section; and(g) A proposed budget to fully cover the costs for:(i) The design, construction, transportation, and placement of the memorial;(ii) Any required permits;(iii) Anticipated ongoing maintenance costs based on potential materials used and historical maintenance of other memorials on the capitol campus;(iv) A ceremony to commemorate the unveiling of the memorial; and(v) Other expenses that may be necessary for the planning, construction, and placement of the memorial.(5) Within 30 days of receiving sufficient funds to fully cover costs described under subsection (4)(g) of this section, the department of enterprise services shall begin the contracting process with a sculptor recommended by the state capitol committee. The capitol committee must provide written notice to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, and others deemed appropriate by the capitol committee upon receiving sufficient funds to fully cover costs described under subsection (4)(g) of this section.(6) The capitol committee is encouraged to complete the planning, construction, and placement of the memorial within five years of the condition under subsection (5) of this section being met. The global war on terror memorial work group shall arrange for a ceremony to celebrate the unveiling of the memorial.(7) The global war on terror memorial work group may:(a) Perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out the purposes of this section; and(b) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public and private sources that are made in trust or otherwise for the use and benefit of the purposes of the committee in carrying out this section. All receipts from gifts, grants, and endowments received under this subsection must be deposited in the Washington state global war on terror memorial account established in RCW 43.34.105.(8) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the office of the secretary of state.(9) Members of the work group shall receive no compensation for their service as members of the work group. However, legislative members of the work group may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those who are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization, may be reimbursed for travel and other expenses in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$14,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$14,000Sec. 1004. 2025 c 414 s 6030 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEEconomic Opportunity Grants Authority (40000246)Reappropriation:Rural Washington Loan FundâState. . . .$903,000Appropriation:Rural Washington Loan Fund AccountâState. . . .$110,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($903,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,013,000Sec. 1005. 2025 c 414 s 1003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Early Learning Facilities - Eligible Organizations (40000656)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $51,000,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the early learning facility grant and loan program, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.565 through 43.31.583, and 43.84.092, to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, expanding, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations. Up to 3.5 percent of the funding in this subsection (1) may be used by the department of children, youth, and families to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for the early learning facility grant or loan program.(b) The department is encouraged to leverage private and public match funds when feasible and may not require match funds for applicants experiencing financial hardship. The department may not consider the level of project match funds as a competitive criterion when selecting or recommending projects for funding.(c) Grants may include awards for construction, renovation, or facility purchase projects that will increase early childhood education and assistance program capacity by supporting conversion of slots from part day programs to full day programs or extended day programs, or conversion of full day programs to extended day programs, as defined in RCW 43.216.010.(2) (($9,000,000))$16,300,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for minor renovation grants.(3) $6,000,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities revolving accountâstate appropriation and $3,000,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for the Washington early learning loan fund. Of the funds provided in this subsection (3), $3,000,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for emergency grants pursuant to chapter 21 (House Bill No. 1314), Laws of 2025. Up to four percent of the funding in this subsection (3) may be used by the contractor to provide technical assistance to early learning providers. The department may not use any portion of the appropriation in this subsection (3) for administrative expenses of the department.(4) The department of children, youth, and families must develop methodology to identify, at the school district boundary level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district. This methodology must inform any early learning facilities needs assessment conducted by the department and the department of children, youth, and families. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.(5) When prioritizing areas with the highest unmet need for early childhood education and assistance program slots, the committee of early learning experts convened by the department pursuant to RCW 43.31.581 must first consider those areas at risk of not meeting the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556.(6) The department must track the number of slots being renovated separately from the number of slots being constructed and, within these categories, must track the number of slots separately by program for the working connections child care program and the early childhood education and assistance program.(7) When prioritizing applications for projects pursuant to RCW 43.31.581, the department must award priority points to applications from a rural county or from extreme child care deserts as defined by the department of children, youth, and families.(8) For early learning facilities collocated with affordable or supportive housing developments, the department may remit state funding on a reimbursement basis for 100 percent of eligible project costs, regardless of the project's match amount, once the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed in an amount sufficient to complete the entire project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public as an early learning facility.(9) $18,128,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects:Batey Square Early Learning. . . .$88,000Cora Whitley Family Center. . . .$485,000Hemlock Commons at Play Frontier. . . .$1,036,000Little Wings Early Learning. . . .$3,550,000New Tomorrow's Hope Child Development Center. . . .$3,050,000Port Angeles YMCA Early Learning. . . .$2,050,000Redmond Childcare Expansion. . . .$769,000Ritzville Childcare Facility. . . .$2,050,000Willard Early Learning Center. . . .$5,050,000(10) The department may use up to four percent of amounts appropriated in subsections (1) and (2) of this section for administrative expenses. The department may use up to four percent of amounts appropriated in subsection (9) of this section or $50,000 per project, whichever is less, for administrative expenses.(11) The appropriations in this section are subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesDevelopment AccountâState. . . .(($81,128,000))Â Â Â Â Â $88,428,000Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesRevolving AccountâState. . . .$6,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($87,128,000))Â Â Â Â Â $94,428,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($348,512,000))Â Â Â Â Â $377,712,000TOTAL. . . .(($435,640,000))Â Â Â Â Â $472,140,000Sec. 1006. 2025 c 414 s 1012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 High Efficiency Electric Appliance Rebates (HEAR) Program (40000666)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) (($25,000,000))$45,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grants to eligible third-party administrators for heat pump and other high-efficiency electric equipment rebates, with a focus on low and moderate-income households, renters, nonprofit organizations, and small businesses. State incentives and rebates for installation of high-efficiency electric equipment, including electrical panel upgrades, provide a benefit to the public consistent with the state's energy strategy and climate mandates by reducing greenhouse gas emissions from the built environment. The department shall administer the grant program in a manner that seeks to maximize greenhouse gas emissions reductions.(b) (($5,000,000))$20,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grants to eligible third-party administrators for heat pumps for adult family homes.(2) The department shall implement a statewide high-efficiency electric equipment program consistent with the following:(a) Aid the transition of residential and commercial buildings away from fossil fuels by providing education and outreach resources for the installation of high-efficiency electric heat pumps and other high-efficiency electric equipment;(b) Provide grants, coordination, and technical assistance to eligible third-party administrators to promote the adoption of high-efficiency electric heat pump equipment for space and water heating; and(c) Develop strategies to ensure that the program serves low-income households, vulnerable populations, and overburdened communities, including dedicating at least 40 percent of the program funding for this purpose. For the purposes of this subsection (2)(c), "overburdened communities" has the same meaning as in RCW 70A.65.010 and "vulnerable populations" has the same meaning as in RCW 70A.02.010.(3) For the purposes of this section, "eligible third-party administrators" include, but are not limited to, nonprofits, utilities, housing providers, community action agencies, and community-based organizations.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($30,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $65,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($120,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $260,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($150,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $325,000,000Sec. 1007. 2025 c 414 s 1013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Behavioral Health Facilities (40000667)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new and preserve existing capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. The amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment or preservation of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased behavioral health capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.(2) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in the geographical availability and service needs of behavioral health services in their region;(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained for involuntary commitment, as applicable by facility type, under chapter 71.05 RCW;(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a 10-year period;(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;(h) A financial plan demonstrating the applicant's ability to maintain and operate the facility; and(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors as applicable to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.(3) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and to allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.(5) (($70,000,000))$10,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants to address regional needs and noncompetitive closure prevention grants. Closure prevention grants must be awarded on a first-come, first-served basis. For competitive regional needs grants, priority must be given to: Youth and adult bed capacity with consideration given to gaps identified in the 2024 behavioral health capital grant facility funding report; and facilities that serve specialized populations, including, but not limited to, services for individuals with traumatic brain injury, dementia, and cooccurring complex needs of youth. Additional categories of facilities may be funded based on identified needs of a region. Eligible facilities include, but are not limited to:(a) Crisis relief centers and stabilization facilities that offer access to mental health and substance use care for no more than 23 hours and 59 minutes per patient, at a time, and are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;(b) Mental health peer respite centers that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. No more than one mental health peer respite center should be funded in each of the 10 regions;(c) Grants to community providers to increase long-term intensive inpatient psychiatric treatment services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors in facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions;(d) Grants to community hospitals, freestanding evaluation and treatment providers, or freestanding psychiatric hospitals to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on 90-day or 180-day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the health care authority;(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the health care authority that it is able to meet the applicable licensing and certification requirements for the facility that will be used to provide services; and(v) The health care authority has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes;(e) Enhanced adult residential care facilities for long-term dementia placements discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;(f) Facilities that provide substance use disorder intervention, assessment, and treatment services with secure withdrawal management and stabilization treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases; and(g) Facilities where behavioral health supportive services, such as harm reduction and physical health services, are offered within the same facility as behavioral health services and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases.(6) $10,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for one crisis stabilization facility in the King county region consistent with the settlement agreement in A.B., by and through Trueblood, et al., v. DSHS, et al., No. 15-35462, that is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental disease. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the health care authority and the King county behavioral health administrative service organization and must only select a facility that has been selected by King county's crisis care centers initiative as the crisis care center for the south King county region.(7) (($49,847,000))$70,671,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Broadway - Compass Health. . . .$5,050,000Cascade Community Health. . . .$541,000Castle Building Purchase. . . .$3,325,000Compass Health Friday Harbor Facility Purchase. . . .$1,850,000Comprehensive Health Facility Acquisition. . . .$6,700,000Healing Lodge of the Seven Nations. . . .$5,050,000ICHS Ron Chew Center. . . .$3,050,000Ituha Stabilization Facility. . . .$927,000Mental Health Wellbeing Clinic. . . .$1,545,000Poulsbo SUD Clinic. . . .$18,480,000Pregnant, Parenting & Women's InpatientSubstance Use. . . .$1,545,000Skagit County Crisis Stabilization. . . .$549,000Sound Crisis Stabilization Facility. . . .$3,050,000Spokane Stabilization Center. . . .$3,050,000Trouves Health Care Behavioral Health Facility. . . .$5,050,000Tubman Health Center. . . .$4,000,000Yakama Detox Center. . . .$5,050,000Yakima Behavioral Health Hub. . . .$1,550,000Yakima County Med Detox Planning and Design. . . .$309,000(9) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, where the department has awarded a grant for the operation of a crisis diversion or stabilization facility located in Pierce county that is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases, the department may amend the contract associated with the grant in order to authorize the facility to be used for any community development block grant national objective.(10) The department shall notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.(11) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.(12) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that the grantee or successor hold the capital improvements for at least a 10-year period. The provisions must require the facility to be used for behavioral health services, but may allow the facility to change ownership or facility type during the commitment period. The department shall monitor the activities of recipients of grants under this program to determine compliance with the terms and conditions set forth in its contract.(13) The department must provide a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2026. The report must include:(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date;(c) A statewide map of new capacity since 2018, including projected bed capacity and opening dates;(d) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date the facility began providing services; and(e) Recommendations for statutory language that would codify the grant program on an ongoing basis including:(i) Evaluation and prioritization criteria;(ii) Monitoring and compliance requirements;(iii) Preconstruction and technical assistance services; and(iv) Data needed to determine the service needs by area of the state.(14) The department must coordinate with the health care authority and department of health to submit capital budget requests to fund behavioral health community capacity grants for the 2027-2029 biennial budget by the due date established by the office of financial management. Associated state budget operating costs must also be identified and requested.(15) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($129,847,000))Â Â Â Â Â $90,671,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($519,388,000))Â Â Â Â Â $362,684,000TOTAL. . . .(($649,235,000))Â Â Â Â Â $453,355,000Sec. 1008. 2025 c 414 s 1017 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Weatherization Plus Health Grants (40000671)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely as grants for the low-income weatherization program authorized under chapter 70A.35 RCW, community scaled weatherization projects, and for the community energy efficiency program (CEEP).(1) The department is encouraged to grant funds to at least two community scaled weatherization projects: One located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, if feasible. For the purposes of this section, "community scaled weatherization project" means a weatherization project that includes multiple dwelling units that are located in the same neighborhood or area where overlapping factors such as environmental, social, or economic conditions may adversely impact residents, as determined by the department.(2) $5,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for the Washington State University energy extension community energy efficiency program (CEEP) to support homeowners, tenants, and small business owners in making sound energy efficiency investments by providing consumer education and marketing, workforce support through training and lead generation, and direct consumer incentives for upgrades to existing homes and small commercial buildings. This is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.(((2)))(3) The department must, to the extent practicable, implement the recommendations in the weatherization plus health 2022 report.(((3)))(4) If funding from these appropriations is used to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency shall, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.(((4)))(5) The department must:(a) Recruit community energy efficiency program sponsors that are community-based organizations located in geographic areas of the state that have not received funding for low-income weatherization programs, targeting hard-to-reach market segments;(b) Leverage funding from community energy efficiency program sponsors in an amount greater than or equal to the amount provided by the state through the weatherization program;(c) Ensure that community energy efficiency program utility sponsors work with nonprofit community-based organizations to deliver community energy efficiency program services; and(d) Identify community energy efficiency program sponsors that support the conversion of space and water heating from fossil fuels to electricity, as part of a set of energy efficiency investments.(((5)))(6) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($25,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $55,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($35,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $65,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($140,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $260,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($175,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $325,000,000Sec. 1009. 2025 c 414 s 1019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Community EV Charging (40000673)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for the development of community electric vehicle charging infrastructure.(2) Funding provided in this section must be used for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.(3) Projects that receive funding under this section must be implemented by, or include partners from, one or more of the following: Local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state.(4) Grant funding must be used for level two or higher charging infrastructure and related costs including, but not limited to, construction and site improvements. Projects may include a robust public and private outreach plan that includes engaging with affected parties in conjunction with the new electric vehicle infrastructure.(5) The department must prioritize funding for projects in the following order:(a) Multifamily housing;(b) Publicly available charging at any location;(c) Schools and school districts;(d) State and local government buildings and public hospitals; and(e) All other eligible projects.(6) The department must coordinate with other electrification programs, including projects developed by the department of transportation, to determine the most effective distribution of the systems. The department must also collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in RCW 43.392.030 to implement this section and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022.(7) The department may:(a) Provide information to applicants about available clean energy tax credits and incentives, including elective pay, that may be applicable to the project for which state funding is being sought;(b) Inquire, as part of the application, which tax credits and incentives the applicant plans to seek for the project;(c) Prioritize projects seeking any applicable clean energy tax credits and incentives when developing and applying competitive criteria for selecting recipients under this section; and(d) Consider the availability of any federal tax credits or other federal or nonfederal grants or incentives that the applicant may benefit from in review of the application.(8) Funding awards made under this section may not exceed 100 percent of the cost of the project.(9) Up to three percent of the appropriation in this section is for the department to administer the grant program.(10) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Cowlitz MHD ZEV Depot in Longview.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($23,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $36,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($80,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $132,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($103,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $168,000,000Sec. 1010. 2025 c 414 s 1020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Connecting Housing to Infrastructure Program (40000675)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants or deferred loans to local governments and public utility districts to defray the cost of waiving a portion of or all of the fees normally applied to developers for utility connection charges and related street improvements related to new affordable housing projects for low- and moderate-income households.(b) Where applicable, the utility extension and related street improvements must be consistent with the approved comprehensive plans under the growth management act and must be within the established boundaries of the urban growth area as set forth in the approved comprehensive plans. Street improvements are eligible if the improvements are related directly to the utility extension or connection and are adjacent to the new housing units being constructed.(c) Projects must be located within a jurisdiction that imposes a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.530(1)(a)(ii) or (b)(i)(B), 82.14.540, or 84.52.105.(2)(a) $30,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants or deferred loans for system development charges, utility improvements, and street improvements associated with utility infrastructure for affordable housing projects serving low-income households located within a city or county with a population of 150,000 or fewer persons.(b) $5,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided for the department for pilot grants for system development charges, utility improvements, and street improvements associated with utility infrastructure for affordable housing projects serving moderate-income households. The pilot program must be offered in three counties located in the north central region of the state. The counties must share borders with one another, be located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains, and each have a population of 85,000 persons or fewer. By June 1, 2027, the department must submit a report to the office of financial management and to the appropriate committees of the legislature that:(i) Summarizes the results of the pilot program, including an analysis of the need for infrastructure assistance for local governments to support the development of housing affordable to moderate-income households, and the benefits to communities that may result from increasing economic diversity in housing that is made more affordable through infrastructure subsidies;(ii) Describes the number and total dollar amount of application requests and funding awards; and(iii) Makes recommendations regarding continuation or expansion of the pilot program and recommended future funding levels.(3) To be eligible for funding under this section, an applicant must demonstrate, at minimum:(a) That affordable housing development will begin construction within 24 months of the grant or loan award; and(b) A strong probability of serving the original target group or income level for a period of at least 25 years.(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply.(a) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that requires payment of monthly housing costs, including utilities other than telephone, of no more than 30 percent of the household's income.(b) "Low-income household" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.(c) "Moderate-income household" means: For purposes of the pilot program authorized in this section, a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is above 80 percent of the median household income adjusted for family size, for the county where the affordable housing project is located, but less than the state median income, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(d) "System development charges" means charges for new utility improvements.(e) "Utility improvements" means drinking water, wastewater, or stormwater utility improvements.(5) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Fort Lawton redevelopment project. The funding provided in this subsection is not subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section. The legislature intends to provide funds in the amount of $10,000,000 in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium to the Fort Lawton redevelopment project.(6) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$100,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$400,000,000TOTAL. . . .$500,000,000Sec. 1011. 2025 c 414 s 1021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Housing Trust Fund (40000677)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($133,000,000))$206,700,000 of the state building construction accountâstate and (($402,000,000))$483,300,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriations are provided solely for the new construction, acquisition, or acquisition and rehabilitation of affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations including, but not limited to, people with chronic mental illness or behavioral health conditions, farmworkers, people who are homeless, and people in need of permanent supportive housing. The department shall strive to invest at least 20 percent of the appropriation provided under this section with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1):(a) (($53,000,000))$55,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate and (($162,000,000))$210,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriations are provided solely for multifamily rental housing projects. For each affordable housing development project, the department may finance up to a total of $10,000,000 in construction awards, including prior biennia awards.(b) $50,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income people with developmental or intellectual disabilities. The department must use a separate application form and evaluation criteria for applications under this subsection. The department must coordinate with the department of social and health services regarding any needed supportive services and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the housing needs study for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as provided in section 1068(6), chapter 332, Laws of 2021. The department must consider prioritizing funding under this subsection for housing that serves individuals who are exiting residential habilitation centers or facilities.(c) $100,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for permanent supportive housing projects in accordance with the apple health and homes rapid permanent supportive housing program created in RCW 43.330.187. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c), $4,250,000 is provided solely for the Maple Court Permanent Supportive Housing project.(d) (($30,000,000))$61,700,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and (($45,000,000))$78,300,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for the development of homeownership projects affordable to first-time low-income households. Projects serving homebuyers whose income is up to 80 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply, except that projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department, serving homebuyers whose income is up to 100 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, down payment assistance, closing costs, acquisition, rehabilitation costs, and new construction. The department shall strive to invest at least 20 percent of these funds with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity, and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the homeownership disparities work group created in section 128(100), chapter 297, Laws of 2022.Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(d), $2,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Orchard Gardens project.(e)(i)(A) $17,500,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants for the acquisition and preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities where at least 50 percent of the preserved homes are and will remain occupied by low-income households. Funding provided under this subsection (1)(e)(i) may be used for the purpose of avoiding household displacement due to sale or other transactions and ensuring preservation of housing affordability for low-income households for a minimum of 40 years and may be awarded only to eligible organizations as defined in RCW 59.20.030.(B) $2,500,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Bayside Housing project. The department may not require more than 50 percent of the units in the Bayside Housing project to be occupied by low-income households.(ii) $10,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants to organizations that are mobile home park cooperatives or manufactured housing cooperatives, as those terms are defined in RCW 59.20.030, for critical improvements, repairs, and infrastructure upgrades to promote the preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities as affordable housing. The grantee must award subgrants based on needs relating to health, safety, and cost for resident-owned manufactured housing community cooperatives in Washington.(f) $10,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for eligible organizations under RCW 43.185A.040 to acquire, acquire and renovate, or prepare real property for rapid conversion into permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, indoor emergency housing, tiny homes, or indoor emergency shelters, with a primary focus on serving people with extremely low-incomes who are experiencing sheltered and unsheltered homelessness, including families with children, unaccompanied youth and young people, older adults, and people with disabilities. Acquisitions completed with temporary financing are eligible for funding provided in this section. The department may approve funding only for projects that result in increased shelter or housing capacity for extremely low-income people and households. In awarding funding pursuant to this subsection (1)(f), the department shall prioritize the acquisition of multifamily housing units and housing projects that rapidly move people experiencing sheltered or unsheltered homelessness into housing, including, but not limited to, individuals living in unsanctioned encampments, the public rights-of-way, or other public spaces. Amounts provided in this subsection (1)(f) may not be used for operating or maintenance costs, supportive services, or debt service.(g) (($50,000,000))$90,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for affordable housing preservation projects, which may include, but are not limited to:(i) Projects preserving and extending the affordability commitment period for projects in the housing trust fund portfolio. The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain its long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment be provided before contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. When allocating funds, the department must prioritize buildings that are older than 15 years and that serve very low-income and extremely low-income populations.(ii) Projects preserving affordable multifamily housing at risk of losing its affordability due to expiration of use restrictions that otherwise require affordability including, but not limited to, United States department of agriculture funded multifamily housing. The department must prioritize projects that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of Washington's affordable multifamily housing stock, particularly in rural areas of the state. Funds may be used for acquisition or for acquisition and rehabilitation of properties to preserve the affordable housing units beyond their existing use restrictions and place them in Washington's housing trust fund portfolio for a minimum of 40 years. If a capital needs assessment is required, the department must work with the applicant to ensure that this does not create an unnecessary impediment to rapidly accessing these funds.(iii) Projects rehabilitating or replacing housing or facilities impacted by the weather event described in the governor's emergency proclamation 25-07 that are: (A) Facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary farmworkers; (B) affordable multifamily housing properties; or (C) affordable manufactured or mobile home communities. Funding provided under this subsection (1)(g)(iii) is not subject to the requirements of RCW 43.185A.150.(iv) The funding provided under this subsection (g) is not subject to the 60-day application period in RCW 43.185A.150.(h) $5,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary farmworkers. The department shall prioritize funding of projects to areas of highest need. Funding may also be provided, to the extent qualified projects are submitted, for projects that address health and safety.(i) The department shall strive to invest at least 10 percent of the appropriations provided under (a) and (d) of this subsection (1) for either affordable multifamily rental housing or homeownership projects, or both, benefiting low-income households in federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of Washington. The department must conduct a separate application process and use separate evaluation criteria to solicit tribal housing projects and prioritize projects to tribal communities of highest need.(2) $3,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide preconstruction and technical assistance awards in accordance with RCW 43.185A.170. By January 1, 2027, the department must provide the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature with a progress report for entities receiving awards made under this subsection (2). The progress report must list which entities applied for, and were successful in securing, additional financing for the construction or preservation of affordable housing.(3) $8,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate and $2,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriations in this subsection (3) are provided solely for affordable housing urgent repair and risk mitigation grants to be provided on an ongoing basis. Funding is not subject to the 60-day notification requirement in RCW 43.185A.150. Each grant award may not exceed $200,000 per award. However, the department may not limit the number of awards or amount received per organization. When awarding grant funds pursuant to this subsection, the department must offer conditional awards within the per-project limit of $200,000 based on the amount needed as identified by the applicant. The department must subsequently revise grant awards based on actual qualified project costs for which grantees request reimbursement. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3):(($5,000,000))(a) $8,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this ((section))subsection is provided solely for affordable housing urgent repair grants ((to be provided on an ongoing basis. Funding is not subject to the 60-day notification requirement in RCW 43.185A.150)). The funding may be provided to address nonrecurring repair projects including repair of units or buildings, abatement of potentially hazardous materials, and safety-related structural improvements of affordable housing. ((Each repair grant award may not exceed $200,000 per award. However, the department may not limit the number of awards or amount received per organization.(a)))(b) $2,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this subsection is provided for risk mitigation investments to prevent water and fire-based property damage of affordable housing.(c) For purposes of this subsection (3), "affordable housing" means:(i) Permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030; and(ii) Multifamily affordable housing projects in the housing trust fund portfolio.(((b)))(d) If the department receives application requests that exceed the appropriation levels in this subsection (3), the department must prioritize projects under (((a)))(c)(i) of this subsection (3).(4) (($57,738,000))$62,324,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided for the following list of projects:315 W 9th Seniors. . . .$1,500,00035th and Pacific Family Housing. . . .$2,050,000Alliance Place Project. . . .$2,050,000American Legion Veteran Housing and Resource Center. . . .(($950,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,236,000Bridge Meadows. . . .$5,050,000Bryant Manor Redevelopment. . . .$3,000,000City of Port Angeles Multifamily Housing Pipeline. . . .$2,050,000((Hillsdale Town. . . .$1,750,000))Homestead Community Land Trust. . . .$8,050,000Hummingbird Village Site Acquisition and CapitalDevelopment. . . .$3,050,000Kulshan View. . . .$443,000Lincoln Street Studios. . . .$4,050,000Montgomery Housing South Yakima Senior Housing. . . .$2,050,000SPS Habitat Boulevard Affordable Homeownership Net Zero. . . .$5,050,000St. Vincent de Paul Star of Hope. . . .$1,545,000Thrive Center Tacoma. . . .$2,050,000Thorton Village Ferndale. . . .$4,000,000University of Washington Sunbreak TowerAffordable Housing. . . .$8,050,000WELD Seattle Recovery Housing. . . .$2,050,000YWCA North Central Washington. . . .$5,000,000(5) $4,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Mary's Place Emergency Family Shelter.(6) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in subsections (1) through (3) of this section within the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to other affordable housing projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed. By November 1, 2026, and June 30, 2027, the department must notify the office of financial management, the House capital budget committee, and the Senate ways and means committee of any reallocations of funds made pursuant to this subsection.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($145,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $222,200,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($459,738,000))Â Â Â Â Â $547,624,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($605,238,000))Â Â Â Â Â $769,824,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($2,420,952,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,079,216,000TOTAL. . . .(($3,026,190,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,849,040,000Sec. 1012. 2025 c 414 s 1022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Clean Energy Fund Program (40000679)The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $26,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate and $10,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriations in this section ((is))are provided solely for competitive grants to eligible entities for predevelopment, design, and construction of projects that provide a public benefit through research, development, demonstration, or deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations and overburdened communities, including tribes.(2) Entities eligible for grant funding under this section include local governments, federally recognized tribal governments and tribes' contracted service providers, public and private utilities that serve retail customers in the state, for-profit entities, research institutions, nonprofit organizations, and state agencies.(3) To be eligible, a project must be consistent with the state energy strategy adopted under chapter 43.21F RCW and policies under chapter 19.405 RCW. To the extent practicable, the department must prioritize projects that build upon Washington's strengths in aerospace, maritime, information and communications technology, grid modernization, advanced materials, and decarbonizing the built environment.(4) The department must invite stakeholders to participate in the design and implementation of grant programs funded under this section. The department must consider equity and environmental justice when developing the program structure and opportunities for applicant participation.(5) When soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects;(b) Ensure that a public benefit results from the use of public funds through due diligence and monitoring of contracted projects, including ensuring compliance with all applicable laws related to the project selection process, project monitoring, and contracting; and(c) Prioritize projects for funding that leverage the greatest amount of matching funds, such as local levy funding.(6)(a) The department must require project applicants to:(i) Disclose all sources of public funding invested in a project; and(ii) Identify by name any former or current state of Washington employees employed by the applicant or its governing body in the 24 months preceding the application submittal. The identification must include the person's separation date and job title or position held. If the department determines that a conflict of interest or other violation of chapter 42.52 RCW exists, the application must be disqualified from further consideration.(b) If, after a grant has been awarded, the department finds that a grantee has violated chapter 42.52 RCW, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the grant funding by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.(7) The department must specify the requirements in subsections (5) and (6) of this section in funding contracts entered into by the department under this section.(8) $5,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and $20,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for grants to tribes for clean energy development projects. Eligible uses of grant funding include planning, predesign, design, construction, project predevelopment, and deployment of clean energy projects that contribute to achieving the state's greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and related policies. The department must collaborate with tribes in the design and development of this grant program.(9) $4,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Pacific Northwest national laboratory test bed. The appropriation in this subsection is contingent upon the receipt of federal funding in sufficient amounts to complete the project.(10) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$31,000,000Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($4,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $34,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($35,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $65,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($140,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $260,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($175,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $325,000,000Sec. 1013. 2025 c 414 s 1026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Low-Income Home Rehabilitation Grant Program (40000684)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act. $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section must be prioritized for projects impacted by the weather event described in the governor's emergency proclamation 25-07.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($20,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $40,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($25,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1014. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHousing Accelerator Framework (40001944)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:â¯(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to develop a housing accelerator framework with the goals of:(a) Eliminating barriers to building housing for homeownership and rental purposes;(b) Determining and analyzing primary cost drivers for the development of single-family homes, multifamily housing, and middle housing, and the impacts of those drivers on homeownership and rental housing in order to reduce the cost of housing production for developers and consumers;(c) Accelerating housing development milestone timelines; and(d) Increasing the production of housing units statewide based on goals that are attainable and sustainable.â¯(2) The department shall consult and collaborate with the department of revenue, the department of labor and industries, the department of ecology, the housing finance commission, the office of equity, the Washington state building code council, the affordable housing advisory board, and other state entities as needed. The department must also consult with local governments and appropriate interest groups in implementing this section.â¯ â¯Interest groups with which the department must consult include groups that represent nonprofit and for-profit housing developers, builders and building trades, real estate agents, landlords, tenants, home mortgage lenders, utility providers, public housing authorities, a statewide association representing business, and an organization representing architects.(3) In undertaking the development of the framework, the department must utilize existing studies and reports, including from Executive Order 25-02, and information provided by state entities and interest groups in subsection (2) in this section. The department may use this appropriation to enter a contract with a third-party expert.â¯(4) The housing accelerator framework may include, but is not limited to, consideration and evaluation of:â¯(a) Opportunities to simplify grant application processes among funders.â¯(b) State housing program process, policy and regulation reforms, including, but not limited to:â¯(i) Maximum awards;â¯(ii) Zoning;â¯(iii) Permitting and construction regulations;â¯(iv) Performance building and energy code pathways;â¯(v) Stormwater regulations and flexibility;â¯(vi) Public works contracting and labor and wage requirements;â¯(vii) Project affordability and tax incentives;â¯(viii) Regulatory exemptions;â¯ and(ix) Existing and new revenue potentials to fund new housing developments.â¯(c) Measures of success and timeline in order to meet the goals and objectives of this section.â¯â¯(5) By October 1, 2026, the department must submit a preliminary report with a draft framework for implementing a housing accelerator program to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.â¯ By June 30, 2027, the department must submit a report with the final framework and implementation recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$400,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1015. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEWashington State Green Bank (40001946)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $11,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the department of commerce for a grant to the Washington state green bank to provide agreements for residential credit enhancements and commercial and agricultural clean energy financing for projects that address one or more purposes in subsection (2) of this section. In contracts for grants to the Washington state green bank authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require the Washington state green bank to remain an independent, nonprofit corporation recognized as exempt from federal income taxation for the public benefit during the term of the grant.(a) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this subsection (1) is provided solely for the Washington state green bank for agreements to support a residential credit enhancement model that includes partnerships with lenders and contractors to provide energy efficiency upgrades, solar installations, battery storage, electrical vehicle chargers, and emergency HVAC replacements. Where possible and feasible, energy efficiency upgrades should provide electric equipment and infrastructure. Residential credit enhancements awarded pursuant to this subsection must take into consideration the need to provide access to financing for low-income to moderate-income families and households unable to access traditional financing.(b) $8,500,000 of the appropriation in this subsection (1) is provided solely for the Washington state green bank for agreements to implement the requirements of subsections (3)(a)(iii) and (iv) of this section for commercial energy efficiency, including, but not limited to, meeting clean buildings performance standard compliance and helping small businesses and tribes in procuring clean energy and pursuing fleet electrification projects.(2) Projects funded by this section must meet one or more of the following objectives:(a) Reducing greenhouse gas emissions;(b) Reducing energy consumption;(c) Improving air quality;(d) Reducing the amount that a recipient of financing funded by this section spends on utility expenses;(e) Promoting investments in qualified clean energy projects;(f) Increasing significantly the pace and level of investments in qualified clean energy projects at the state and local levels;(g) Improving the standard of living of the residents of Washington state by promoting the more efficient and lower cost development of qualified clean energy projects and providing financing for qualified clean energy projects that will create high-paying, long-term jobs;(h) Fostering the development and consistent application of transparent underwriting standards, standard contractual terms, and measurement and verification protocols for qualified clean energy projects;(i) Promoting the creation of performance data that enables effective underwriting, risk management, and pro forma modeling of financial performance of qualified clean energy projects to support primary financing markets and to stimulate the development of secondary investment markets for qualified clean energy projects; and(j) Achieving a level of financing support for qualified clean energy projects necessary to help abate climate change through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burdens, and complement and supplement other clean energy and energy efficiency programs and initiatives in this state;(3) In grants to the Washington state green bank authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require the Washington state green bank to establish guidelines, screening processes, and evaluation and selection criteria to be used by lenders operating under the credit enhancement model. For all other applicants and project types, the Washington state green bank shall directly offer financial products and structures, including soliciting and evaluating project proposals and monitoring projects under this section. For grants authorized under this section, the department of commerce must require the Washington state green bank to:(a) Ensure that selective processes and criteria, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all lender partners, contractors, and projects, except as otherwise noted in this section;(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring, and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes;(c) Develop rules, policies, and procedures that specify the eligibility of borrowers and any other terms or conditions of the financial support to be provided by the Washington state green bank before financing support is provided for any qualified clean energy project;(d) Develop and offer a range of financing structures, forms, and techniques for qualified clean energy projects, including, but not limited to, loans, credit enhancements, guarantees, warehousing, securitization, and other financial products and structures;(e) Leverage private investment in qualified clean energy projects through financing mechanisms that support, enhance, and complement private investment;(f) Ensure that financing entities providing funds under this section provide funding in a reasonable and transparent manner that is in the financial interest of the borrowers and is consistent with state consumer protection standards; and(g) Assess reasonable fees for the financing support and risk management activities provided by the Washington state green bank.(4)(a) Consistent with chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, a project applicant must identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past 24 months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title, or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department of commerce or the Washington state green bank that there is a conflict of interest or situation that is likely to constitute a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.(b) If the department of commerce or the Washington state green bank finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a conflict of interest or a situation that is likely to constitute a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute, involving a recipient of funding under this section, the department of commerce or the Washington state green bank may terminate the funding agreement in its sole discretion by written notice with a reservation of rights to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.(5) Requirements in subsection (4) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department of commerce and the Washington state green bank.(6) $1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Washington state green bank for program administration costs. In the grant authorized under this subsection, the department of commerce must include provisions that require the Washington state green bank to:(a) Collect and make available to the public in a centralized database on an internet website maintained by the Washington state green bank information regarding rates, terms, and conditions of all financing support transactions, unless the disclosure of such information includes a trade secret, confidential commercial information, or confidential financial information;(b) Work with market and program participants to provide information regarding best practices for overseeing qualified clean energy projects and information regarding other appropriate consumer protections;(c) Prepare an annual report for the public on the financing activities of the Washington state green bank, including other sources of funding for the projects, for submittal to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on November 1st of each year, beginning fiscal year 2027. The annual report must address, at a minimum:(i) The location, subject, and financial terms of all projects financed provided by the green bank;(ii) The names and addresses of all contractors and financial institutions with whom the green bank contracted, and the financing projects in which each contractor and financial institution participated;(iii) The balance sheet for the green bank showing all revenues and costs to the green bank for the year, including the compensation provided to each employee of the green bank; and(iv) Measurable outcomes associated with each project financed by the green bank, including, but not limited to, reduced greenhouse gas emissions, reduced energy consumption, improved air quality, and reduced utility expenses; and(d) Undertake such other activities as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.(7) The department may provide initial funding to the green bank in an amount no greater than $750,000 for residential credit enhancements, $4,250,000 for commercial and agricultural financing, and $500,000 for program administration costs. Once the department confirms that the green bank has fully obligated both the initial funding for residential credit enhancements, at a leverage ratio of no less than 15:1, and the initial funding for commercial and agricultural financing, at a leverage ratio of no less than 3:1, the department may provide the remaining funding amounts to the green bank.(8) The department must ensure that the green bank implements and markets its residential, agricultural, and commercial financing activities across a broad geographic range so that the services of the green bank are reasonably available throughout the state.(9) Prior to awarding any funds to the green bank, the department must require the green bank to include on its board of directors (a) one or more voting members with demonstrated expertise in banking or finance, and (b) one non-voting member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, and one non-voting member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Members of the legislature serving on the board of directors of the green bank may not receive compensation for their service on the board of directors of the green bank.(10) The legislature intends to consider the default rates associated with the financing provided pursuant to this section when considering future funding requests for the green bank.(11) The department may use up to three percent of amounts appropriated in this section for administrative expenses.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$12,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1016. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2027 Local and Community Projects (40001947)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(2) Before receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.(8) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:African Cultural Arts Center. . . .$258,000Airway Heights Public Safety Campus Generator. . . .$83,000Alameda Lighting Safety Project. . . .$500,000American Hop Museum Roof & HVAC. . . .$84,000Anacortes Birth Center. . . .$68,000Balfour Park Accessibility Amenities. . . .$258,000Blaine Downtown Parklet Improvements Project. . . .$392,000Blue Heron MS/OCEAN Permanent SBHC Construction. . . .$227,000Bridge 33 Rehabilitation. . . .$140,000Central Ferry Fire Assistance-Whitman County. . . .$68,000City of Newcastle Park at 95th - Phase 2A Design. . . .$206,000Community Gymnasium Rehabilitation. . . .$250,000Covington Aquatic Center. . . .$309,000Dayton Community Swimming Pool. . . .$275,000Eatonville High School - South Retaining WallImprovement. . . .$166,000Elevator Three Modernization. . . .$302,000Engedi Refuge Counseling Center Expansion. . . .$103,000EWCC Shelter Project. . . .$309,000Fire Department Response Efficiency Project. . . .$155,000Fire Station 52 Parking Lot Safety Upgrade. . . .$155,000Forest Grange Renovations and Revitalization Project. . . .$45,000Greater Federal Way Emergency Operations Center Reno. . . .$86,000Historic Preservation for Public Arts Facility. . . .$1,000,000Inclusive Play Equipment - Remy Park. . . .$400,000Junior Achievement of Washington - FacilityEnhancement. . . .$258,000Kennewick Activity Center Asbestos Abatement. . . .$93,000Legion Park Plaza Veterans Memorial. . . .$93,000Liberty Bay Waterfront Boardwalk. . . .$258,000Lyle Playground Refresh. . . .$26,000Mabton Police Department. . . .$188,000Medical Suite Remodel and Infrastructure Improvements. . . .$21,000Mountlake Terrace Library Resiliency Upgrades Project. . . .$309,000New Chutes & Pens at Othello Rodeo Grounds. . . .$130,000Nickelsville Kitchen & Laundry Upgrade. . . .$114,000Norman Mitchell Manor Renovation Project. . . .$258,000North City Station. . . .$155,000Northwestern Park Access. . . .$475,000Old Swim Hole Revitalization Project. . . .$393,000Para Los Ninos Community Facility Purchase andRepairs. . . .$309,000Pasco Reimann Expansion Engineering Master Plan. . . .$258,000Port of Ridgefield Waterfront Park. . . .$100,000Potts of Gold Roof Safety Upgrade. . . .$67,000Providence Academy Accessibility Improvements. . . .$258,000Puget Sound Veterans Health Initiative. . . .$342,000Refurbish 1950's Lower Naches Grange #296. . . .$40,000Relocate 1896 Kauffman Log Cabin. . . .$85,000Restoration & Preservation of Historic StainedGlass Windows. . . .$232,000Restore Upstairs Storage Area of Museum. . . .$38,000Restoring Public Access to PacSci's Courtyard. . . .$309,000Rise Above Foundation Safety & InfrastructureUpgrades. . . .$254,000Riverside Park Picnic Shelter. . . .$40,000Ruston Community Center ADA-Accessibility Renovation. . . .$590,000Sadako Public Art Renewal. . . .$155,000SeaTac International Dining District: Food TruckVillage. . . .$52,000Snoqualmie Canoe Cultural Center. . . .$258,000Southwest Washington Fairgrounds 4-H Barn RoofReplace. . . .$100,000Spokane Valley Ice Sports Facility. . . .$400,000Stephenson Canyon Park Off-Leash Area. . . .$294,000The Futuristic West African Village. . . .$50,000The Opportunity Circle. . . .$62,000Toppenish Playground Equipment. . . .$155,000Toyota Center HVAC and Security Upgrades. . . .$309,000Twisp Valley Grange Kitchen Renovation. . . .$120,000Van Lierop Park Parking Lot. . . .$361,000Vashon Community Pool Renovation. . . .$412,000Wahkiakum PUD - Puget Island Water Source SiteConstruction. . . .$258,000Wapato Public Safety Building Renovation. . . .$103,000Welcoming and Healing Center. . . .$258,000Yakima Valley Indoor Youth Sports Complex Project. . . .$206,000(9) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018, chapter 414, Laws of 2025.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$15,085,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,085,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1017. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Multifamily Bldg Efficiency Grants (40001949)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($5,000,000))$10,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants or loans to affordable multifamily projects within the housing trust fund portfolio to decarbonize and transition off the direct use of fossil fuels.(2) Awards may include, but are not limited to: Conducting benchmarking, technical assistance, energy management, operations and maintenance planning, deep retrofits, energy efficiency upgrades and greenhouse gas emissions reductions, renewable energy generation, installation of high-efficiency electric appliances and equipment, including high-efficiency heat pumps, and other decarbonization investments.(3) The department must award funding at a sufficient level to complete the financing package necessary for an applicant to accomplish the requested scope of work. The department must prioritize providing meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($5,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $40,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($5,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1018. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEWater Quality Projects (40001951)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:City of Moses Lake Well 29 Treatment. . . .$810,000City of Roy Well Improvements. . . .$1,500,000Spokane County West Plains PFAS. . . .$7,500,000(2)(a) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Quincy Industrial Wastewater Treatment Facility. . . .$3,000,000Summit Pacific Medical Center Culverts. . . .$800,000(b) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this subsection is subject to the provisions of section 8018, chapter 414, Laws of 2025.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,800,000Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$9,810,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$13,610,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$13,610,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1019. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2026 Mobile and Manufactured Homes Assistance (91002979)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to provide technical assistance and grants for acquisition, preservation, investments in deferred maintenance, and infrastructure improvements for affordable mobile and manufactured home communities. Grants and technical assistance must be provided to eligible organizations as defined in RCW 43.185A.040 and 59.20.030.(a) $10,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided for grants for the acquisition and preservation of manufactured housing and mobile home communities. Funding awarded as grants under this section must preserve housing affordability as defined in this section for a minimum of 40 years.(b) $10,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided for grants to eligible organizations for deferred maintenance, repairs, and infrastructure improvements for affordable mobile and manufactured home communities.(2) For the purposes of this section, "affordable" and "affordability" mean at least 50 percent of the units in a project are occupied by households with incomes that do not exceed 100 percent of the area median income.Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$20,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000TOTAL. . . .$100,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1020. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEDistrict Energy Campus Upgrades Committee (91002988)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to (a) convene a campus energy upgrades committee to prioritize proposed capital decarbonization projects for state campus district energy systems as those systems are defined in RCW 19.27A.260; (b) submit a list of projects to the governor and the legislature that are recommended by the committee for funding in the 2027-2029 biennial capital budget; and (c) develop an analysis of barriers to state agencies entering into energy as a service contracts or participating in public-private partnerships, recommendations for legislation, and financial scenarios as described in subsection (10) of this section. The list of projects submitted by the department must be limited to capital investments necessary for addressing critical components of systems that are at risk of imminent failure, have surpassed their expected useful life, or will reach the end of their expected useful life within the next two biennia.(2) The department must provide guidance to state agencies submitting projects to the committee for consideration that aligns the committee review process with the process for agencies submitting budget requests to the governor for consideration in the governor's budget. The department may contract with a qualified nonprofit entity to facilitate the work of the committee and to produce the analyses and report required in subsection (10) of this section.(3) The director of commerce shall appoint members of the committee. By a majority vote of appointed members, the committee shall select a committee chair. Committee members shall serve without compensation but may request reimbursement for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(4) Voting committee members must include:(a) One representative of the state energy office established in chapter 43.21F RCW;(b) Three persons with technical or professional expertise in building decarbonization, thermal energy network or district heating and cooling system construction or conversion that is intended to reduce fossil fuel consumption, or related subject matter. At least one of these members must have experience in environmental justice issues and at least one of these members must be from the private sector;(c) One person with experience in developing and advocating for public-private partnerships in the clean energy or clean buildings sector;(d) One person with professional experience in financing complex decarbonization projects;(e) One person with professional experience in engineering complex decarbonization projects;(f) One person representing the interests of organized labor;(g) One person representing electric utilities;(h) One representative of the Washington utilities and transportation commission; and(i) A representative from the office of the state treasurer.(5) One representative of the office of financial management and one representative of the department of enterprise services shall each serve as a nonvoting member acting in an advisory role to the committee.(6) In order to fulfill its duties under this section, the campus energy upgrades committee and the department may solicit preliminary input from agencies that operate district energy systems regarding the development of the committee's evaluation process and methodology. The committee must review the information collected from decarbonization plans received by the department under RCW 19.27A.260 that contain, at a minimum, complete information regarding: (a) Project elements that can be developed as discrete modules or phases; (b) greenhouse gas emission reduction or energy savings estimates for each phase; (c) project cost estimates by phase; and (d) estimates of construction schedules or the amount of time required to complete project phases. The committee and the department may request additional information from agencies that submitted plans under RCW 19.27A.260 in order to validate data used in this review.(7) The committee must consider the amount of leveraged nonstate funding or avoided costs due to the use of public-private partnerships.(8) The committee may consider supplemental criteria such as the amount of operating cost savings resulting from the project; the avoided capital maintenance or replacement costs for repairs to the existing energy system; the readiness of the project to proceed to construction; the ability of the project to improve electric grid reliability in the region; and the alignment of the project with other major capital projects planned for the campus in order to achieve efficiencies and related cost savings when possible.(9) By November 15, 2026, the department must submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature:(a) The prioritization framework used by the committee;(b) A prioritized list of capital projects related to state campus district energy systems recommended for funding in the 2027-2029 biennial capital budget. The prioritized list must include cost estimates for recommended projects by discrete phase and for the total cost of the project across future biennia, as applicable. The list must group projects into the following categories: (i) Feasibility studies, demonstration projects, and predevelopment activities; (ii) design and construction for discrete project phases or complete projects that can be completed within the biennium; and (iii) minor works for the repair or replacement of project elements that will be a part of or connected to the completed campus decarbonization project.(10) By June 15, 2027, the agency must submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature an analysis of barriers to state agencies entering into energy as a service contracts as authorized under RCW 39.35C.050 or participating in public-private partnerships, recommendations for legislation to facilitate agencies' use of these models, and a financial analysis with scenarios as options for agencies to utilize these models to complete decarbonization projects within limited resources.Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$650,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$650,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1021. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEQuinault Courthouse Relocation (91003001)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1022. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCELocal Climate Resiliency (91003004)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $16,615,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Blackman Museum HVAC. . . .$78,000Carson Elementary Urgent HVAC Project. . . .$515,000Curran House Oil Heater Replacement. . . .$22,000Finley School District HVAC. . . .$1,500,000Fisher Pavilion Decarbonization & Seattle CenterMini Ec. . . .$2,050,000Harbor Regional Health Green FacilitiesModernization. . . .$2,815,000Hoh Highlands Resiliency and Governance Center. . . .$4,137,000HVAC Replacement at Al Davies Club. . . .$231,000LED Lighting & Controls at Pierce County Buildings. . . .$960,000Museum of Glass HVAC. . . .$2,000,000Public Health Building HVAC & Energy EfficiencyUpgrade. . . .$1,552,000Richland HVAC Replacement. . . .$600,000Starfire LED Lighting Retrofit. . . .$155,000(2) $3,385,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Dungeness Railroad Bridge Replacement. . . .$2,500,000Ocean City Drainage Improvement Project. . . .$112,000Port Gamble Forest Park Timber Rights Purchase. . . .$773,000Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$16,615,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$3,385,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$20,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000Sec. 1023. 2025 c 414 s 1038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Dental Capacity Grants (92001952)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Funding provided in this section must be used for construction and equipment directly associated with dental facilities. The funding provided in this section is for projects that are maintained for at least a 10-year period and provide capacity to address unmet patient need and increase efficiency in dental access.(2) The amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:CHAS Health. . . .$510,000Columbia Basin Health Association. . . .$1,030,000HealthPoint. . . .$258,000HealthPoint (Tukwila). . . .$1,030,000International Community Health Services. . . .$254,000Peninsula Community Health Services. . . .$927,000Peninsula Community Health Services. . . .$973,000Tri-Cities Community Health. . . .$88,000Yakima Neighborhood Health Services. . . .$1,898,000Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic. . . .$515,000(3) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,483,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,483,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($21,932,000))Â Â Â Â Â $29,932,000TOTAL. . . .(($27,415,000))Â Â Â Â Â $37,415,000Sec. 1024. 2025 c 414 s 1041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEAffordable Housing Supply and Preservation (92001957)The ((appropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:((The))(1) $24,514,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Affordable Housing Preservation. . . .$515,000Alexandria's House Rehab. . . .$1,030,000Bring it Home 24-Hour Domestic Violence Shelter. . . .$530,000Cathlamet Eagle Point Roof Replacement. . . .$144,000Center of Success. . . .$1,000,000Chelan River Heights: Creating Affordable Homes inChelan. . . .$258,000Christian Aid Center. . . .$160,000Everett Bridge Housing â Phase I. . . .$1,000,000Frederickson South Project. . . .$515,000Fusion Family Center Expansion. . . .$1,000,000Grace Landing Property Purchase. . . .$267,000Homes First Preservation of AffordableHowerton Place (Kingston). . . .$366,000Low-Income Housing. . . .$773,000((HopeSource Teanaway Court. . . .$7,866,000))Kelso Affordable Housing and Community Center. . . .$1,545,000Mason Affordable Housing Development. . . .$309,000Mother Nation Spirit Journey Healing Village. . . .$3,500,000Pea Patch Community Campus Project. . . .$824,000Peninsula Community Health Oak House. . . .$300,000Peninsula Community Health Pine House. . . .$300,000Peninsula Community Health Spruce House. . . .$300,000Eagles Apartments Roof. . . .$134,000Richard Allen Apartments. . . .$258,000ROOTS Young Adult Shelter. . . .$2,550,000SOMOS â Cultural Center and Affordable Housing. . . .$515,000The Freedom Project 4-Plex. . . .$160,000The House of Bethlehem. . . .$2,320,000The Pointe at Thomas. . . .$1,803,000West Richland Homeownership. . . .$1,520,000YWCA Clark County Housing & Empowerment CampusProject. . . .$618,000(2) $29,666,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Casa MiA. . . .$4,000,000Hidden Village Mobile Home Park. . . .$4,000,000Hillsdale Town. . . .$1,750,000HopeSource Teanaway Court. . . .$7,866,000Lake City Affordable Housing. . . .$7,050,000Odd Fellows Lodge 20 Housing Project. . . .$5,000,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($22,236,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,514,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$29,666,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$54,180,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($22,236,000))Â Â Â Â Â $54,180,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1025. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCERegional Needs (92002328)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:4th St NW Stormwater Improvement. . . .$1,030,00092nd Avenue Pump Station. . . .$1,000,000A Home for Gathering place for IDD in aRural Community. . . .$475,000American Indian Community Center. . . .$2,000,000Ashley House Woodinville Renovation. . . .$304,000Aspen Gardens IDD Housing - Design Phase. . . .$258,000Bastyr University Healing Village. . . .$258,000BGC Gymnasium Restroom Project. . . .$113,000Burpee Hill Road Landslide Recovery. . . .$463,000CAFE: Community Multi-Service Community Center. . . .$258,000Camp Colman Marine Education Center. . . .$206,000CDCAC Community Commercial Kitchen. . . .$252,000Cement Masons Instructional Building. . . .$52,000Center Senior Living Assisted Living Project. . . .$258,000City of Granger Facilities. . . .$324,000City of Granger Library and Community Center. . . .$309,000City of Seattle Women's Softball Field Equity. . . .$1,500,000Commissary Kitchen - Nourishing the Community. . . .$309,000Community Campus Parking Lot. . . .$463,000Coupeville Raingarden and Native PlantsOutdoor Learning. . . .$204,000Crosby Community Center Restoration. . . .$118,000FareStart Culinary Job Training Classroom. . . .$258,000Federal Way Pediatric Outpatient Surgical Clinic. . . .$250,000Foothills Trail Crossing Safety Improvement. . . .$412,000Fort Dent Park Bathroom Upgrades. . . .$309,000Hartman Park Playground Replacement. . . .$515,000Kindering Campus Safety & Security Package. . . .$109,000Kirkland Green Loop Trail. . . .$515,000Lake Chelan Sr. Center Structure Improvements. . . .$548,000Maple Valley Food Bank: Upgrades and CapacityBuilding. . . .$258,000MAPS Redmond Youth Center. . . .$1,545,000Mason County 911 Modernization and Relocation. . . .$433,000Mason PUD 1 Grid Resilience. . . .$103,000New Grandstands. . . .$248,000Northeast Youth and Family Services CreativityProject. . . .$180,000PACCOM Radio Simulcast System Upgrade. . . .$410,000Pasco Symbiosis Park North American Analysis. . . .$258,000Performing Arts Center Infrastructure. . . .$716,000Permanent Homeless Day Shelter in Bellingham. . . .$1,030,000Port of Port Angeles Multi-User Marine TradesBuilding. . . .$2,050,000Quincy Community Food Bank New Building Project. . . .$258,000Reardan-Edwall School District Track and FieldRenovation. . . .$1,870,000Recovery Cafe Building Acquisition. . . .$412,000Regional Public Safety Campus. . . .$294,000Richland Transitional Veterans Home. . . .$149,000SCTP Aeration Equipment Replacement. . . .$600,000Seattle Chinese Garden and Cultural Center. . . .$2,550,000Setting Sun Circle. . . .$515,000Skyline Hospital. . . .$515,000Snoqualmie Valley Food Bank Capital Campaign. . . .$1,288,000South Kitsap Regional Park Upgrades. . . .$515,000Tacoma-Pierce County Community Health Hub. . . .$258,000Tenino Community Service Center. . . .$258,000Terrain Cultural Hub. . . .$773,000Veterans Memorial Drive Multi-use Trail. . . .$1,271,000Washougal Veterans Memorial. . . .$257,000White Salmon Valley Pool. . . .$500,000Wilkeson Water & Wastewater Infrastructure. . . .$514,000Yacolt Community Center. . . .$772,000Yakima Valley Local Crime Lab - Relocation Predesign. . . .$258,000(2) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018, chapter 414, Laws of 2025.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$34,128,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$34,128,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1026. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2027 Revitalized Local and Community Projects (92002468)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $4,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following project:African Diaspora Cultural Anchor Village. . . .$4,000,000(2) $4,718,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Washougal Community Library Building Project. . . .$2,218,000TVW Facilities. . . .$2,500,000(3) The appropriations in this section are subject to the provisions of section 8018, chapter 414, Laws of 2025.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,718,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$8,718,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,718,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1027. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEDisaster Response and Resiliency Infrastructure (91003155)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $9,000,000 is provided for grants to local governments to support disaster response, recovery, and resiliency efforts in Whatcom county. Of the amount provided in this section, $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for permitting and construction costs related to the Whatcom county fire protection district #1 emergency station relocation project. Permissible uses of remaining grant funds provided under this section include repair, rehabilitation, and construction of flood mitigation and disaster response and resiliency projects.(2) Grant funding pursuant to this section is not available to reimburse expenses that have been, or that will be, reimbursed by another entity, such as insurance, risk pools, or the federal emergency management agency. The department must structure any contracts with grantees in accordance with this subsection. In the event that grant funds are awarded to a local government for an expense that is later reimbursed by another entity, the department shall seek recoupment of any such funds.(3) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018, chapter 414, Laws of 2025.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,000,000TOTAL. . . .$9,000,000Sec. 1028. 2025 c 414 s 1039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCELocal Infrastructure (92001953)(1) The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Channel Drive Water. . . .$515,000Chehalis River Raw Water Main Replacement Project. . . .$1,750,000City of Lynden Wastewater Treatment Plant Renovation. . . .$515,000City of Selah Wastewater Treatment Plant. . . .$11,075,000Citywide Sidewalk Repair & Replacement Project. . . .$361,000Class A+ Purified Water Demonstration Project. . . .$453,000DD7 Levee Improvement Project. . . .$1,029,000Emergency Generator for Public Works Shop. . . .$154,000Emergency Operations Center Backup Battery. . . .$371,000Greenwood Water Main Replacement Project. . . .$976,000Hoffman Hill Reservoir Seismic Improvements. . . .$103,000Infiltration and Inflow Reduction Project. . . .$360,000Key Center Water System Emergency Backup Power System. . . .$211,000Kirkland Public Works Maintenance Center. . . .$412,000Mason County PUD No. 1's Water System Improvements. . . .$1,072,000Mercer Island New Water Supply Pipeline Project. . . .$1,200,000NETP Trickling Filter Upgrade. . . .$1,700,000Oxbow Basin Study. . . .$309,000Port of Chinook Dredge Project. . . .$515,000Port of Walla Walla Tri City Intermodal. . . .$773,000Port Orchard Water System Consolidation. . . .$1,030,000Rose Way Extension and Industrial Infrastructure. . . .$752,000Skagit District 15: Irrigation Project. . . .$361,000Skagit PUD Fiber Extension. . . .$530,000Snoqualmie Pass Fire & Rescue EmergencyCommunications. . . .$112,000Snoqualmie Tribal Police Station. . . .$360,000Toppenish Wastewater Treatment Plant. . . .$2,050,000Town of Concrete Water Meter Improvements. . . .$541,000Tumwater Brewery District Planned Action EIS. . . .$258,000Underground Wire Replacement Resiliency Project. . . .$550,000Washington Street Neighborhood Waterline Improvements. . . .$515,000Wastewater Improvements Project. . . .$773,000Wastewater Treatment Plant Upgrade Project. . . .$824,000Well 1 Booster Pumps. . . .$114,000Well 17 Pump. . . .$172,000(2) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($25,593,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,796,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($25,593,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,796,000Sec. 1029. 2025 c 414 s 1063 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESMinor Works - Preservation (40000485)Appropriation:Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$1,366,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$235,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,601,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($5,464,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,404,000TOTAL. . . .(($6,830,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,005,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1030. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCapitol Campus Window Film (40000627)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$345,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$345,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1031. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCapitol Campus Security (40000628)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,300,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1032. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESLegislative Building Repairs (40000629)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$250,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1033. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESMadrona Tenant Improvements (40000630)Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$228,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$228,000Sec. 1034. 2025 c 414 s 1068 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCampus Energy System Replacement (91000449)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the design of an ambient temperature loop project to replace the heating and cooling system on the capitol campus.(2) Upon completion of 90 percent of the project design, or as soon as is feasible, the department must provide a report to the house capital budget and senate ways and means committees that includes:(a) The estimated project timeline, including the estimated funds that will be needed at each step of the project. The department must consider phasing the construction of the project over three to four fiscal biennia;(b) If the total estimated project funds vary from the estimates previously provided to the legislature, an explanation as to the reason for the cost variance;(c) If the design of the system varies from the system details previously provided to the legislature, an explanation as to the reason for the design variance; and(d) Specific steps that will be incorporated in the bid process to ensure the contractor awarded the project:(i) Has experience with projects of this size and with this type of system;(ii) Has a strong relationship with installers and equipment vendors; and(iii) Uses equipment with adequate warranties in the event of mechanical failures.(3) During the course of design and construction, the department must timely notify the capital budget chairs and ranking minority members of any cost overruns. If the department intends to seek additional funding in the next agency budget submittal, the agency must submit reduced cost options together with its budget request.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$86,000))Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$9,237,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($364,000))Â Â Â Â Â $450,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$160,885,000TOTAL. . . .$170,572,000Sec. 1035. 2025 c 414 s 1070 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESLegislative Campus Modernization (92000020)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1044, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7033 of this act.(2) The department must consult with the senate facilities and operations committee or its designees and the house of representatives, executive rules committee or its designees at least every other month.(3) All appropriations must be coded and tracked as separate discrete subprojects in the agency financial reporting system.(4) If the department receives information, after value engineering has been performed, that projected costs for any of the subprojects in subsections (5) or (6) of this section will exceed the amount provided in the respective subsections, including projected costs in future biennia, the department must timely notify and provide that information in writing to the project executive team. Prior to proceeding with design or construction, the department must:(a) Provide at least three options that do not include square footage reduction to reduce the subproject costs to stay within the amount provided for that subproject and the project schedule;(b) Consult with the project executive team on the options offered, before proceeding with a reduced cost option; and(c) Receive majority consensus from the project executive team to either adopt and move forward with reduced cost options that bring the subproject costs within amounts appropriated or adopt a tentative modified budget for the subproject. If a tentative modified budget is adopted, the department must seek additional funding in the next agency budget submittal.(5) (($135,043,000))$49,501,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the rehabilitation, design, and construction of the Pritchard building and the renovation of the John L. O'Brien building subproject.(6) $10,923,000 of the state building construction accountâstate ((appropriation))reappropriation and (($672,000))$671,000 of the climate commitment actâstate reappropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for the legislative campus modernization global subproject that includes, but is not limited to, the capitol lot (opportunity site six east), 15th avenue southwest, the John A. Cherberg parking lot on 15th avenue southwest, the John L. O'Brien parking lot on 15th avenue southwest, Columbia street site work, the legislative modular building, and Water street site work.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($672,000))Â Â Â Â Â $671,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$66,585,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($67,257,000))Â Â Â Â Â $67,256,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$49,501,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($146,656,000))Â Â Â Â Â $146,657,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$263,414,000Sec. 1036. 2025 c 414 s 6132 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTJoint Force Readiness Center: Replacement (30000591)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$42,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,869,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$53,869,000Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$6,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$431,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($54,300,000))Â Â Â Â Â $60,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1037. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) 2025 c 414 s 1030 (uncodified); and(2) 2025 c 414 s 1034 (uncodified).(End of part)PART 2HUMAN SERVICESNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2001. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONWashington State Criminal Justice Training Commission ADA Upgrade (40000045)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$252,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$252,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2002. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONBurien Campus Indoor Shooting Range (40000047)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for an evaluation of the build-out of an indoor shooting range on the Burien campus. In the selection of the consultant, prior experience in designing and constructing firing ranges, as well as experience with the processes of any applicable local permitting authorities, must be considered. The total proposed project cost must not exceed $75,000,000.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$350,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$74,650,000TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000Sec. 2003. 2025 c 414 s 2011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESMinor Works 2025-27 (40001155)Appropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .(($582,000))Â Â Â Â Â $644,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($7,832,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,400,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($8,414,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,044,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($33,656,000))Â Â Â Â Â $36,176,000TOTAL. . . .(($42,070,000))Â Â Â Â Â $45,220,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2004. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESSpecial Commitment Center â Emergency Backup Generator Replacement (40001307)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,115,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,115,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2005. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWSH-Building 27: Fire Doors Replacement (40001322)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,940,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,940,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2006. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESOB2 Facility Improvements (40001324)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,257,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,257,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2007. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESESH Security Measures (40001325)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$250,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$250,000Sec. 2008. 2025 c 414 s 2021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHPlanning and Engineering Loan (40000085)Appropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâState. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $24,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $30,000,000Sec. 2009. 2025 c 414 s 2023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH2025-27 DWSRF State Match (40000088)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department shall require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development agency.Appropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâState. . . .(($25,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,920,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($100,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $127,680,000TOTAL. . . .(($125,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $159,600,000Sec. 2010. 2025 c 414 s 2025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSSVH - Skilled Nursing Facility Replacement (40000109)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the purchase of land for construction and associated off-site improvements necessary to run utilities and secure easements, as well as design of a skilled nursing facility in Spokane.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($8,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,900,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($144,956,000))Â Â Â Â Â $146,410,000TOTAL. . . .(($152,956,000))Â Â Â Â Â $165,310,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2011. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWSVC - Phase V Expansion in Medical Lake (40000118)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$6,080,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$675,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$6,755,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,755,000Sec. 2012. 2025 c 414 s 2031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESEcho Glen Secure Facility Improvements (40000546)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,653,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($800,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,901,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($13,354,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,054,000Sec. 2013. 2025 c 414 s 2032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESGreen Hill School HVAC Upgrades (40000584)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$3,449,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,996,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,445,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($4,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,300,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,864,000TOTAL. . . .(($18,810,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,610,000Sec. 2014. 2025 c 414 s 2034 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESMinor Works Project (40000589)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,578,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,068,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($22,312,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,272,000TOTAL. . . .(($27,890,000))Â Â Â Â Â $30,340,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2015. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESGreen Hill School Security Doors/Locks Sleeping Rooms (40000615)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,800,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,800,000Sec. 2016. 2025 c 414 s 2038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESAdditional Juvenile Rehabilitation Capacity (91000078)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to fund ((acquisition)): (a) Acquisition, predesign, and design of ((one or more facilities to be used as medium security))a secure juvenile rehabilitation ((facilities))facility; and (b) development of a plan to establish a secure facility located on the east side of the Cascade mountains. Of the amount provided, $500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for predesign.(2) Consideration must be given to geographic availability of services and the feasibility of renovating existing facilities that are able to be operational by the end of fiscal year 2029. ((The department must consider prioritizing facilities that))Each individual facility must support no more than 50 youth. At least one facility or portion of a facility must support specialty populations.(((2) $500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for predesign and $2,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for acquisition and design.))(3) A plan to establish a secure facility located on the east side of the Cascade mountains must include an outline of options and recommendations for future placement.(4) The predesign and design must include recommendations for living units and spaces for recreation, education, programming, and medical and behavioral health services. Recommendations must be informed by best practice models and must include a justification, estimated time of construction, and cost.(5) The department shall consult with relevant entities to ensure that the occupancy use and site modifications proposed in the predesign and design are allowable.(6) The department shall submit a full plan of design and construction costs, including a construction schedule, as part of its decision package for consideration in the 2027-2029 biennial capital budget. The plan of design and construction schedule must include:(a) A timeline for moving residents from the facility known as Harbor Heights to either Green Hill School or the new department facility;(b) A proposal for vacating and closing the facility known as Harbor Heights that minimizes any overlap in operating costs of Harbor Heights and the new department facility, provided that Harbor Heights shall remain open and operational until residents are fully transitioned out; and(c) An update on the development plan for a facility located on the east side of the Cascade mountains.(7) The department shall consult with experts in trauma-informed juvenile justice policies on the design of any new facilities.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,000,000Sec. 2017. 2025 c 414 s 2041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMCC: SOU and TRU - Domestic Water and HVAC Piping System (40000246)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($25,691,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,892,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($13,897,000))Â Â Â Â Â $27,772,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($3,438,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,237,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($41,691,000))Â Â Â Â Â $27,816,000TOTAL. . . .(($84,717,000))Â Â Â Â Â $84,717,000Sec. 2018. 2025 c 414 s 2047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMinor Works - Preservation Projects (40000769)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($6,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($24,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($30,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $40,000,000(End of part)PART 3NATURAL RESOURCESNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3001. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYVW Settlement Funded Projects (40000018)Reappropriation:General FundâPrivate/Local. . . .$60,278,000Appropriation:General FundâPrivate/Local. . . .$22,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$52,422,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$134,700,000Sec. 3002. 2025 c 414 s 3001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (40000621)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,200,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Twin Bridges Road Tire Pile Clean-up project.Appropriation:Waste Tire Removal AccountâState. . . .(($1,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,200,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($4,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,800,000TOTAL. . . .(($5,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,000,000Sec. 3003. 2025 c 414 s 3009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Cleanup Settlement Account Projects (40000629)Appropriation:Cleanup Settlement AccountâState. . . .(($650,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,150,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($650,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,150,000Sec. 3004. 2025 c 414 s 3019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Floodplains by Design (40000660)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state building construction accountâ state appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$59,629,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($16,154,000))Â Â Â Â Â $53,489,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($75,783,000))Â Â Â Â Â $113,118,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($303,132,000))Â Â Â Â Â $442,163,000TOTAL. . . .(($378,915,000))Â Â Â Â Â $555,281,000Sec. 3005. 2025 c 414 s 3031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYCapitol Lake-Deschutes Estuary Project (92000226)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The legislature finds that the portion of the capital campus known as Capitol Lake is an important ecological and recreational resource for the State of Washington that was once connected to the Deschutes Estuary. Due to a lack of routine management over the last 25 to 50 years, the lake ecosystem is degraded, resulting in poor water quality, excessive algae growth, and invasive species proliferation.The legislature further finds that the department of enterprise services has conducted significant outreach and study by engaging with the Squaxin Island Tribe, local municipal governments, the Port of Olympia, and other local stakeholders towards the goal of a long-term management solution that returns the lake to an estuary. The legislature acknowledges these efforts and partner commitments towards contributing to future maintenance and renewal but recognizes that the substantial investment necessary for the estuary restoration plan as currently proposed is not feasible. In an effort to both address the degraded lake water quality and identify a cost-effective approach to an estuary restoration that the state can responsibly support, the legislature intends to transfer management of this aquatic ecosystem to a state agency with natural resources expertise. Addressing the water quality of the lake will not only provide immediate benefit to the health of Capitol Lake and Budd Inlet, but also serve as a necessary precursor to a future estuary restoration.(2) (($8,000,000 of the))The appropriations in this section ((is))are provided solely for the department, in consultation with the department of enterprise services and office of the governor, for the Deschutes estuary restoration. The department shall use past reports and studies, consider existing stakeholder input, and critically consider elements of the current, but incomplete, department of enterprise services design. The updated design must include a recommended series of projects phased over several biennia with defined deliverable outcomes that move the state forward to a completed estuary. For each project phase, the plan shall identify expected timelines, estimated expenditures, and opportunities for non-state matching fund sources that contribute to the planned restoration and construction costs. The design may include only those elements associated with the construction of the estuary habitat, roadway and bridge improvements necessary to remove the existing 5th avenue bridge and associated necessary infrastructure and must minimize overall project cost. Recreational or pedestrian enhancement elements of the project must be designed as a separate bid package that could be added to the project at a future date, subject to the availability of funding appropriated for these elements.(((6) $750,000))(3) Of the amounts provided in this section, $750,000 of the state building construction accountâstate and $300,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriations((in this section is))are provided solely for project management costs.(4) Of the amounts provided in this section, $300,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for continuing right-of-way property acquisition work.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$7,200,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($14,750,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,750,000General FundâPrivate/Local. . . .$9,259,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$25,209,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $403,616,000TOTAL. . . .(($14,750,000))Â Â Â Â Â $428,825,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3006. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONMillersylvania Welcome Center and Entrance Modifications (40000498)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$630,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,610,000TOTAL. . . .$3,240,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3007. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONLittle Hoko River Floodplain Restoration (40000513)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3008. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION2025-27 Statewide - ADA Compliance (40000514)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) To the extent possible under the terms of the settlement agreement entered into between the United States and the Washington state parks and recreation commission (USAO #2023v00508; DJ #204-82-233) and any corresponding approved remediation plan, the commission should prioritize barrier removal in parks with high attendance rates.(2) $189,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for a staff position to provide direct support for implementation of these projects.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,189,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$105,000,000TOTAL. . . .$110,189,000Sec. 3009. 2025 c 414 s 3055 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION2025-27 State Parks Capital Preservation Pool (92001133)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) It is the intent of the legislature that the campground at Lyons Ferry State Park be restored and available for public use.(2) In order for the appropriation in this section to be considered for reappropriation in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium, the commission must restore public use of the Lyons Ferry State Park campground by ((December 31, 2026))June 30, 2027.(((3) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for statewide ADA compliance projects.))Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,600,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,600,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$22,400,000TOTAL. . . .(($28,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,000,000Sec. 3010. 2025 c 414 s 3057 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Salmon Recovery Funding Board Grant Programs (40000550)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,400,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain the lead entity program as described in chapter 77.85 RCW.(2) $640,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for regional fisheries enhancement groups created in RCW 77.95.060.(3) The recreation and conservation office may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of grants. The portion of funds retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.(4) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.(5) For any grant of funds awarded to a federally recognized tribe using funds from the natural climate solutions account, the recreation and conservation office must offer the tribe the option to receive such funds on a reimbursement basis or through incremental advance payments.Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$80,000,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$11,130,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$25,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($105,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $116,130,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($420,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $464,520,000TOTAL. . . .(($525,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $580,650,000Sec. 3011. 2025 c 414 s 3062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Community Forest Grant Program (40000562)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) The ((appropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. ((RCO-5-2025))RCO-2-2026, developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026. The recreation and conservation office may retain a portion of the funds appropriated to projects for the administration of grants. The portion of funds retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.(2) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,248,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$9,372,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,620,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($24,992,000))Â Â Â Â Â $62,480,000TOTAL. . . .(($31,240,000))Â Â Â Â Â $78,100,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3012. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEPalouse to Cascades Trail (91001735)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Palouse to Cascades Trail - Rosalia Improvements project.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3013. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICESkokomish Timber Land Acquisition (91003002)Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000Sec. 3014. 2025 c 414 s 3086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESoos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$183,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,726,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($22,095,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,043,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($29,821,000))Â Â Â Â Â $29,952,000Sec. 3015. 2025 c 414 s 3098 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEMinor Works Preservation 2025-27 (40000278)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department must complete the work of building demolition at the snow creek resort within existing appropriations.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,000,000TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000Sec. 3016. 2025 c 414 s 3101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE2025-27 Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (40000347)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$10,000,000General FundâPrivate/Local. . . .$1,000,000Fish, Wildlife, and Conservation AccountâState. . . .$500,000((Limited Fish and Wildlife AccountâState. . . .$500,000))Special Wildlife AccountâFederal. . . .$1,000,000Special Wildlife AccountâPrivate/Local. . . .$1,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$13,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$54,000,000TOTAL. . . .$67,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3017. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEBob Oke Game Farm Relocation and Remediation Efforts (91000172)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $50,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department of fish and wildlife to identify suitable locations for the relocation of the Bob Oke game farm and to begin the process for remediating the current location of the Bob Oke game farm, as described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.(2)(a) The department shall identify one or more alternate locations potentially suitable for the relocation of the Bob Oke game farm. The department shall first determine whether a property that the department currently owns or manages is suitable for relocation of the Bob Oke game farm. By December 1, 2026, the department shall report the list to the committees of the house of representatives and the senate with jurisdiction over the capital appropriations act and the senator and members of the house of representatives representing the legislative district in which the Bob Oke game farm is located.(b) To evaluate potential alternate locations, the department shall submit a capital appropriations request for the 2027-2029 biennial capital appropriations act for predesign to:(i) Conduct or obtain a hydrogeologic assessment of each candidate site to evaluate the potential for nutrient, manure, or other operational impacts to groundwater, surface water, and municipal or residential drinking water supplies;(ii) Evaluate proximity to existing public water systems, wellhead protection areas, and critical aquifer recharge areas;(iii) Consider access, infrastructure needs, land availability, zoning and land use compatibility, and the ability to maintain wildlife management and release functions;(iv) Consult with affected local governments, water utilities, tribes, and conservation districts; and(v) Estimate the cost, timeline, and logistical requirements for relocation to each candidate site.(c) It is the intent of the legislature that at the conclusion of the predesign, the department shall submit a relocation report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature. In addition to office of financial management predesign criteria, the report should include:(i) A summary of sites identified and evaluated and the criteria used;(ii) A recommendation of a preferred location;(iii) A proposed acquisition or leasing strategy;(iv) A schedule for transition of operations;(v) Concept-level development plans;(vi) Estimated capital and operating costs; and(vii) Any statutory or budgetary actions required to complete the relocation.(d) It is the further intent of the legislature that once a preferred location has been identified, the department shall submit a capital appropriations request for the 2029-2031 biennial capital appropriations act to request funding needed to relocate the Bob Oke game farm to the preferred location, and that the department shall continue to seek funding until the game farm has been relocated.(3)(a) The department shall submit a capital appropriations request for the 2027-2029 biennial capital appropriations act to complete design work associated with the remediation of the existing location of the Bob Oke game farm. Design will include work to be done prior to closure and work to be done upon closure.(b) The remediation plan must include:(i) Continued groundwater and soil monitoring;(ii) Measures to prevent further nitrate or nutrient leaching to groundwater; and(iii) Evaluation of soil treatment, land cover, or other restoration techniques to reduce existing nutrient concentrations.(c) Once the design work associated with remediation of the existing location is complete, it is the intent of the legislature that the department shall submit a capital appropriations request for the 2029-2031 biennial capital appropriations act to request funding needed to fully remediate the current site, and that the department shall continue to seek funding until the site has been fully remediated.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$50,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000Sec. 3018. 2025 c 414 s 3112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESEnvironmental Mitigation Projects (40000586)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .(($997,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,327,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,988,000TOTAL. . . .(($4,985,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,315,000Sec. 3019. 2025 c 414 s 3105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESSchool Seismic Safety Site Class Assessments (40000444)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($663,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,093,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($2,652,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,372,000TOTAL. . . .(($3,315,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,465,000Sec. 3020. 2025 c 414 s 3120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2025-27 Trust Land Transfer Program (40000685)The ((appropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $16,650,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. DNR-1-2025, developed April 26, 2025.(2) $16,950,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. DNR-1-2026, developed February 23, 2026.(3) $250,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to conduct an analysis of the ecological and conservation values of the Elwha watershed on department managed lands pursuant to the priorities and processes identified in chapters 79.70 and 79.71 RCW. The department shall provide a report to the house capital budget committee, senate ways and means committee, and the governor by October 1, 2026, that includes the following:(a) A Washington natural heritage program site survey to identify rare flora, native ecological communities, structurally complex forests, and scenic or other natural features worthy of consideration for conservation;(b) Identification of lands within the watershed that may be appropriate for conservation as a state natural area preserve as defined in RCW 79.70.020 or a natural resources conservation area under RCW 79.71.020;(c) Uses currently occurring in the area, including recreation and cultural practices;(d) A proposed boundary, if applicable, for any such proposed natural area for review by the natural heritage advisory council; and(e) An acknowledgment that any applicable proposed natural area boundary will be developed through the site establishment process as described in chapters 79.70 and 79.71 RCW.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$16,900,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$16,950,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$33,850,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($67,600,000))Â Â Â Â Â $135,400,000TOTAL. . . .(($84,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $169,250,000Sec. 3021. 2025 c 414 s 3122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Programmatic (91000332)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,279,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($12,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,116,000TOTAL. . . .(($15,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,395,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3022. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREWSDA Plant Services Lab, Prosser (40000002)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,186,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,794,000TOTAL. . . .$10,980,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3023. 2025 c 414 s 3117 (uncodified) is repealed.(End of part)PART 4TRANSPORTATIONNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4001. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONLower Columbia River Dredging Project (91000002)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for property acquisition and infrastructure costs associated with Washington sponsor ports' obligations under the lower Columbia river channel maintenance plan.(2) It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate a total of $15,000,000 for this project in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, with $7,500,000 of this amount funded in the 2026 supplemental transportation budget.(3) The legislature further intends that the sponsor ports develop a comprehensive financial plan that relies primarily on nonstate funding to support their obligations under the lower Columbia river channel maintenance plan, and that development of the plan include consideration of economic and ecological uses for dredged material and sites, with input from relevant state agencies.(4) The appropriations made by the legislature in this biennium do not obligate the legislature to provide future funding from the state for expenditures associated with the lower Columbia river channel maintenance plan in future biennia.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,500,000(End of part)PART 5EDUCATIONSec. 5001. 2025 c 414 s 5006 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 Healthy Kids-Healthy Schools (40000147)The ((appropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $12,000,000 of the appropriation of the common school construction fundâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for healthy kids and healthy schools grants for projects that are consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities.(b) The appropriation in this subsection (1) is provided solely for grant funding to school districts for the purchase of equipment or to make repairs to existing equipment that is related to improving: (i) Children's physical health, and may include, but is not limited to, fitness playground equipment, covered play areas, and physical education equipment or related structures or renovation; and (ii) children's nutrition, and may include, but is not limited to, garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce, and kitchen equipment or upgrades.(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria for grant funding under this subsection (1) that include, but are not limited to, the following requirements: (i) Districts may apply for grants, but no single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation for grants awarded under this section; (ii) any district receiving funding provided in this section must demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; and (iii) applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program may be prioritized.(2) (($1,000,000))$2,640,000 of the common school construction fundâstate appropriation and $3,360,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to school districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools for the replacement of lead-contaminated pipes, drinking water fixtures, and the purchase of water filters, including the labor costs of remediation design, installation, and construction.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .(($13,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,640,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,360,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$18,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($52,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $72,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($65,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $90,000,000Sec. 5002. 2025 c 414 s 5008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 Small District and STEC Schools Modernization Program (40000150)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $174,450,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and $28,832,000 of the common school construction fundâstate appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for modernization grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159.(2) (($530,000))$724,000 of the common school construction ((account))fundâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159. Planning grants may not exceed $50,000 per district. Planning grants may only be awarded to school districts with an estimated total project cost of $6,000,000 or less. In awarding planning grants pursuant to this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must follow the list of planning grants submitted to the governor and the legislature for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, except that the office shall review the planning grant list for project redundancies and may not award planning grants for any project receiving design or construction funding appropriated in other sections of part 5 of this act.(3) $27,371,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants and modernization grants to state-tribal compact schools. The superintendent of public instruction may prioritize planning grants for state-tribal compact schools with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity.(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a list of small school district modernization projects, as prioritized by the advisory committee under RCW 28A.525.159, to the legislature and the governor by September 15, 2026. The list must include: (a) A description of the project; (b) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed $6,000,000 per project, adjusted for inflation based on the office of financial management's C-100 form; (c) estimated total project costs; and (d) local funding resources.(5) In the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, school districts receiving a small district modernization grant under this section may not combine this grant funding either with a school construction assistance program grant or with other grants awarded under this section to fund a single project.(6) The appropriations in this section may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP Capital Document No. OSPI-((1-2025))2-2026, developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026.(7) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .(($530,000))Â Â Â Â Â $29,556,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$201,821,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($202,351,000))Â Â Â Â Â $231,377,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($809,404,000))Â Â Â Â Â $925,508,000TOTAL. . . .(($1,011,755,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,156,885,000Sec. 5003. 2025 c 414 s 5009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 School Construction Assistance Program (40000153)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($425,065,000))$445,578,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and $790,000 of the common school construction fundâfederal appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for school construction assistance grants for qualifying public school construction projects.(2) (($3,007,000))$2,114,000 of the common school construction ((account))fundâstate appropriation and $1,500,000 of the common school construction accountâfederal appropriation in this section are provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years, and for the acquisition of art pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.(3) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .(($3,007,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,114,000Common School Construction FundâFederal. . . .(($1,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,290,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($425,065,000))Â Â Â Â Â $445,578,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($429,572,000))Â Â Â Â Â $449,982,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($1,718,288,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,799,928,000TOTAL. . . .(($2,147,860,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,249,910,000Sec. 5004. 2025 c 414 s 5011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 School Seismic Safety Grant Program (40000159)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following school seismic safety project grants, as authorized under RCW 28A.525.320: (1) The Cape Flattery - Neah Bay K-12 Campus Relocation project; (2) the Taholah - K-12 School Relocation project; (3) the North Beach - Ocean Shores Vertical Evacuation Tower project; ((and)) (4) the North Beach - Pacific Beach Elementary Relocation project; (5) the North Beach Junior/Senior High School project; (6) the Hoquiam Junior/Senior High School Consolidation project; and (7) the Hoquiam K-6 Consolidation project.(2) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($151,451,000))Â Â Â Â Â $179,871,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($605,804,000))Â Â Â Â Â $719,484,000TOTAL. . . .(($757,255,000))Â Â Â Â Â $899,355,000Sec. 5005. 2025 c 414 s 5014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSCAPR Transitional Projects (91002551)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) It is the intent of the legislature to work with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and stakeholders to revise the school construction assistance program and to holistically examine the state's programmatic support of K-12 school construction through the planning process required under section 5011, chapter 375, Laws of 2024. Pursuant to this section, the legislature intends that this revision and examination will be completed in a manner that will modify and improve efficiencies within, and access to, the school construction assistance program, while also identifying cost-saving measures for awarding state grants for the construction and modernization of common school facilities. The legislature further intends that this revision and planning process will result in a prioritized list of school construction projects that recognizes the substantial variation between district sizes and financial capacities, and which categorizes reasonably comparable applicants into distinct school district groupings to foster a fair and equitable prioritization of projects. However, the legislature also recognizes that some school district projects will be ready to proceed to construction during this planning and revision period. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide funding to the school district projects listed in this section in recognition of this transitional period.(2) School districts receiving grant funding pursuant to this section may combine this funding with a school construction assistance program grant and must use available local resources to contribute financially to the completion of the project.(3) (($8,131,000))$5,304,000 of the common school construction ((account))fundâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Pe Ell school district's K-12 school modernization project.(4) (($6,000,000))$4,568,000 of the common school construction ((account))fundâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Bridgeport school district's Bridgeport elementary school modernization project.(5) (($3,972,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation and)) $6,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section ((are))is provided solely for the Inchelium school district's K-12 school modernization project.(6) Grant funding provided to each school district in this section is contingent upon each of the applicable districts named in this section relinquishing all unspent construction grant funding previously awarded under section 7063 of this act.(7) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .(($18,103,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,872,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($24,103,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,872,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($24,103,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,872,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5006. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSCAP Enhancement Program Pilot (91002559)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement a pilot program for proposal No. five: Develop a SCAP enhancement program, as contained in the SCAP revision planning study published on the "Reports to the Legislature" page of the Washington state legislature's website, dated November 18, 2025, subject to the requirements of this section.(2) The office must award the following SCAP enhancement pilot program grants under this section to the following school districts: (a) $1,429,000 to the Garfield school district for the Garfield ES/MS project; (b) $1,507,000 to the Wellpinit school district for the Wellpinit elementary school project; and (c) $850,000 to the Wahkiakum school district for the Julius A. Wendt elementary school project. The legislature intends that the pilot program grants in this section will enable these districts to develop school construction projects that will be financially supported by the districts and the state.(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall inform school districts awarded a pilot program grant under this section that the legislature intends, in future biennia, that grant awards for the remaining project costs pursuant to this section will be determined according to the following parameters:(a) The school district property tax rate increment associated with the project will be not less than $1.35 per $1,000 of assessed property value and the state share of project costs will be calculated based on the remaining project costs not covered by this tax rate; and(b) The school district property tax rate threshold under (a) of this subsection, will be calculated based on the estimated annualized debt service costs for general obligation bonds issued with an average maturity of no less than 20 years and on the interest rate for state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of the pilot program grant award pursuant to this section.(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall request design and construction funding for the school districts' projects listed in this section as part of the office's request for omnibus capital appropriations in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium. In this request, the office must provide calculations for the state and school district cost shares that demonstrate compliance with the legislative intent stated in subsection (3) of this section and information regarding project scope and budget.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$3,786,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$100,000,000TOTAL. . . .$103,786,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5007. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSchool Electrification (91002564)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement a school electrification grant program.(2) Grants awarded pursuant to this section must be for predesign, design, construction, and building equipment costs that will reduce school facility greenhouse gas emissions.(3) Grants awarded pursuant to this section must be prioritized based on the greenhouse gas reduction potential of the project and the financial capacity of the school district to finance the requested improvements in the absence of the state grant funding. In addition, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consider the student health and safety impacts of the requested improvements in the prioritization of grant awards in this section.(4) Following the first grant award cycle, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide a report to the office of financial management and to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature that includes the following information pursuant to this section: (a) The amount of grant funding requested by school districts; (b) the scope of work requested for each grant; (c) the amount of grant funding awarded to each school district; and (d) a detailed description of the process, including scoring criteria, by which the grant applications were prioritized.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$53,286,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$213,144,000TOTAL. . . .$266,430,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5008. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONPower Plant Electrification & Campus Hot Water Loop - Phase 1 (40000213)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$47,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$47,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5009. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYMinor Works Preservation and Program (Supplemental) (91000047)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5010. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYEWU Large Solar Array (40000234)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$7,134,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,134,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5011. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMinor Works Preservation and Program (Supplemental) (91000033)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000Sec. 5012. 2025 c 414 s 5041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYHumanities & Social Science Complex (40000081)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($5,139,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,271,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$45,825,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($50,964,000))Â Â Â Â Â $49,096,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,158,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($46,841,000))Â Â Â Â Â $48,709,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$108,963,000Sec. 5013. 2025 c 414 s 6359 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMinor Works Preservation 2023-2025 (40000128)Reappropriation:Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .(($1,481,000))Â Â Â Â Â $781,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$355,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($1,836,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,136,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$700,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,793,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,629,000Sec. 5014. 2025 c 414 s 5043 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYSecondary Geothermal Module (40000161)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for Central Washington University to design and construct the smaller-scale geothermal system that was presented to the governor and the legislature for consideration during the 2024 legislative session.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($11,830,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,747,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($634,000))Â Â Â Â Â $717,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$16,464,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5015. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYElectrical Grid Security Feeder 14 (40000206)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,491,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,491,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5016. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYNorth Academic Complex Moving Costs (91000029)Appropriation:Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$700,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$700,000Sec. 5017. 2025 c 414 s 5052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYHeating Conversion Project (40000005)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($8,911,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,596,000Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$41,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($1,089,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,404,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$164,000,000TOTAL. . . .$215,000,000Sec. 5018. 2025 c 414 s 5053 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYPreventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (40000012)Appropriation:Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .(($3,614,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,114,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,614,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,456,000TOTAL. . . .(($21,684,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,184,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5019. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMinor Works Preservation and Program (Supplemental) (91000015)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,100,000Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$250,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,350,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,000,000TOTAL. . . .$2,350,000Sec. 5020. 2025 c 414 s 5057 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYPreservation - Minor Works 2025-27 (40000182)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The Climate Commitment AccountâState appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Clean Building Energy Audit and Incentive Grant.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$40,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($2,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,325,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($2,040,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,365,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($8,160,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,460,000TOTAL. . . .(($10,200,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,825,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5021. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESCTC Building Tune-up Program (40001338)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5022. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESCTC Building HVAC Control-to-schedule Upgrades (40001339)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5023. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESNorth Seattle District Energy Decarbonization Phase 1 (40001347)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$7,877,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,863,000TOTAL. . . .$12,740,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5024. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESSeattle Central EcoDistrict Decarbonization (40001348)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$22,409,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,820,000TOTAL. . . .$30,229,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5025. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESClark College District Energy Decarbonization Phase 1 (40001349)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$21,307,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,000,000TOTAL. . . .$36,307,000(End of part)PART 6REAPPROPRIATIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6001. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEClean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6003, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,148,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$110,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,258,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$39,142,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6002. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEClean Energy Funds 3 (30000881)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1007, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,607,000Energy Efficiency AccountâState. . . .$2,106,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$10,713,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$32,987,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$43,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6003. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEEnergy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000882)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6007, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:Energy Efficiency AccountâState. . . .$12,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,988,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6004. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEClean Energy Transition 4 (40000042)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,276,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$511,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,787,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,813,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$32,600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6005. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants Program (40000049)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1023, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$533,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,967,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6006. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Energy Retrofits for Public Buildings Grant Program (40000149)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7011, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,497,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,460,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,957,000Sec. 6007. 2025 c 414 s 6038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Energy Retrofits and Solar Power for Public Buildings (40000283)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7017 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($49,077,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,550,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($1,923,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,450,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$51,000,000Sec. 6008. 2025 c 414 s 6039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHome Electrification and Appliance Rebates Program (HEAR) (40000284)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($56,200,000))Â Â Â Â Â $33,322,000General FundâFederal. . . .$82,945,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($139,145,000))Â Â Â Â Â $116,267,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($23,855,000))Â Â Â Â Â $46,733,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$163,000,000Sec. 6009. 2025 c 414 s 6043 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Weatherization Plus Health (40000291)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1014, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($16,492,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,913,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,323,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($18,815,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,236,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($21,185,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,764,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000Sec. 6010. 2025 c 414 s 6045 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Clean Energy Fund Program (40000294)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($48,164,000))Â Â Â Â Â $36,714,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($1,836,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,286,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000Sec. 6011. 2025 c 414 s 6046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Housing Trust Fund (40000295)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section ((7020, chapter 414, Laws of 2025))7005 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$85,137,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($351,043,000))Â Â Â Â Â $347,043,000Washington Housing Trust AccountâState. . . .$8,500,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($444,680,000))Â Â Â Â Â $440,680,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$82,859,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($527,539,000))Â Â Â Â Â $523,539,000Sec. 6012. 2025 c 414 s 6047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Connecting Housing to Infrastructure (CHIP) (40000296)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1021, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($53,481,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,694,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$26,787,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$53,481,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,519,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0Total Reappropriation. . . .$60,000,000((TOTAL. . . .$60,000,000))Sec. 6013. 2025 c 414 s 6049 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (40000299)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section ((1009, chapter 375, Laws of 2024))7006 of this act.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$1,250,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$265,017,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$266,267,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,059,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$302,326,000Sec. 6014. 2025 c 414 s 6051 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2024 Local and Community Projects (40000301)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section ((1011, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7022, chapter 414, Laws of 2025,))7007 of this act.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$2,400,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$166,569,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$168,969,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$66,474,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$235,443,000Sec. 6015. 2025 c 414 s 6052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCETribal Climate Adaptation Pass-through Grants (40000421)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($43,076,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,606,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($6,924,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,394,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000Sec. 6016. 2025 c 414 s 6053 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEDOE Hydrogen Hub -State Match (40000561)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1029, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($10,115,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,266,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($9,885,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,734,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000Sec. 6017. 2025 c 414 s 6058 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEGreen Jobs and Infrastructure Grants (40000604)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($24,082,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,470,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($918,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,530,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000Sec. 6018. 2025 c 414 s 6060 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025 Local and Community Projects (40000614)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section ((7023, chapter 414, Laws of 2025))7008 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($7,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,000Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$3,875,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$5,122,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$53,214,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($62,218,000))Â Â Â Â Â $62,219,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($6,347,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,346,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$68,565,000Sec. 6019. 2025 c 414 s 6061 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Community Solar Resilience Hubs (40000620)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1019, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($31,212,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,064,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($6,788,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,936,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$38,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6020. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Community Solar (40000621)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1020, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,859,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,141,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000Sec. 6021. 2025 c 414 s 6062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Community EV Charging (40000622)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1021, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7024 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($77,502,000))Â Â Â Â Â $64,612,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($27,498,000))Â Â Â Â Â $40,388,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$105,000,000Sec. 6022. 2025 c 414 s 6073 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEGrants for Affordable Housing Development Connections (91001685)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section ((1032, chapter 296, Laws of 2022))7010 of this act.Reappropriation:Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederal. . . .$7,864,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,217,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$16,081,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$29,219,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$45,300,000Sec. 6023. 2025 c 414 s 6069 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Dental Capacity Grants (91001660)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section ((1043, chapter 296, Laws of 2022))7011 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,698,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,527,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,225,000Sec. 6024. 2025 c 414 s 6078 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHomeless Youth Facilities (91001991)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1048, chapter 296, Laws of 2022, except that due to a lapse in funding, no funding may be provided to the communities of color coalition (Everett).Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .(($8,666,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,266,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,229,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($14,895,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,495,000Sec. 6025. 2025 c 414 s 6080 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCELocal Emission Reduction Projects (91002184)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1025, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($27,156,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,713,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($6,975,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,655,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($34,131,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,368,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($4,539,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,302,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$38,670,000Sec. 6026. 2025 c 414 s 6085 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEMultifamily Bldg Efficiency Grants (91002449)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1028, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($54,981,000))Â Â Â Â Â $54,461,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($19,000))Â Â Â Â Â $539,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$55,000,000Sec. 6027. 2025 c 414 s 6086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEClean Building Performance Grants (91002451)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1029, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($45,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,979,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $5,021,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$45,000,000Sec. 6028. 2025 c 414 s 6090 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHard-to-Decarbonize Sector & Economic Development Grants (91002641)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1033, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($47,394,000))Â Â Â Â Â $42,337,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,406,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,463,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$49,800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6029. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2022 Broadband Office (92001178)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7017, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$19,875,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,125,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000Sec. 6030. 2025 c 414 s 6097 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2022 Crisis Stabilization Facilities (92001286)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1025, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .(($25,689,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,539,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,613,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($48,302,000))Â Â Â Â Â $48,152,000Sec. 6031. 2025 c 414 s 6098 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEPort of Everett (92001364)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1042, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($4,948,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,400,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($52,000))Â Â Â Â Â $600,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000Sec. 6032. 2025 c 414 s 6101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCELarge Scale Solar Innovation Projects (92001669)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1040, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($38,917,000))Â Â Â Â Â $36,108,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($83,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,892,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$39,000,000Sec. 6033. 2025 c 414 s 6102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEEnergy Northwest (92001720)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1037, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($25,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,986,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $14,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000Sec. 6034. 2025 c 414 s 6126 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONNorthwest Region Training Facility Renovation and Upgrades (40000042)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($1,082,000))Â Â Â Â Â $782,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$300,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,082,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,082,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6035. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONRegional Training Facilities (92000006)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2003, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,596,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,164,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,760,000Sec. 6036. 2025 c 414 s 6131 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIESSolar Panel Installation - Lab & Training Facility (40000015)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($1,637,000))Â Â Â Â Â $332,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,097,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,402,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,734,000Sec. 6037. 2025 c 414 s 6174 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESChild Study and Treatment Center-Ketron: LSA Expansion (40000411)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($2,731,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,226,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($269,000))Â Â Â Â Â $278,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,504,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6038. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital-EL & WL: HVAC Compliance & Monitoring (40000492)Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,411,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,411,000Sec. 6039. 2025 c 414 s 6187 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital-Commissary: Building Repairs (40000606)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($810,000))Â Â Â Â Â $772,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,350,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($4,160,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,122,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($290,000))Â Â Â Â Â $328,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,450,000Sec. 6040. 2025 c 414 s 6194 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESStatewide: Clean Buildings Act (40000960)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($3,133,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,889,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($594,000))Â Â Â Â Â $838,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,727,000Sec. 6041. 2025 c 414 s 6195 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESYakima Valley School-Main Building: Exterior Window Replacement (40000962)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($5,204,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,081,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($126,000))Â Â Â Â Â $249,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,330,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6042. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHNew Central Boiler Plant (30000381)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$254,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,011,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$13,265,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6043. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHGenerator for New Central Boiler Plant (40000053)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$74,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,763,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,837,000Sec. 6044. 2025 c 414 s 6230 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWVH HVAC Retrofit (40000006)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,000))Â Â Â Â Â $874,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($745,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,676,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($750,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,550,000Sec. 6045. 2025 c 414 s 6235 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWSVC - Burial and Columbarium Expansion Grant (40000092)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .(($4,839,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,084,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($79,000))Â Â Â Â Â $502,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($4,918,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,586,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($491,000))Â Â Â Â Â $823,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,409,000Sec. 6046. 2025 c 414 s 6237 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSDVA ARPA Federal Funds & State Match (91000013)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 2013, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$24,515,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,055,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$34,570,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,639,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($42,209,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,154,000Sec. 6047. 2025 c 414 s 6275 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSkills Centers Minor Works (40000023)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($216,000))Â Â Â Â Â $217,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,784,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,783,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000Sec. 6048. 2025 c 414 s 6285 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 Small District and State Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (40000065)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7072 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($3,630,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,300,000Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$128,368,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,717,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($142,715,000))Â Â Â Â Â $145,385,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($69,165,000))Â Â Â Â Â $69,495,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($211,880,000))Â Â Â Â Â $214,880,000Sec. 6049. 2025 c 414 s 6292 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSchool District Indoor Air Quality & Energy Efficiency (40000104)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5007, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($30,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $29,934,000Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$14,472,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($44,472,000))Â Â Â Â Â $44,406,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($553,000))Â Â Â Â Â $619,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$45,025,000Sec. 6050. 2025 c 414 s 6297 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONEnergy Assessment Grants to School Districts (91000509)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5008, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($4,900,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,925,000Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$50,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($4,950,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,975,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $1,975,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,950,000Sec. 6051. 2025 c 414 s 6311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 Distressed Schools (92000928)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5012, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, except that Seattle school district may use the funds appropriated for Ingraham high school construction trades skills center (Seattle) for other skills centers within their district.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$8,941,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$21,132,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$30,073,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,042,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$32,115,000Sec. 6052. 2025 c 414 s 6327 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Clean Energy Testbeds (40000098)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5015, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($2,501,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,239,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($4,999,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,261,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,500,000Sec. 6053. 2025 c 414 s 6333 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONInfrastructure Renewal (40000132)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($6,296,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,715,000University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$8,499,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($14,795,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,214,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($9,380,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,961,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$24,175,000Sec. 6054. 2025 c 414 s 6342 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYSpokane Team Health Education Building (40000361)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Washington State University must either design ((the))a new facility to meet the original size estimate of 34,500 square feet or renovate an existing space on campus.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,191,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,809,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000Sec. 6055. 2025 c 414 s 6344 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYDecarbonization Planning (91000043)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5021, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,076,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $1,924,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000Sec. 6056. 2025 c 414 s 6345 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYKnott Dairy Center Digester (92001132)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5022, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($10,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,256,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $744,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000Sec. 6057. 2025 c 414 s 6354 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYNutrition Science (30000456)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($210,000))Â Â Â Â Â $256,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($59,370,000))Â Â Â Â Â $59,324,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$59,580,000Sec. 6058. 2025 c 414 s 6362 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYHB 1390 â District Energy Systems (91000024)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($55,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($745,000))Â Â Â Â Â $799,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6059. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYMinor Works: Preservation 2021-23 (40000041)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$108,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$670,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$778,000Sec. 6060. 2025 c 414 s 6416 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000152)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3087, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:Columbia River Basin Water Supply RevenueRecovery AccountâState. . . .(($1,464,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,857,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($9,371,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,338,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,990,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($20,825,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,185,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($19,175,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,815,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000Sec. 6061. 2025 c 414 s 6463 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Floodplains by Design (40000540)Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($16,972,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,817,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$47,320,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($64,292,000))Â Â Â Â Â $64,137,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($3,100,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,255,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$67,392,000Sec. 6062. 2025 c 414 s 6475 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYImproving Air Quality in Overburdened Communities Initiative (40000606)Reappropriation:Air Quality and Health Disparities ImprovementAccountâState. . . .(($20,646,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,374,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($754,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,026,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$21,400,000Sec. 6063. 2025 c 414 s 6476 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYLandfill Methane Capture (40000611)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7056 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($9,697,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,476,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($403,000))Â Â Â Â Â $624,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,100,000Sec. 6064. 2025 c 414 s 6482 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Water Banking (91000373)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6027, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($3,707,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,437,000State Drought Preparedness and Response AccountâState. . . .$8,606,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($12,313,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,043,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,687,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($14,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,730,000Sec. 6065. 2025 c 414 s 6483 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYPSCAA Ultra-fine Particle Monitoring (91000378)Reappropriation:Air Quality and Health Disparities ImprovementAccountâState. . . .(($29,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($371,000))Â Â Â Â Â $380,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$400,000Sec. 6066. 2025 c 414 s 6492 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAMUnderground Storage Tank Capital Financing Assistance Pgm 2019-21 (30000702)Reappropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .(($10,645,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,645,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,855,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($12,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,500,000Sec. 6067. 2025 c 414 s 6495 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM2023-25 Heating Oil Capital Financing Assistance Program (40000003)Reappropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .(($7,465,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,465,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$535,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($8,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,000,000Sec. 6068. 2025 c 414 s 6496 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAMUnderground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm 2017-19 (92000001)Reappropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .(($7,883,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,883,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,817,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($12,700,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,700,000Sec. 6069. 2025 c 414 s 6499 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONLake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($240,000))Â Â Â Â Â $206,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,076,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($2,316,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,282,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6070. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONPreservation Minor Works 2019-21 (40000151)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$216,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,176,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,392,000Sec. 6071. 2025 c 414 s 6514 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONFort Worden Geothermal Heating (40000457)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($1,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $902,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $98,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000Sec. 6072. 2025 c 414 s 6521 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION2023-25 State Parks Capital Projects Pool (92001128)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section ((3054, chapter 474, Laws of 2023))7012 of this act.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($975,000))Â Â Â Â Â $657,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$19,519,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($20,494,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,176,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($4,429,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,747,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$24,923,000Sec. 6073. 2025 c 414 s 6526 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2017-19 Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000409)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3034, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Farm and Forest AccountâState. . . .(($3,829,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,809,000Habitat Conservation AccountâState. . . .(($4,889,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,330,000Outdoor Recreation AccountâState. . . .(($3,529,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,956,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($12,247,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,095,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($67,753,000))Â Â Â Â Â $68,905,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$80,000,000Sec. 6074. 2025 c 414 s 6542 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000009)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,240,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,624,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($44,267,000))Â Â Â Â Â $43,883,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$49,507,000Sec. 6075. 2025 c 414 s 6544 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (40000011)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3208, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($567,000))Â Â Â Â Â $649,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($11,519,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,437,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,086,000Sec. 6076. 2025 c 414 s 6553 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000027)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3217, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($4,376,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,695,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($6,851,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,532,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,227,000Sec. 6077. 2025 c 414 s 6564 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Washington Wildlife Recreation Program (40000053)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3018, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Farm and Forest AccountâState. . . .(($8,592,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,635,000Habitat Conservation AccountâState. . . .(($49,418,000))Â Â Â Â Â $44,585,000Outdoor Recreation AccountâState. . . .(($41,600,000))Â Â Â Â Â $38,023,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($99,610,000))Â Â Â Â Â $91,243,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($20,390,000))Â Â Â Â Â $28,757,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$120,000,000Sec. 6078. 2025 c 414 s 6565 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Salmon Recovery Funding Board Grant Programs (40000054)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$67,466,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($25,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,615,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$14,976,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($107,442,000))Â Â Â Â Â $106,057,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($12,558,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,943,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$120,000,000Sec. 6079. 2025 c 414 s 6572 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000061)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3063, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($10,115,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,008,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($27,812,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,489,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($37,927,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,497,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($21,238,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,668,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$59,165,000Sec. 6080. 2025 c 414 s 6573 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000062)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3016, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($11,110,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,028,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,654,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($20,764,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,682,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($4,655,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,737,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,419,000Sec. 6081. 2025 c 414 s 6574 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Washington Coastal Restoration and Resiliency Initiative (40000063)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3014, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($7,928,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,852,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,704,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($15,632,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,556,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,430,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,506,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$18,062,000Sec. 6082. 2025 c 414 s 6575 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000064)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3015, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($36,487,000))Â Â Â Â Â $35,298,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$21,023,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($57,510,000))Â Â Â Â Â $56,321,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($13,095,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,284,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$70,605,000Sec. 6083. 2025 c 414 s 6579 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000068)Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($5,093,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,372,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,687,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,408,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,780,000Sec. 6084. 2025 c 414 s 6588 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICESalmon Recovery Funding Board: Riparian Grant Program (91001679)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3074, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($24,854,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,496,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($146,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,504,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000Sec. 6085. 2025 c 414 s 6609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSIONRiparian Restoration with Landowners (91000020)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7056, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($21,938,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,258,000Salmon Recovery AccountâState. . . .$1,294,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($23,232,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,552,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($11,768,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,448,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$35,000,000Sec. 6086. 2025 c 414 s 6673 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESDrought Resilience Infrastructure Investments (40000411)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3031, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $486,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$247,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($747,000))Â Â Â Â Â $733,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($3,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$750,000Sec. 6087. 2025 c 414 s 6674 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESRecreational Target Shooting Pilot Sites (40000413)Reappropriation:Firearms Range AccountâState. . . .(($900,000))Â Â Â Â Â $654,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$900,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($1,800,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,554,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($1,800,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,554,000Sec. 6088. 2025 c 414 s 6677 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESEncumbered Lands - Acquisition (91000323)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3034, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($15,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $14,500,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000Sec. 6089. 2025 c 414 s 6680 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESWildfire Reforestation Grants (92000063)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3035, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($8,971,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,756,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($1,029,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,244,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000Sec. 6090. 2025 c 414 s 6664 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2023-25 Minor Works Preservation (40000154)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .(($433,000))Â Â Â Â Â $103,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,180,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($4,613,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,283,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,430,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($6,043,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,713,000Sec. 6091. 2025 c 414 s 6681 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREAgricultural Carbon Storage and Sequestration (40000001)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3038, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($5,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,318,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $2,682,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6092. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESSouth Seattle: Automotive Technology Renovation and Expansion (30000988)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$484,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,393,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,877,000Sec. 6093. 2025 c 414 s 6688 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESShoreline: Allied Health, Science & Manufacturing Replacement (30000990)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($893,000))Â Â Â Â Â $901,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($46,547,000))Â Â Â Â Â $46,539,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$47,440,000Sec. 6094. 2025 c 414 s 6693 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESSpokane: Apprenticeship Center (40000107)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($2,995,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,996,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($373,000))Â Â Â Â Â $372,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,368,000Sec. 6095. 2025 c 414 s 6709 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works - Infrastructure Replacement (23-25) (40000721)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5033, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Community and Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$1,397,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($4,130,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,266,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($5,527,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,663,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($34,773,000))Â Â Â Â Â $34,637,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,300,000Sec. 6096. 2025 c 414 s 6711 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESCBPS SBCTC Statewide: Utility Submeters for Clean Buildings Act (40000878)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($7,822,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,188,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($722,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,356,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,544,000Sec. 6097. 2025 c 414 s 6712 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESCTC Energy Efficiency Program (40000880)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5036, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($2,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,958,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $42,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000Sec. 6098. 2025 c 414 s 6714 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESHB 1390 - District Energy Systems (91000443)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($907,000))Â Â Â Â Â $367,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $540,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$907,000Sec. 6099. 2025 c 414 s 6042 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Public Works Assistance Account (PWAA) (40000289)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Public utility district no. 1 of Wahkiakum county is authorized to construct the Skamokawa mainline extension project utilizing the provisions of RCW 54.04.070.Reappropriation:Public Works Assistance AccountâState. . . .$360,204,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$39,796,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$400,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6100. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) 2025 c 414 s 6152 (uncodified);(2) 2025 c 414 s 6175 (uncodified);(3) 2025 c 414 s 6238 (uncodified);(4) 2025 c 414 s 6353 (uncodified);(5) 2025 c 414 s 6505 (uncodified); and(6) 2025 c 414 s 6617 (uncodified).(End of part)PART 7SUBPART A: SUPPLEMENTALSec. 7001. 2025 c 414 s 7009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Behavioral Health Capacity Grants (40000114)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 356, Laws of 2020, except as provided for under subsections (2) ((and)), (3), and (4) of this section.(2) $1,960,000 of the appropriation for the Lummi Nation and $1,960,000 of the funding for the Comprehensive Walla Walla project ((has))have been moved to section 1009 of this act.(3) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Issaquah Opportunity Center (Issaquah) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section.(4) $150,000 of the capital community assistance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Detox/Inpatient SUD Building (Centralia) project.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$150,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$28,999,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$29,149,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$90,232,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($119,231,000))Â Â Â Â Â $119,381,000Sec. 7002. 2025 c 414 s 7010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2020 Local and Community Projects (40000116)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6007, chapter 332, Laws of 2021, except that:(1) The funding provided in this section may not be directed to the Arivva Community Center;(2) The Main Street Redevelopment Project appropriation level is reduced from $985,000 to $865,000;(3) $120,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for the Steilacoom Cultural Center;(4) $200,000 of the $2,000,000 reappropriation for the Lake City Community Center Replacement (Seattle) project must be used to facilitate community engagement and a community needs assessment to inform design of the redevelopment of the Lake City Community Center;(5) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Seattle Goodwill (Seattle) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section; ((and))(6) $78,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Hoh Tribe Broadband (Grays Harbor) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section;(7) The George Davis Creek Fish Passage (Sammamish) project is renamed the George Davis Creek Fish Passage - Revised project; and(8) The Outdoors for All (Seattle) project is renamed the Outdoors for All - Revised project.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$48,454,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$115,775,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$164,229,000Sec. 7003. 2025 c 414 s 7012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2022 Local & Community Projects (40000230)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7012 of this act, except that:(a) $2,000,000 of the reappropriation is for the Tiny House Villages (Seattle) project, and not the Tiny House Villages and Cottages (Seattle) project; ((and))(b) $206,000 of the reappropriation is for the Renton ((Housing Repair Assistance Program (Renton)))Resource Center project, and not the 300 Rainier Ave Building (Renton) project;(c) The Peter Kirk Community Center Roof and Retrofitted Emerg (Kirkland) project is renamed the Peter Kirk Community Center - Revised;(d) The SE 168th St. Bike Lanes/Safe Crossings (Renton) project is renamed Renton Street Safety; and(e) The Stonehenge Memorial Public Restroom Project (Maryhill) is renamed Maryhill Museum Repair.(2) The department must reimburse the city of Chelan for its expenditures for the Chelan municipal airport extension project. The amount of the reimbursement to the city of Chelan under this section may not exceed the amount appropriated for the Chelan municipal airport extension project in section 1022, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.(3) $1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is for the remaining costs of the Chelan municipal airport extension project.(4) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Port of Olympia Marine Center (Olympia) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section.(5) $38,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Communications Tower (Ocean Shores) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section.(6) $155,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Trails End Community Meeting Space (Tumwater) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$117,245,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$51,879,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$170,124,000Sec. 7004. 2025 c 414 s 7013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023 Local and Community Projects (40000266)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7007 of this act, except that:(1) $273,000 of the reappropriation is for the City of Arlington Jensen Park Improvements (Arlington) project, and not the Senior Resources Svc HUB Feasibility Study (Freeland) project;(2) No funding may be directed to the Allyn Community Center;(3) $1,200,000 of the appropriation is for the Camp Boucher Civil Air Patrol Building Refurbishment, and not the Civil Air Patrol Hanger (Ephrata) project;(4) The Newman Lake Milfoil Wash Station (Newman Lake) project is renamed the Newman Lake Oxygenation System project; ((and))(5) $200,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Craft Beverage (Tumwater) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section;(6) $1,200,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Camp Boucher Civil Air Patrol Building Refurbishment project shall lapse on the effective date of this section;(7) The Willows Road Pedestrian Safety Connection (Kirkland) is renamed Road Pedestrian Safety Connections â Revised.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$309,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$46,601,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$46,910,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,017,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$51,927,000Sec. 7005. 2025 c 414 s 7020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Housing Trust Fund (40000295)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $180,663,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the new construction, acquisition, or rehabilitation of affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations including, but not limited to, people with chronic mental illness or behavioral health conditions, farmworkers, people who are homeless, and people in need of permanent supportive housing. The department shall strive to invest at least 20 percent of the appropriation provided under this subsection with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity.(2) $35,500,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation and $8,500,000 of the Washington housing trust fund accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income people with developmental or intellectual disabilities. The department must use a separate application form and evaluation criteria for applications under this subsection. The department must coordinate with the department of social and health services regarding any needed supportive services and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the housing needs study for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as provided in section 1068(6), chapter 332, Laws of 2021.(3) $92,785,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the apple health and homes rapid permanent supportive housing program created in chapter 216, Laws of 2022. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,000,000 is provided solely for the St. Agnes Haven project in Spokane.(4) $46,680,000 of the state building construction accountâstate and $13,320,000 of the state taxable construction accountâstate appropriations are provided solely for awards to organizations eligible under RCW 43.185A.040 for the development of homeownership projects affordable to first-time low-income households throughout the state. Projects serving homebuyers whose income is up to 80 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply, except that projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department, serving homebuyers whose income is up to 100 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, down payment assistance, closing costs, acquisition, rehabilitation costs, and new construction. Eligible organizations may include those that plan to provide housing to socially disadvantaged communities as defined in 13 C.F.R. Sec. 124.103. The department shall strive to invest at least 50 percent of these funds with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity, and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the homeownership disparities work group created in section 128(100), chapter 297, Laws of 2022. Of the amount provided in this subsection:(a) $1,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Boulevard Townhomes project; and(b) $248,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Crail Cottages - Revised project.(5) $25,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for affordable housing preservation projects, which may include, but are not limited to:(a) Projects preserving and extending the affordability commitment period for projects in the housing trust fund portfolio. The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment be provided prior to contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. When allocating funds, the department must prioritize buildings that are older than 15 years and that serve very low-income and extremely low-income populations.(b) Projects preserving affordable multifamily housing at risk of losing its affordability due to expiration of use restrictions that otherwise require affordability including, but not limited to, United States department of agriculture funded multifamily housing. The department must prioritize projects that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of Washington's affordable multifamily housing stock, particularly in rural areas of the state. Funds may be used for acquisition or for acquisition and rehabilitation of properties to preserve the affordable housing units beyond their existing use restrictions and keep them in Washington's housing portfolio for a minimum of 40 years. If a capital needs assessment is required, the department must work with the applicant to ensure that this does not create an unnecessary impediment to rapidly accessing these funds.(c) The funding provided under this subsection (5) is not subject to the 90-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050.(d) The amount awarded under this subsection (5) may not be calculated in award limitations for other housing trust fund awards.(6) $14,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants for the acquisition and preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities. Funding provided under this subsection may be used to acquire mobile or manufactured home communities for the purpose of avoiding household displacement due to sale or other transactions and ensuring preservation of housing affordability for low-income households for a minimum of 40 years.(7) $7,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for capital improvements to mobile home or manufactured home communities and includes the following:(a) $5,500,000 is provided solely for a grant to the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants to organizations that are "mobile home park cooperatives" or "manufactured housing cooperatives" under RCW 59.20.030 for completing capital improvement processes. Subgrants provided under this subsection may be used solely for critical improvements, repairs, and infrastructure upgrades to promote the preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities as affordable housing. The grantee must award subgrants based on needs relating to health, safety, and cost; and(b) $1,500,000 is provided solely for the Alpine Ridge Utility Upgrades project.(8)(a) (($78,091,000))$74,091,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:((African Diaspora Cultural Anchor Village (SeaTac). . . .$4,000,000))Bringing It Home II 24-Hour Domestic Violence Shelter. . . .$8,720,000Broadway Senior Housing. . . .$1,000,000Casa MiA: Supporting Housing for Survivors. . . .$1,030,000Cedar House. . . .$112,000CoLead ((Northgate project in)) Seattle. . . .$7,215,000Generations Place Workforce Housing. . . .$1,600,000Gravelly Lake Commons at LASA (Lakewood). . . .$500,000KCR Mills Crossing Affordable Housing. . . .$2,000,000Leavenworth Affordable Workforce Rental Housing(Leavenworth). . . . $2,300,000Lewis County Homeless Shelter (Chehalis). . . .$2,500,000Lincoln District Family Housing (Tacoma). . . .$5,050,000Mary's Place Shelter Replacement (Burien). . . .$6,000,000Mount Baker Housing Association Trenton Apartments. . . .$500,000Mount Zion Housing (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000Multicultural Village Design (Kent). . . .$550,000New Hope Family Housing (Seattle). . . .$325,000Peninsula Community Health Housing (Bremerton). . . .$412,000PHPDA Intergenerational Housing. . . .$5,000,000Raymond Manor Low-Income Senior Housing. . . .$1,500,000Redmond Supportive Housing. . . .$3,200,000Saint Vincent de Paul. . . .$1,000,000Shiloh Baptist Church New Life Housing (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000Skyway Affordable Housing (Skyway). . . .$3,000,000Sky Valley Youth Center. . . .$1,153,000Tacoma/Pierce County Habitat Affordable Housing(Pierce County). . . .$14,000,000The House of Bethlehem. . . .$424,000West Klickitat Assisted Living Facility. . . .$3,000,000(b) $6,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the following project:Habitat for Humanity (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000(9) $20,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for eligible organizations defined under RCW 43.185A.040 to acquire, renovate, and prepare real property for rapid conversion into enhanced emergency shelters, permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, permanent housing, youth housing, tiny homes, or shelter for extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, unaccompanied youth, and young people experiencing sheltered and unsheltered homelessness. Acquisitions completed with temporary financing are eligible for funding provided in this section. The department may only approve funding for projects that result in increased shelter or housing capacity.(a) Acquisition of multifamily housing is a priority, and the department shall prioritize housing projects that rapidly move people experiencing unsheltered homelessness into housing, including, but not limited to, individuals living in unsanctioned encampments, the public rights-of-way, or other public spaces.(b) Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating or maintenance costs, supportive services, or debt service.(c) Awards made to tiny homes under this subsection (9) may be made to noncode compliant structures and may be exempted from the 40-year affordability requirement under RCW 43.185A.060.(10) $5,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for affordable housing urgent repair grants to be provided on an ongoing basis. Funding is not subject to the 60-day notification requirement in RCW 43.185A.150. The funding may be provided to address nonreoccurring repair projects including repair of units or buildings, abatement of potentially hazardous materials, and safety-related structural improvements of affordable housing. Each repair grant award may not exceed $200,000 per award. However, the department may not limit the number of awards or amount received per organization.(a) For purposes of this subsection (10), "affordable housing" means:(i) Permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030; and(ii) Multifamily affordable housing projects in the housing trust fund portfolio.(b) If the department receives application requests that exceed the appropriation level in this subsection (10), the department must prioritize projects under (a)(i) of this subsection.(11) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).(12) The department shall strive to allocate at least 30 percent of the funds provided in this section to projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department.(13) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to other affordable housing projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$103,680,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($420,359,000))Â Â Â Â Â $416,359,000Washington Housing Trust AccountâState. . . .$8,500,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($532,539,000))Â Â Â Â Â $528,539,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,076,156,000TOTAL. . . .(($2,608,695,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,604,695,000Sec. 7006. 2025 c 414 s 7015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (40000299)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the department to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment or preservation of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased behavioral health capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.(2) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical availability of behavioral health services in their region;(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained for involuntary commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW;(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a 10-year period;(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;(h) A financial plan demonstrating the applicant's ability to maintain and operate the facility; and(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.(3) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and to allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.(5)(a) $29,443,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants to address regional needs. Applicants must provide confirmation that the health care authority, department of social and health services, or a managed care organization plans to contract with the facility sufficient to cover the facility's operating costs. The department must give priority to facilities that:(i) Serve individuals on 90-day or 180-day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals; (ii) Serve individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;(iii) Provide secure withdrawal management and stabilization treatment beds; or(iv) Provide substance use disorder treatment.(b) In awarding this funding to projects under (a)(i) of this subsection (5), the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the health care authority;(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the health care authority that it is able to meet the applicable licensing and certification requirements for the facility that will be used to provide services; and(v) The health care authority has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes.(c) $24,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to intensive behavioral health treatment facilities for long-term placement of behavioral health patients with complex needs and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases.(d) $18,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for youth crisis walk-in intervention, substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, children with behavioral health and intellectual or developmental disability needs, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors in facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions. Consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with behavioral health or social isolation issues.(e) $4,250,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase opioid treatment program services and access.(6) The amounts provided in this subsection are subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section, except the projects are not required to establish new capacity:(a) $7,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to community providers to prevent the closure of existing behavioral health facilities. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the department must implement necessary procedures to enable rapid commitment of funds on a first-come, first-served basis to qualifying project proposals that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of behavioral health facilities.(b) $179,576,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Aristo Healthcare Services (Renton). . . .$2,000,000Center for Alcohol & Drug Treatment New Facility(Wenatchee). . . .$19,600,000Chehalis Wellness Center Renovation. . . .$3,000,000Columbia River Mental Health Services Clinic. . . .$600,000Columbia Valley Center for Recovery. . . .$6,500,000Colville Tribes Detox Facility Feasibility Study. . . .$500,000Compass Health Broadway Behavioral HealthServices (Everett). . . .$18,700,000CRMHS Satellite Building Project (Vancouver). . . .$2,500,000Evergreen Treatment Services (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000Holman Recovery Center Freedom Bridge. . . .$1,900,000Ituha Stabilization Facility Bed Increase. . . .$93,000Jamestown S'Klallam Behavioral Health Center(Sequim). . . . $28,000,000Kalispel Tribe Camas Health Inpatient TreatmentCenter. . . .$5,000,000Kitsap Mental Health Services Bremerton CampusExpansion. . . .$773,000Lynnwood Community Recovery Center (Lynnwood). . . .$2,750,000Muckleshoot We Care Daily. . . .$3,500,000Nisqually Tribe Healing Village (Olympia). . . .$12,000,000Opioid Recovery and Care Access. . . .$3,500,000Quinault Indian Nation Wellness Center Expansion. . . .$7,800,000SeaMar Youth Crisis Center (Seattle). . . .$480,000Seven Nations Healing Lodge Youth Expansion. . . .$2,000,000SHC Medical Center - Astria/Toppenish Hospital(Toppenish). . . .$2,500,000SIHB Thunderbird Treatment Center (Vashon). . . .$1,030,000Skagit County Crisis Stabilization Center. . . .$12,950,000Snoqualmie Tribe Behavioral Health. . . .$100,000Spokane Treatment and Recovery Service (Spokane). . . .$4,000,000Substance Use Disorder & Mental Health InpatientTreatment (Yakima). . . .$11,750,000Suquamish On-Reservation Health Service Center. . . .$4,500,000Triumph SUD & Mental Health Treatment. . . .$2,500,000Whatcom ((23-Hour Crisis Relief Center))County Behavioral Health (Bellingham). . . . $11,350,000Yakama Nation Detox Center. . . .$900,000Yakima Drop-in Center. . . .$800,000(c) $22,107,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and $1,250,000 of the capital community assistance accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for design and construction of the Lummi Nation Substance Abuse Treatment project. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.130, the department may enter into a multibiennium contract with Lummi Nation for the design and construction of the project. Nothing in this section authorizes the department to make an expenditure without an appropriation.(7)(a) $10,002,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and $4,998,000 of the capital community assistance accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for the purchase of the former Daybreak Youth Services building located in Clark County, Washington. Title of the property must be held in the name of the state under the custody and control of the department of enterprise services.(b) The department, with the assistance of the department of enterprise services, shall facilitate a lease agreement with Madrona Recovery Center, Inc. (Madrona) for a term of no less than 10 years, at a lease cost of $1 per year. As a condition of the lease, the department shall obtain commitments and acknowledgments from Madrona as follows:(i) The building will be operated for the purpose of providing substance use disorder treatment and other behavioral health treatment services to children and minor youth throughout the term of the lease;(ii) Madrona is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements necessary to operate the facility;(iii) Madrona commits to prioritizing services for persons who are publicly funded and are residents of the state of Washington;(iv) Madrona has provided a detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds at the facility;(v) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project, with an anticipated opening date of the facility that is no more than 12 months from commencement of the lease; and(vi) Madrona has submitted a financial plan demonstrating its ability to maintain and operate the facility, including confirmation that the health care authority, department of social and health services, or a managed care organization plans to contract with the facility sufficient to cover the facility's operating costs.(c) $1,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely to Madrona for the purpose of tenant improvements necessary to operate the building for the purposes outlined in (b) of this subsection. The department must inform Madrona of its obligation to pay prevailing wage in completing tenant improvements financed by the state. Subsequent maintenance and repairs during the term of the lease are the responsibility of Madrona.(d) $200,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with this project.(8) The department shall notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.(9) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.(10) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts provided in this section in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, if upon review of applications, the department determines, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, that there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funding to other project categories listed in this section, prioritizing projects that support serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals. Underserved areas of the state may also be considered.(11) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that the grantee or successor hold the capital improvements for at least a 10-year period. The provisions must require the facility to be used for behavioral health services, but may allow the facility to change ownership or facility type during the commitment period. The department shall monitor the activities of recipients of grants under this program to determine compliance with the terms and conditions set forth in its contract.(12) The department must provide a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2024. The report must include:(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date;(c) A statewide map of new capacity since 2018, including projected bed capacity and opening dates;(d) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date the facility began providing services; and(e) Recommendations for statutory language that would codify the grant program on an ongoing basis including:(i) Evaluation and prioritization criteria;(ii) Monitoring and compliance requirements;(iii) Preconstruction and technical assistance services; and(iv) Data needed to determine the service needs by area of the state.(13) The department must coordinate with the health care authority to submit capital budget requests to fund behavioral health community capacity grants for the 2025-2027 biennial budget by the due date established by the office of financial management. Associated state budget operating costs must also be identified and requested.Appropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$6,248,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$296,078,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$302,326,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,174,904,000TOTAL. . . .$1,477,230,000Sec. 7007. 2025 c 414 s 7022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2024 Local and Community Projects (40000301)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.(8) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:57th Ave Sewer Project (University Place). . . .$200,000ACT Historic Landmark Roof Restoration (Seattle). . . .$539,000ADA For Northwest Center Janitorial (SpokaneValley). . . .$20,000Admiral Theatre Facility Improvements (Bremerton). . . .$165,000Affordable Housing Land Acquisition (Tacoma). . . .$1,500,000Afterschool Program Expansion (Walla Walla). . . .$45,000Agricultural Innovation Center (Pasco). . . .$200,000Airlift Northwest Hangar(East Wenatchee). . . .$1,700,000Airway Heights Public Safety (Airway Heights). . . .$1,340,000Algona Wetland Preserve Interpretive Trail(Algona). . . .$600,000American Indian Community Center (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000American Legion Post 79 Roof Replacement(Snoqualmie). . . .$49,000Anderson Island Multipurpose Building (AndersonIsland). . . .$258,000Angleside Reservoir Capacity Upgrades (Shelton). . . .$1,850,000Arlington Commercial Kitchen (Arlington). . . .$581,000ARTE NOIR Capital Construction Completion(Seattle). . . .$381,000Asbestos Abatement Old City Hall (Benton City). . . .$309,000Ashley House (Spokane). . . .$515,000Ashley House (Tacoma). . . .$500,000Asia Pacific Cultural Center (Tacoma). . . .$2,000,000ASUW Shell House (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000Athletic Field Lights For Ridgefield Outdoor(Ridgefield). . . .$250,000Auburn Avenue Theater Rebuild (Auburn). . . .$1,545,000Avista Stadium Improvements (Spokane Valley). . . .$543,000B5 Community Learning Center (Kennewick). . . .$773,000Ball Field at Historic Petes (Enumclaw). . . .$439,000Ballard Boys & Girls Clubs Flooring Replacement(Seattle). . . .$49,000Behavioral Health Wellbeing Clinic (Spokane). . . .$1,571,000Bonney Lake Senior Center Rehab Project (BonneyLake). . . .$650,000Boys & Girls Club Parking Lot Renovation (FederalWay). . . .$168,000Boys & Girls Club Seismic Upgrade & RoofReplacement (Vancouver). . . .$412,000Brewster Boys and Girls Club Facility (Brewster). . . .$300,000Bridge Meadows Pre-Development (Tacoma). . . .$515,000Bringing It Home II 24-Hour Domestic ViolenceShelter (Yakima). . . .$125,000Browse Infrastructure (Seattle). . . .$144,000Camp Thunderbird Wastewater Treatment Facility(Olympia). . . .$618,000Cannery Parking Lot & Sidewalk Rehab (Anacortes). . . .$110,000Capitol Land Trust Public Access Preconstruction(Olympia). . . .$77,000Cathlamet Waterfront Park (Cathlamet). . . .$86,000Cedarwood Community Recreation ((Ctr))CenterRedevelopment (((Lake Stevens)))- Revised. . . .$1,123,000Celebration Park Synthetic Turf Upgrade (FederalWay). . . .$822,000Center Senior Living Housing Development (GrandCoulee). . . .$361,000Central Colville Apartments (Colville). . . .$52,000Central Whidbey Fire & Rescue Station 53(Coupeville). . . .$2,750,000Centralia Quad Infield Turf Project (Centralia). . . .$2,480,000Chehalis River Raw Water (Chehalis). . . .$250,000Chelan Butte Acquisition Feasibility Study(Chelan). . . .$125,000Children's Therapy Center (University Place). . . .$500,000Chinese Reconciliation Project Design (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000City Hall Structural Assessment (Toledo). . . .$53,000City of Longview Mint Valley Golf CourseIrrigation Replacement (Longview). . . .$2,000,000City of Othello Lions Park (Othello). . . .$600,000City of Selah Wastewater Treatment PlantImprovements (Selah). . . .$1,442,000City of Sequim Park Acquisition (Sequim). . . .$375,000Clallam Joint Public Safety Facility (PortAngeles). . . .$5,750,000Cloney Inclusive Playground (Longview). . . .$1,000,000Colfax Community Center (Colfax). . . .$72,000Colfax Pool (Colfax). . . .$1,030,000Columbia Grove Community Playground (EastWenatchee). . . .$72,000Columbia Play Project Children's Museum(Vancouver). . . .$515,000Commercial Pumpouts to Save Puget Sound(Anacortes). . . .$800,000Communications Devices for Officials (Olympia). . . .$15,000Community Center at Lake Chelan (Chelan). . . .$1,723,000Community Center Roof Replacement (Aberdeen). . . .$165,000Community Homes Renovations 41st LD (Bellevue). . . .$106,000Community Homes Renovations 45th LD (Woodinville). . . .$77,000Community Homes Renovations 48th LD (Bellevue). . . .$243,000Community Homes Upgrades 1st LD (Bothell). . . .$104,000Conconully Service Complex/Fire Hall (Conconully). . . .$2,050,000Coupeville Food Bank & Workforce HousingApartments (Coupeville). . . .$230,000Cross Kirkland Corridor 132nd Avenue NEImprovements (Kirkland). . . .$515,000Day Island Bridge Design Project (UniversityPlace). . . .$200,000Des Moines Marina Steps (Des Moines). . . .$1,000,000deWilde Rugby Fields (Ferndale). . . .$150,000Diking District 7 Fish Passage and Levee(Stanwood). . . .$1,900,000Dishman Hills Conservancy Education Ctr SitePlanning (Spokane). . . .$46,000Double Culvert Replacement (Castle Rock). . . .$2,000,000Downtown Pasco North Plaza (Pasco). . . .$155,000Eagle Track Raceway Stadium Light Project(Republic). . . .$117,000East Hill North Community Park Phase 1 (Kent). . . .$1,000,000Eaton Urban Pathway Project (Battle Ground). . . .$1,000,000Ebey Waterfront Trail Phase 4 (Marysville). . . .$1,030,000Edmonds Boys & Girls Clubs Capital Project(Edmonds). . . .$1,385,000Edmonds Center for the Arts Design (Edmonds). . . .$200,000Ejidos Community Farm (Everson). . . .$824,000El Centro de la Raza Federal Way Campus (FederalWay). . . .$1,545,000Electron Way & Contra Costa Ave IntersectionImprovemt (Fircrest). . . .$153,000Ellensburg Rodeo Grandstands (Ellensburg). . . .$1,030,000Emergency Operation Generator (Coupeville). . . .$386,000Emergency Shelter Capital Improvements (Shelton). . . .$103,000Enumclaw Community Center (Enumclaw). . . .$500,000Evans Creek Relocation Project (Redmond). . . .$1,030,000EWAM Handicap Parking Improvement Project(Pomeroy). . . .$98,000Fair Building Improvements (Graham). . . .$77,000Fall City Business District Septic Project (FallCity). . . .$1,550,000Family Resource Center at Cedar Crossing (Seattle). . . .$360,000Felts Field Gateway Improvement (Spokane). . . .$515,000Ferndale Civic and Community Organization Campus(Ferndale). . . .$3,050,000Ferry County Fairgrounds (Republic). . . .$50,000Fife Aquatic & Community Center Improvements(Fife). . . .$1,500,000Fire Panel Replacement & Integration (Seattle). . . .$294,000FISH Food Bank Expansion (Ellensburg). . . .$573,000Foothills Trail Crossing at Main Street (Buckley). . . .$128,000Forest Park Pickleball Court Installation(Everett). . . .$345,000Free Clinic & Central Construction Project (WallaWalla). . . .$515,000Frontier Park Horse Cover (Graham). . . .$1,388,000Ft Steilacoom Park Nisqually Indian TribeImprovements (Lakewood). . . .$309,000Gibson Hall Improvement Project (Issaquah). . . .$206,000Glen Tana (Spokane). . . .$3,000,000Golden Tiger Multi-Use Trail Phase 2 (Republic). . . .$168,000Goldendale Municipal Airport - Land Acquisition(Goldendale). . . .$361,000Greater Wenatchee Irrigation Dist Infrastructure(East Wenatchee). . . .$2,000,000Greenwood Early Learning Playground (Seattle). . . .$69,000Greg Cuoio Park Accessibility Improvements (Lacey). . . .$515,000Harbour Point Boulevard Pathway (Mukilteo). . . .$258,000Harlequin Theater Renovation (Olympia). . . .$700,000Heritage Center at Meeker Mansion (Puyallup). . . .$496,000Heritage Heights Remodel and Conversion to MedicalCare (Chelan). . . .$824,000High Prairie Fire District 14 EmergencyPreparedness (Lyle). . . .$248,000Highland Park Improvement Club Rebuild (Seattle). . . .$500,000Historic Lamar Cabin Preservation (Prescott). . . .$267,000HUB Sports Fields (Liberty Lake). . . .$1,030,000ICOM 911 Microwave Radio Broadband System. . . .$500,000Indian American Community Services CommunityCenter (Kent). . . .$794,000Interurban Trail War Memorials (Pacific). . . .$400,000Issaquah Senior Ctr Veterans Memorial ConsolidatedPrk (Issaquah). . . .$721,000Japanese American Exclusion Memorial Vis Ctr(Bainbridge Island). . . .$350,000Jarstad Aquatic Center Assessment & Roof Repair(Bremerton). . . .$309,000Jenkins Creek Recreation Trail (Covington). . . .$250,000Kalama Creek Hatchery Renovation (Olympia). . . .$3,350,000KCFD #50 Generator (Baring). . . .$20,000Kelso School District-Construction & RenovationProjects (Kelso). . . .$165,000Kelso Train Station Roof Replacement (Kelso). . . .$575,000Kennewick Kiwanis Playground (Kennewick). . . .$258,000King County Sheriff's Office Air Support Unit(Seattle). . . .$1,000,000King Street Station Creative Youth Empowerment Hub(Seattle). . . .$500,000Kirkland Boys & Girls Clubs Community Playfield(Kirkland). . . .$150,000Kirkland Performance Center Safety Improvements(Kirkland). . . .$1,288,000Kitsap Humane Society Veterinary Lifesaving Center(Silverdale). . . .$412,000Klineline Bridge and ADA Improvements (Vancouver). . . .$1,365,000Kulshan View (Mount Vernon). . . .$309,000Lacamas Lake Water Improvements (Camas). . . .$515,000Lake Boren CrossTown Recreational Trail(Newcastle). . . .$824,000Lake Chelan Food Bank Building Remodel & Addition(Chelan). . . .$2,000,000Lake Hills Clubhouse Renovation (Bellevue). . . .$583,000Lake Wilderness Arboretum Improvements (MapleValley). . . .$450,000Lakebay Marina (Lakebay). . . .$300,000Lambert House Flood Abatement & FoundationReplacement (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000Larson Playfield Irrigation Conversion (MosesLake). . . .$258,000Latah Water System Rehabilitation Project (Latah). . . .$180,000Latino Community Service Center. . . .$515,000Lester Creek Personnel to Water Intake (Pe Ell). . . .$640,000Lewis County Senior Centers (Chehalis). . . .$500,000Lincoln County Fair and Livestock (Davenport). . . .$1,000,000Local Grain Conveyance & Storage System (Tumwater). . . .$255,000Logistics Facility (Vancouver). . . .$874,000Lynden Senior and Community Center (Lynden). . . .$309,000Lynnwood Neighborhood Center (Lynnwood). . . .$2,050,000Lyon Creek Culvert at SR 104 (Lake Forest Park). . . .$1,820,000Madison Street School Sidewalk Project (SouthBend). . . .$175,000Manson Fire Station - Training Room and LivingQuarters (Manson). . . .$206,000Marine Spills Operations Base (Friday Harbor). . . .$210,000Marshall Park Inclusive Community Playground(Vancouver). . . .$685,000Mason County Jail Expansion (Shelton). . . .$1,030,000Mason PUD 1 Vuecrest Water System Storage Project(Union). . . .$618,000Mason PUD Water Infrastructure (Matlock). . . .$1,000,000Masonic Building Roof Renovation (Centralia). . . .$170,000Mays Pond Playground (Bothell). . . .$650,000Medical Lake Storm Water Mitigation (Medical Lake). . . .$1,000,000Medically-Tailored Meals & Groceries Expansion(Seattle). . . .$1,175,000Memorial Stadium (Seattle). . . .$4,000,000Menastash Grange Revitalization and Expansion(Ellensburg). . . .$85,000Mental Health Quiet Room (Moses Lake). . . .$31,000Mill Creek City Hall North Renovation (Mill Creek). . . .$515,000Mill Creek Multiuse Recreational Property (MillCreek). . . .$1,030,000MLK Jr. Resource & Technology Center (Pasco). . . .$250,000MLK Jr.Park & Swimming Pool (Yakima). . . .$1,160,000Modernization of Pacific County Jail Facility(South Bend). . . .$464,000Monroe Therapeutic Facility (Monroe). . . .$1,100,000Montesano Economic Development (Montesano). . . .$700,000Mt. Spokane Ski & Snowboard Park (Mead). . . .$100,000Mukilteo First Responder Wellness Center(Mukilteo). . . .$258,000Muslim American Youth Foundation Center (Burien). . . .$500,000National Nordic Museum East Garden Capital Project(Seattle). . . .$258,000Nespelem Community Longhouse (Nespelem). . . .$1,850,000New Beginnings Homes (Puyallup). . . .$440,000No. County Rec. Association Youth Sports (CastleRock). . . .$256,000Nooksack Community Housing (Deming). . . .$470,000North Fork Skykomish River 911 Extension Project(Index). . . .$420,000North Seattle Boys & Girls Clubs FlooringReplacement (Seattle). . . .$134,000NW Stream Center Sustainable Infrastructure(Everett). . . .$273,000Oak Harbor Boys & Girls Club Sports Court (OakHarbor). . . .$250,000Oak Harbor ((Economic Development))MarinaImprovements (Oak Harbor). . . .$621,000ODT Land Purchase (((Port Townsend)))- Revised. . . .$750,000Old Fort Lake Subarea Remediation & Public AccessProj (DuPont). . . .$215,000Othello's Regional Water Plan (Othello). . . .$412,000Parkland School (Parkland). . . .$500,000Pasado's Safe Haven Water and Safety Upgrades(Monroe). . . .$485,000Pasco Boulevard Soccer Field (Pasco). . . .$750,000Pasco Clubhouse Safety Modernization (Pasco). . . .$840,000Peninsula Medical Respite & Housing Center(Bremerton). . . .$1,000,000Peninsula Senior Activity (Ocean Park). . . .$272,000PenMet Parks Community Recreation Center (GigHarbor). . . .$1,030,000Perfect Passage (Tonasket). . . .$730,000Pierce County Food Hub (Bonney Lake). . . .$300,000Pike Place Market Elevator & Stair Replacement(Seattle). . . .$515,000Plaza Retreat Space (Vashon). . . .$544,000Pond to Pines Infrastructure (Ellensburg). . . .$518,000Port Gamble Shoreline Restoration (Port Gamble). . . .$2,400,000Port of Allyn Public Pier Replacement (Allyn). . . .$515,000Port of Anacortes T-Dock Reconfiguration(Anacortes). . . .$1,000,000Port of Mattawa Event Center Phase 3 UpgradeProject (Mattawa). . . .$361,000Port of Skamania Cascades Business Park (NorthBonneville). . . .$1,000,000Port of Willapa Harbor (South Bend). . . .$800,000Port Orchard Breakwater Replacement (Port Orchard). . . .$1,000,000Port Remediation (Olympia). . . .$2,200,000Portland Avenue Park Sprayground (Tacoma). . . .$500,000Poulsbo Historical Society - Nilsen-Sonju House(Poulsbo). . . .$300,000Prosser City Entrance Sign (Prosser). . . .$110,000Public Works Facility & Vehicle Storage (SedroWoolley). . . .$500,000Puyallup Elks Roof Replacement (Puyallup). . . .$370,000Rainier Court Phase V (Seattle). . . .$750,000Raze Development Capital Project (Spokane). . . .$500,000Redondo Fishing Pier Replacement Phase 1 (DesMoines). . . .$1,000,000Refugee Welcoming & Healing Center (SeaTac). . . .$515,000Regional Athletic Complex Transformer Upgrade(Olympia). . . .$103,000Regional Water & Sewer UpgradesMason County. . . .$250,000Rejuvenation Community Day Center (Bremerton). . . .$200,000Remembrance Gallery (Puyallup). . . .$257,000Renovation and Addition to RP Theater Building(Richland). . . .$350,000Renton Public Square (Renton). . . .$1,485,000Republic Community Library (Republic). . . .$183,000Reservoir Capacity & Seismic (Battle Ground). . . .$1,288,000Ritzville Legion Hall Renovation (Ritzville). . . .$165,000Ritzville Rodeo Bleachers Replacement (Ritzville). . . .$194,000Ritzville Theater (Ritzville). . . .$75,000Rock Creek Horse Park (Ravensdale). . . .$206,000Roslyn Old City Hall Community Center (Roslyn). . . .$77,000Rotary Boys & Girls Clubs HVAC Replacement(Seattle). . . .$309,000Rotary Morrow Community Park (Poulsbo). . . .$100,000Roy Water Preliminary Design (Roy). . . .$250,000Sail Sand Point (Seattle). . . .$258,000Sam Chastain Trail (Renton). . . .$500,000School Based Health Care Facility (Tacoma). . . .$515,000Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex of Woodland(Woodland). . . .$350,000Scriber Place Housing for Homeless Students(Lynnwood). . . .$2,050,000Search & Rescue Headquarters Feasibility Study(Snoqualmie). . . .$103,000Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000Seattle Public Library Holds Pick-Up Locker(Seattle). . . .$93,000Seattle Public Theater Accessibility Upgrades(Seattle). . . .$77,000Security & Access Improvements (Shelton). . . .$250,000Sewer Pump Station 12 & Force Main (Bellevue). . . .$1,030,000Shelton Day Care & Building Project (Shelton). . . .$215,000Short's Farm Purchase (Chimacum). . . .$1,000,000Skagit PUD 10th District Waterlines (Skagit). . . .$650,000Skagit PUD 39th District Waterline Relocations(Mt. Vernon). . . .$600,000Skagit PUD Headquarters Public Meeting Room (Mt.Vernon). . . .$206,000Slavonian Hall (Tacoma). . . .$472,000Snohomish Boys & Girls Club Teen Center(Snohomish). . . .$412,000Snohomish Public Safety & City Services Campus(Snohomish). . . .$700,000Snoqualmie Indian Tribe Consultation(Snoqualmie). . . .$150,000Snoqualmie Valley Youth Center Barn with Storage(North Bend). . . .$232,000South Seattle Community Food Hub (Seattle). . . .$499,000South Thurston Fire & EMS New Fire Station(Tenino). . . .$3,050,000South UGA Water and Sewer Extensions (Kennewick). . . .$1,122,000South Whidbey Aquatic Wellness Center (Langley). . . .$360,000Southwest Boys & Girls Clubs Safety & SecurityImprove (Seattle). . . .$3,000SPARC Capital ((Campaign (Mount Vernon)))Grant- Revised. . . .$750,000Spokane Civic Theatre Facility (Spokane). . . .$1,500,000Spokane International Airport (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000Spokane Scale House Market (Spokane Valley). . . .$750,000Spring Box Replacement/Water (Concrete). . . .$450,000St. Mary Medical Center (Walla Walla). . . .$75,000Stanwood Art Center Design (Stanwood). . . .$327,000Stonerose Fossil Center (Republic). . . .$721,000Storm Upgrades Downtown Phase N2 (Puyallup). . . .$696,000Sue Bird and Lenny Wilkens Statues (Seattle). . . .$412,000Sultan Basin Park (Sultan). . . .$500,000Sumas Ave Water Pipe Replacement (Sumas). . . .$150,000SW WA Agricultural Business (Tenino). . . .$1,250,000Swede Hall Renovation Project (Rochester). . . .$198,000Take-A-Break Park Playground (Maple Valley). . . .$412,000Tam O'Shanter Multi-Purpose Court Fencing andLighting (Kelso). . . .$46,000Taproot Theatre Jewell Mainstage Renovation(Seattle). . . .$515,000Tasveer Art Center (Bellevue). . . .$258,000Tenino Stone Carvers Guild Workshop and Classroom(Tenino). . . .$160,000Terminal 4 Expansion & Redevelopment Project(Aberdeen). . . .$3,500,000Thun Field - Emergency Response and Meeting Space(Puyallup). . . .$1,000,000Town of Elmer City Fire Station Improvements(Elmer City). . . .$537,000Town of Index Water Line Repair and Replacement(Index). . . .$628,000Township Hall North & West (Spokane). . . .$100,000Tribal Cultural Center & Museum Restoration(Steilacoom). . . .$200,000Tugboat Parthia Pavilion Construction (Olympia). . . .$148,000Tukwila Community Center HVAC Replacement(Tukwila). . . .$515,000Tukwila Immigrant & Refugee Wadajir LandAcquisition (Tukwila). . . .$2,250,000Tulalip Creek Hatchery (Marysville). . . .$1,000,000United Way Elevator and Disability Access (Tacoma). . . .$129,000Van Zandt Community Hall Renovation (Deming). . . .$502,000Veterans Memorial Balfour Park (Spokane Valley). . . .$207,000VFW Post 2224 Critical Renovations (Puyallup). . . .$206,000Village Theatre's Francis J Gaudette HVACReplacement (Issaquah). . . .$489,000Wallace Heights Septic Elimination Program(Vancouver). . . .$500,000Washougal Civic Campus Project (Washougal). . . .$2,000,000Washtucna Town Hall (Washtucna). . . .$20,000Wastewater Lift Stations (Concrete). . . .$450,000Wastewater Treatment Facility & Loss Project(Carbonado). . . .$500,000Wastewater Treatment System Upgrades (Long Beach). . . .$340,000Waterfront Organic Soil Removal (Washougal). . . .$2,000,000Weld Seattle Reentry Resource Center (Seattle). . . .$5,000,000Wenatchee Valley Museum Expansion and Redesign(Wenatchee). . . .$1,000,000Wenatchee Valley YMCA (Wenatchee). . . .$1,030,000West Biddle Lake Dam Restoration (Vancouver). . . .$412,000Whatcom Ag Research Station (Lynden). . . .$764,000What-Comm Dispatch Center (Bellingham). . . .$1,000,000White Bluffs Rail/Rail Replacement (Richland). . . .$1,250,000White Center Community Hub (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000White Center Food Bank Renovation (Seattle). . . .$275,000Wilkeson Infrastructure (Wilkeson). . . .$824,000Windermere Park Playground (Longview). . . .$155,000WRF Upgrades Solid Side (Yelm). . . .$442,000Yakama Nation "Creator Law Sculpture" (Roslyn). . . .$99,000Yakima Co Fire Emergency Responder Radio System(Yakima). . . .$139,000Yakima County Fire District 12 Wildfire Response(Yakima). . . .$38,000Yakima County Meals on Wheels (Union Gap). . . .$1,000,000Yakima Trolley Museum (Yakima). . . .$25,000Youth Assist Program Skills Training Center(Tacoma). . . .$500,000Youth Emergency Shelter (Longview). . . .$250,000Zillah Park Renovation (Zillah). . . .$300,000(9) The model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Port of Vancouver Dock Demo and Removal of Creosote project in Vancouver.(10) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to the Lakebay Marina (Lakebay) project in this section.(11) The climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Port Gamble Shoreline Restoration (Port Gamble) project. . . .$2,400,000Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$3,500,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$2,400,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$228,543,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$234,443,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$916,800,000TOTAL. . . .$1,151,243,000Sec. 7008. 2025 c 414 s 7023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025 Local and Community Projects (40000614)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided for under subsection (14) in this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.(8) $58,162,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:192nd & Hemlock Public Engagement and Design Program. . . .$129,00023rd & Cherry Fellowship Hall RenovationPre-development. . . .$110,000Abu Bakr Youth Center Renovation. . . .$350,000Adams County Evidence Processing & Public SafetyImprovements. . . .$1,000,000African Business Innovation Center. . . .$25,000Alatheia Capacity Building Capital Project. . . .$150,000Aquatic Center At Martin Luther King Jr. Park. . . .$75,000Auburn Downtown Plaza Design/Development. . . .$258,000Bainbridge Island Senior/Community Center. . . .$100,000Battle Ground Health Care Clinic. . . .$400,000Battle Ground Senior Center. . . .$309,000Benaroya Hall Street Front Poster Boxes. . . .$200,000BIPOC Farm Fresh HUB. . . .$103,000Bremerton ((Mason County Sewer Expansion))Utility. . . .$3,000,000Buckley Foothills Trailhead Doc Tait Pavilion. . . .$52,000Buddhist Temple Arson Restoration. . . .$225,000California Creek Estuary Park Expansion. . . .$185,000Chamber of Commerce Historical Archive. . . .$38,000Charter Park Master Plan Bathroom. . . .$52,000Chelan County Hazard Mitigation. . . .$98,000Chimacum Grange Hall Roofing Replacement. . . .$26,000Chinese American Legacy Artwork Project. . . .$25,000City of Bonney Lake ADA Accessible Playground. . . .$151,000City of Lacey Regional Public Safety Training Center. . . .$50,000City of Mill Creek Veteran's Monument Expansion &Memorial. . . .$258,000City of Roy Water Infrastructure. . . .$300,000City of Sequim Park Acquisition. . . .$171,000CLC Childcare Fire Alarm System. . . .$77,000Coastal CAP Fire Remodel. . . .$515,000Columbia Grange #87 Safety Improvements. . . .$25,000Commercial Platform Lift. . . .$17,000Connections Mental Health. . . .$44,000Cougar Mountain Zoo Indoor Educational Exhibit Space. . . .$206,000Council for the Homeless Building Rehabilitation. . . .$200,000Coupeville Boy and Girls Club Pathway. . . .$36,000Crescent Grange Hall Urgent Roof Repairs. . . .$103,000Crosby Community Center Restoration. . . .$412,000Davenport Senior Center Capital Improvement. . . .$120,000Des Moines Marina Electrification. . . .$100,000District Distributed Antenna SystemInstallation - Revised. . . .$258,000Douglas Building HVAC Replacement. . . .$110,000Downtown Camas Lighting Transformation Project. . . .$300,000DV Shelter and Advocacy Center HVAC Upgrade. . . .$100,000Eatonville Community Track & Field Restrooms. . . .$300,000Edmonds BGC Capital Project. . . .$300,000Elevator Purchase and Installation. . . .$274,000Ellensburg Community Fieldhouse. . . .$72,000Emergency Communications Radio Microwave. . . .$235,000Engineering and Surveying of Essential Fire Recovery. . . .$300,000Eritrean Community Center Expansion. . . .$100,000Everest Park Facilities Update. . . .$300,000Everett Labor Temple Roof. . . .$500,000FACYV and APIC Building. . . .$103,000FareStart Job Training & Social Enterprise CapitalImprovements. . . .$300,000Fire Station 41 Headquarters. . . .$300,000Fire Station Restoration. . . .$314,000Firefighting PPE Decontamination CO2 DemonstrationProject. . . .$100,000Florence Robison North Park Equipment Replacement. . . .$173,000Foss Waterway Seaport Esplanade Connector. . . .$185,000Gage Academy of Art South Lake Union Building. . . .$100,000Garfield Super Block. . . .$3,000,000GCA Dignity Completion. . . .$112,000Glenwood Little League Facility Improvements. . . .$50,000Goldsborough Switching Station. . . .$52,000Goodwill Land Acquisition for Redevelopment. . . .$3,000,000Granger Community Electric Sign. . . .$31,000Granite Falls Boys & Girls Club. . . .$103,000Grant County Bleachers. . . .$258,000Green Waste Recycling at Point Roberts. . . .$94,000Idylwood Beach Park Accessibility Improvements. . . .$215,000Inclusive Playground at Cirque Park. . . .$258,000Institute for Black Justice. . . .$75,000Intergenerational Community and Expanded AquaticCenter. . . .$206,000Japanese American Exclusion Visitor Center - I. . . .$300,000Kalama Community Building Architectural Survey. . . .$62,000Kelso Rotary Park. . . .$72,000KidsQuest Children's Museum Stories of Water. . . .$350,000Kirkland BGC Upgrades and Expansion. . . .$128,000KVH Surgical Services Clinic Remodel. . . .$100,000La Center Wheel Club Community Center Remodel. . . .$250,000Lake Sacajawea Irrigation Pump. . . .$200,000Lakebay Marina Renovation and Historic Preservation. . . .$206,000Latah Valley Fire Station. . . .$350,000Latah Water System Rehabilitation Project. . . .$187,000Lincoln Creek Grange #407. . . .$81,000Little Saigon Landmark. . . .$100,000Lopez Food Center. . . .$197,000Lynnwood Convention Center Expansion. . . .$400,000Main Street. . . .$42,000Manson Grange Hall Improvement Project. . . .$193,000Maple Valley Permanent Message Boards. . . .$200,000Mason PUD No. 1 Utility Relocation Projects. . . .$1,800,000Matlock Grange Safety & Structure Improvements. . . .$90,000Medical Equipment Bank - Building. . . .$250,000Mt View Grange. . . .$100,000Municipal Services Campus Design & Infrastructure. . . .$103,000Murakami Building. . . .$100,000Nespelem Community Park. . . .$52,000New Facility for South Kitsap Helpline. . . .$250,000Next Chapter Maroon Village. . . .$315,000NEYFS Creativity Project. . . .$93,000North Mason Food Bank Relocation. . . .$47,000Northside Flood Reduction and Open Spaces. . . .$223,000Northaven Green Space Restoration. . . .$1,300,000NWYS PAD Shelter Whatcom County. . . .$250,000Oak Harbor Recreation Center Feasibility Study. . . .$200,000Ohop Grange Insulation & Electrical Upgrades. . . .$36,000Olalla Recovery Centers Facility Improvements. . . .$250,000Old Swim Hole Revitalization Project. . . .$206,000Omak Arena LED Lighting Project. . . .$185,000Open Doors for Multicultural Families. . . .$5,000,000Operation GROW - A Regional Processing Facility for WA. . . .$42,000Oroville Grange Drainage Remediation. . . .$62,000Othello Water Supply. . . .$400,000Parkwood Community Club Repairs. . . .$232,000PAWS Community Support Center. . . .$250,000Pea Patch Community Campus. . . .$360,000People's Community Center. . . .$400,000Perry Tech for Clean Energy Jobs. . . .$5,000,000Pierce Center for Arts & Technology. . . .$129,000Port of Benton Inland. . . .$240,000Port of Quincy Business & Event Center Upgrade. . . .$309,000Port of Skagit Granary Expansion. . . .$125,000Preserve and Maintain RTOP Theatre. . . .$77,000Prosser Clubhouse. . . .$105,000Providence Academy Elevator & Rehabilitation. . . .$103,000Public Dock Emergency Repair. . . .$41,000Puget Sound Estuarium Property. . . .$250,000Rainier Beach Family Empowerment Center. . . .$100,000Redmond Academy Renovations. . . .$87,000Regional Sports Complex-Site Evaluation andPre-Design. . . .$300,000Rehab and Care Center Shower Renovation. . . .$206,000Rejuvenation Community Day Center. . . .$500,000Renovations for Children's Developmental Center. . . .$174,000Republic Library and Community Center. . . .$315,000Resurface and Revitalize Prescott Public Pool. . . .$98,000Riverwalk Sports and Entertainment Facility. . . .$309,000Rose Valley Grange Capital Improvement. . . .$40,000Roza Drought Funding. . . .$200,000Ruston Community Center Repairs & ADA Improvements. . . .$360,000School Playground Renovation. . . .$258,000Seattle Aquarium Ocean Pavilion. . . .$400,000Seattle Black Panther Legacy Project. . . .$200,000Seattle Storm Center - Revised. . . .$500,000Sheffield Trail. . . .$100,000Shelton Multi-Use Trail. . . .$206,000Skagit PUD Olsen Creek Waterline Relocation. . . .$300,000Skamania County Public Safety Radio System. . . .$200,000South Camano Grange #930. . . .$132,000South End Community Center. . . .$200,000South King Cultural Public Market. . . .$77,000South Seattle Community Food Hub. . . .$135,000South Yakima Avenue Senior Housing. . . .$400,000Southwest Washington Fair Equestrian Facility. . . .$206,000Spokane CD Gray and Oregon Road Forest Fire Recovery. . . .$975,000Spokane Scale House Market & Kitchen. . . .$300,000Spokane Valley Cross Country Course. . . .$150,000Stanwood Police Station. . . .$100,000Summit Park Sewer Upgrade Project. . . .$103,000Sunnyside Beach Park Beach Nourishment Project. . . .$103,000Sunnyside Safe Haven Baby Box. . . .$16,000SVE Expansion Equipment & Furnishing. . . .$108,000SW Youth & Family Services HVAC Replacement. . . .$165,000Tekoa Parks and Recreation. . . .$200,000Terrain Cultural Hub. . . .$207,000Town of Index Safety and ADA Access Improvements. . . .$25,000Transload Area Sewer. . . .$515,000Tristate Health Hospital. . . .$1,000,000Tukwila Health & Wellness Center. . . .$25,000Uplift Northwest's Beacon of Hope. . . .$300,000Vancouver Family Resource Center Expansion. . . .$200,000Vancouver Waterfront Gateway Event Plaza. . . .$197,000W. Valley Centennial Middle School Field Fences &Dugout. . . .$32,000WA Soldier's Home Cemetery Pavement & ParkingExtension. . . .$72,000Wahkiakum PUD - Puget Island Water Source Project. . . .$309,000Waitsburg Childcare Center. . . .$100,000Wallace Heights Septic Elimination. . . .$515,000Washington Masonic Services Library & Museum Remodel. . . .$47,000Water Treatment Facility Project. . . .$920,000Water Valve-Pipeline, Intersection Replacement. . . .$103,000Water Way 18 Dock Replacement. . . .$250,000West Echo Lake Public Engagement and Design Program. . . .$129,000Western Ranchettes Water Distribution System. . . .$150,000Wilkeson Town Hall Renovation. . . .$134,000Yakima Trolley Carbarn Fire Suppression System. . . .$197,000Yakima Valley Local Crime Lab Facility. . . .$200,000Yelm Activated Alleyway. . . .$46,000(9) $5,122,000 of the model toxics control stormwater accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Boat Haven Stormwater Improvement. . . .$3,100,000Silver Bay Logging Property Acquisition. . . .$1,250,000City of Puyallup Stormwater. . . .$772,000(10) $4,641,000 of the model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:APCC Asbestos Abatement. . . .$286,000Spokane and Pend Oreille County Gray and OregonRoad Fire Cleanup. . . .$3,500,000PFAS Treatment at City of DuPont Water Wells. . . .$855,000(11) $500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and $100,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Langley Library Historic Preservation project.(12) $40,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Temple Association Energy Efficiency Improvements project.(13) In addition to the requirements in subsection (5) of this section, the contract for the Goodwill Land Acquisition for Redevelopment (Seattle) project must require that the redevelopment of the property into affordable housing under subsection (8) of this section be completed within 10 years of the contract execution.(14) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to the Lakebay Marina Renovation and Historic Preservation project in this section.Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$4,641,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$5,122,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$58,662,000Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$140,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$68,565,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$237,448,000TOTAL. . . .$306,013,000Sec. 7009. 2025 c 414 s 1027 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2026 Local and Community Projects (40000709)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided for under subsection (12) of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(2) Before receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.(8) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:196th/Scriber Creek Control Structure Removal. . . .$500,00023rd & Cherry Renovation/Construction. . . .$1,236,0004th St NW Stormwater Improvement Project. . . .$773,000Accessibility Renovations for Community Homes. . . .$155,000Adams County Fire Protection District 6 Fire Hall. . . .$418,000Airlift Northwest Hangar. . . .$3,250,000Airway Heights Public Safety Campus. . . .$907,000Alatheia Building Project. . . .$263,000Alliance Place. . . .$500,000Allyn Community Hub. . . .$72,000Anacortes Early Learning Center - Whitney Campus. . . .$42,000Anderson Is. Emergency Communications System. . . .$8,000Aquatic Center at MLK Jr. Park. . . .$257,000Aquatic Resource Mitigation Program. . . .$309,000Arlington Boys & Girls Club Fire Safety. . . .$200,000ASHHO Cultural Community Center. . . .$927,000Asia Pacific Cultural Center. . . .$1,030,000Astria Toppenish Hospital Roof Replacement. . . .$567,000Auburn Ave Theater Rebuild. . . .$500,000Ballard Boys & Girls Club Security Fence & Lights- Revised. . . .$80,000Battle Ground Downtown Revitalization Design. . . .$515,000Baw Faw Grange. . . .$12,000Bayview Trail Lake Stevens. . . .$500,000Bayview Trail Marysville. . . .$500,000Beerbower Park. . . .$253,000Bellevue Downtown Integration. . . .$250,000Bellevue Family YMCA and Housing. . . .$250,000Bellingham Central Library Interior Renovation. . . .$1,030,000Benston Hall Kitchen and Septic Renovation. . . .$175,000Benton REA's Wildfire Resilience Project. . . .$1,000,000BGC Roof & HVAC Project. . . .$412,000Boat Yard Expansion Project. . . .$500,000Boys & Girls Clubs of Benton and Franklin CountiesProsser. . . .$515,000Bremerton Masonic Temple Kitchen Renovation. . . .$247,000Brier Park Bathroom Rebuild. . . .$489,000Camano Island Legion Veterans Comprehensive HealthInitiative. . . .$300,000Camas Washougal Firefighters Safety Equipment. . . .$155,000Camp Thunderbird (Summit Lake Outdoor School) WaterSystem. . . .$525,000Capitol Theatre Capital Improvements. . . .$100,000Cashmere Branch Library ADA (Cashmere). . . .$33,000Castle Rock Impound/Storage Facility. . . .$370,000CAYA Center Predevelopment. . . .$225,000Center Senior Living Assisted Living Housing. . . .$395,000Central Washington Fair Barns. . . .$400,000Cham Community Center. . . .$1,000,000Chehalis Recreation Park. . . .$50,000Chelan Co. Emergency Management Facility. . . .$500,000Chelan Eagles. . . .$15,000Chief Leschi Park. . . .$58,000City of Elma HVAC Replacement Project. . . .$206,000City of Lakewood - Edgewater Park ImprovementProject. . . .$360,000City of Langley City Hall Solar Plus Storage. . . .$257,000((City of)) Sunnyside ((Downtown Gazebo Rebuild))Property Acquisition. . . .$257,000City of Sunnyside: Community Pool. . . .$515,000City of Sunnyside: Tina Knoth Park Soccer FieldDevelopment. . . .$515,000City of Tukwila HVAC Replacement. . . .$773,000Civic Center Renovation. . . .$1,000,000Clallam EOC. . . .$2,000,000Clark County Public Safety. . . .$1,500,000Cle Elum Boys & Girls Club Clubhouse. . . .$103,000Clymer Museum Elevator And ADA Upgrades. . . .$230,000Collins Grange #893. . . .$158,000Columbia Park East Boat Launch Replacement. . . .$750,000Community Center Entryway Improvements. . . .$103,000Community Center HVAC. . . .$206,000((Community Library Building Project. . . .$400,000))Community Roots Mill Plain Housing Project. . . .$1,000,000Community Wildlife Readiness-Simcoe Mountains. . . .$26,000Completion of New Fire Station - Franklin CountyFire. . . .$1,000,000Coulee City Rodeo Grounds Improvements. . . .$464,000Coupeville BGC Gymnasium Project. . . .$515,000Creating A More Accessible State Arboretum. . . .$900,000Crescent Grange. . . .$300,000Critical Equipment, Research, and Rearing Capacity. . . .$1,718,000Culinary Upgrade To Battle Ground Public Schools. . . .$278,000Darrington Wood Innovation and Education Center. . . .$145,000Daybreak Star Infrastructure Project. . . .$600,000DeMolay Sandspit Park Improvements. . . .$515,000Des Moines Marina Steps. . . .$1,030,000Distribution System Enhancements. . . .$625,000Dry Creek Grange. . . .$28,000Dundee Hill Community Homes. . . .$376,000East Adams Rural Healthcare: Central MonitoringSystem. . . .$232,000East Wenatchee City Hall. . . .$150,000Eastside Terrace Club Kitchen Renovation. . . .$74,000Eatonville Community Stadium & Lighting. . . .$800,000ED Safer Rooms. . . .$1,030,000Edgewood Grange. . . .$217,000Edmonds Food Bank. . . .$103,000Edwin Pratt Memorial Park. . . .$155,000El Centro de la Raza Mercado Project. . . .$1,030,000Elks Park Little League Fields Renovations. . . .$103,000Emergency Fueling Station. . . .$500,000Emergency Power Generators Yakima County FireDistrict 12. . . .$295,000Energy-Efficient Lighting Upgrade. . . .$26,000Enumclaw LED Lighting. . . .$1,029,000Everett Boys & Girls Club Kitchen Renovation Project. . . .$309,000Excelsior Wellness Site Infrastructure Project. . . .$915,000Expanded Facility for South Kitsap Helpline. . . .$263,000FareStart Barista & Customer Service Job TrainingClass. . . .$309,000FEMA Omak Floodplain Impact Pre-design. . . .$515,000Ferndale Library and Campus EV and Solar Initiative. . . .$515,000Fishing Pier at Spanaway Lake. . . .$773,000Five Mile Prairie Grange. . . .$23,000Float Our Future. . . .$103,000Food Distribution and Storage Improvements. . . .$341,000Foss Waterway Commercial Pump Out. . . .$103,000Freedom Center. . . .$338,000Friends of Lopez Island Pool. . . .$523,000Frontier Park - Goat Barns. . . .$103,000Fruitland Grange #999. . . .$67,000Garrison Springs Creek Restoration Project. . . .$515,000Gig Harbor Sports Fields. . . .$1,030,000God's Pantry Building. . . .$45,000Grand Cinema. . . .$618,000Grandview Police Center. . . .$550,000Grandview Splash Pad. . . .$108,000Grant County Animal Outreach Shelter Building. . . .$256,000Grid-Scale Coordination for WA. . . .$700,000Habitat for Humanity Site Acquisition. . . .$300,000Handicap Ramp and ADA Bathroom Additions. . . .$182,000Haynie Grange Facilities Modernization Project. . . .$170,000Healing Headquarters: A Campaign for RebuildingHope. . . .$250,000Heating Vitalization and Collying System. . . .$177,000Heritage Heights Remodel Phase 4 Generator. . . .$258,000Historic Museum Restoration & Preservation Project. . . .$150,000Historic Slavonian Hall. . . .$515,000Historic Theatre Restoration. . . .$377,000Hopkins Ditch ESA ITP Application Grant. . . .$52,000Hotel Lincoln Historic Restoration Project. . . .$250,000Improvements to Low-Income Child Care Center. . . .$225,000Inland Grange. . . .$98,000Integrated Care Clinic. . . .$1,030,000Interurban Trail Connection - Milton to Edgewood. . . .$779,000Issaquah Bomb Cyclone Recovery. . . .$1,400,000Issaquah's Creeks to Peaks. . . .$103,000Jenkins Creek Recreational Trail. . . .$500,000Julia Butler Hansen House. . . .$115,000Kettle River Grange Windows & Doors. . . .$67,000King Co. Water Dist. 54 Treatment Modernization. . . .$1,030,000Kitsap Lake Park Accessibility Improvements. . . .$321,000Klickitat Natural Resource Conservation Center. . . .$103,000KVH Orthopedics and Surgical ServicesRemodel/Renovation. . . .$618,000La Center Downtown 2.0. . . .$400,000Lake Boren Park. . . .$335,000Lake Chelan Community Center Gymnasium Project. . . .$475,000Lake Chelan Health Emergency Medical ServicesBuilding. . . .$1,097,000Lake City Community Mural Project. . . .$23,000Lake Forest Park, Lakefront Park. . . .$1,030,000Lake Gardner Regional Park Dock. . . .$78,000Lake Stevens Library. . . .$350,000Latino Civic Alliance Workforce Training & Small BusinessHub. . . .$515,000LeMay Grit City Robotics Center. . . .$500,000Lions Park Community Center. . . .$1,000,000Longview Library Elevator Repairs. . . .$300,000Lopez Island Food Center. . . .$361,000Lummi Island Grange. . . .$77,000Lynnwood Public Facilities District ConventionCenter. . . .$1,000,000Maker & Innovation Lab. . . .$1,400,000Mariner Community Campus. . . .$810,000Marymoor Cricket Facility. . . .$1,200,000Matlock Grange Hall Structural And SafetyImprovements. . . .$252,000McKinney Center HVAC System. . . .$1,000,000MDC Capital Improvement. . . .$1,236,000Meeker Street Project. . . .$901,000Meridian Grange. . . .$155,000Meridian Habitat Park Community Nature Center. . . .$919,000Mid-Columbia Children's Museum. . . .$1,000,000Mill Creek Boys & Girls Club. . . .$1,030,000Mission Avenue Frontage Improvements. . . .$1,030,000MLK Jr. Community Center Renovation & Expansion. . . .$927,000Molson Grange #1069. . . .$117,000Monroe Rotary Field Turf Replacement. . . .$360,000Mossyrock Grange. . . .$80,000Mother Earth Farms. . . .$52,000Mountlake Terrace Library Resiliency Upgrades. . . .$500,000Mt Spokane - ADA Improvements & Asbestos Abatement. . . .$700,000Mt. View Pressure Zone Reservoir - Revised. . . .$515,000Multi-Purpose Building Pole Structure. . . .$206,000MultiCare Spokane Internal Medicine ResidencyProgram. . . .$500,000Multicultural Resilience Center. . . .$1,545,000Municipal Services Facility Backup Power Generator. . . .$309,000Muslim Association of Puget Sound. . . .$2,500,000NAAM Expansion. . . .$206,000New Community Recreation Center, Sauk-Suiattle Indian. . . .$515,000Newman Lake Revitalization. . . .$120,000NF Skykomish River Valley: Emergency Response. . . .$1,000,000Nisqually Vocational Education & EOC Training. . . .$4,050,000Nooksack Water Adjudication Facility Needs. . . .$1,250,000Nordic Cottages. . . .$412,000North Bellingham Grange #201. . . .$51,000North Mason Electrical Capacity & Reliability. . . .$1,000,000North Sound Public Safety Training Facility. . . .$250,000Northeast PDA Housing & Childcare. . . .$350,000Northern State Hospital Historic Cemetery Improve. . . .$175,000Northwest Kidney Centers Burien Pharmacy Relocation. . . .$79,000Northwest Maritime ((Vessel Design and Feasibility))Grant - Revised. . . .$463,000Ocean Shores Food Bank Relocation Project. . . .$283,000Old Swim Hole ADA Ramp. . . .$83,000Othello Rodeo Bleachers. . . .$258,000Outdoors for All Foundation. . . .$1,030,000Pacific Bonsai Museum Renovations. . . .$766,000Parkland Community Center Acquisition. . . .$1,000,000Partners INW Resource Center. . . .$515,000Pea Patch Community Campus. . . .$3,000,000Peck Community Sports Park Expansion. . . .$1,030,000Peninsula Community Health - Bainbridge Island. . . .$556,000Peninsula Health - Community Kitchen. . . .$625,000Perry Tech for Clean Energy Jobs. . . .$5,050,000Peter Kirk Pool. . . .$515,000Pierce Center for Arts & Technology. . . .$1,030,000Pierce County Health Care Workforce Investment. . . .$2,050,000Pioneer Memorial Park Path Accessible to All. . . .$142,000Pioneer Street Slope Stabilization and SlideAlleviation. . . .$1,545,000Plante's Ferry Sports Complex. . . .$1,000,000Point Hudson Energy Efficiency Improvement Project. . . .$309,000Port Angeles Marine Discovery Center. . . .$1,030,000Port Angeles Waterfront Center. . . .$2,000,000Port of Edmonds Mid-Marina Breakwater Repair. . . .$412,000Port of Hoodsport's Public Dock. . . .$71,000Port of Skagit Agricultural Innovation Center. . . .$515,000Port of Vancouver. . . .$155,000Port Orchard Downtown Re-Construction. . . .$1,000,000Portland Avenue Park Sprayground. . . .$773,000Preserving Washington's Oldest Locomotive. . . .$103,000Puyallup Avenue Flood Reduction Project. . . .$1,030,000Rainier Beach Action Coalition FIC P1. . . .$326,000Rainier Valley Food Bank. . . .$1,030,000Rasor Road Water Main. . . .$119,000Recreation Accessibility Improvements Kamiakin MS. . . .$515,000Redmond Asbestos Cement Pipe Replacement. . . .$1,000,000Redmond Intercultural City Services Center. . . .$636,000Regional Animal Shelter and Control Facility. . . .$1,000,000Regional Meat Processing Infrastructure. . . .$250,000Remy Park. . . .$1,500,000Renton Legacy Square Project. . . .$1,545,000Rimrock Grange. . . .$121,000Rise Up Academy. . . .$1,000,000Road 80 Neighborhood Park. . . .$515,000Romance Hill Booster. . . .$170,000Roof Repair & Replacement Project. . . .$187,000Roy City Park. . . .$155,000Rural Access to Care & Social Connections. . . .$3,138,000S. LK. Stevens Grange. . . .$160,000Sail Sand Point. . . .$100,000SAM Building Automation System Replacement. . . .$280,000Samish Nation - Summit Park Building. . . .$206,000Samish Valley Grange #926. . . .$54,000Sammamish Bomb Cyclone Recovery. . . .$330,000Save the Tokeland Hotel - Critical System Upgrades. . . .$261,000Scargo-Lewiston Permanent Supportive Housing. . . .$1,030,000Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex of Woodland. . . .$45,000Seaport Landing Building Demolition. . . .$150,000Seattle International Public Market. . . .$1,325,000Security and Visibility for EYFO. . . .$71,000Security Gate & Fence at Smilow Rainier Vista Boys& Girl. . . .$66,000Sheffield Trail. . . .$1,030,000Shore Aquatic Center Child Care Expansion Project. . . .$773,000Short-Term Lodging Facility - Cancer Patients. . . .$1,545,000Sinto Senior Activity Ctr Cafe Floor. . . .$10,000Sinto Senior Activity Ctr LED Lighting. . . .$4,000Skagit County RFA Apparatus Communications. . . .$505,000Skagit Valley Grange #620. . . .$48,000Skamania County Courthouse Rehabilitation. . . .$515,000Ski Park Bridge. . . .$1,030,000Skokomish Grange #379 - Stem Wall Repair. . . .$103,000Skyline Health Critical Hospital Infrastructure. . . .$1,000,000Snohomish CD's Natural Resource Center. . . .$500,000Snohomish Public Safety & City Services Campus. . . .$1,000,000South Bay Grange. . . .$91,000South Beach Regional Fire Authority Generator. . . .$144,000South Tacoma Fire Station. . . .$2,050,000Southwest Washington Dance Center FacilityImprovements. . . .$152,000Southwest Washington Fairgrounds 4-HBarn - Revised. . . .$767,000Spokane PD/CJTC BLEA Training Center. . . .$750,000Spokane Valley Heritage Museum. . . .$206,000Spokane Valley Sport Courts. . . .$415,000Spring Hill Grange. . . .$155,000Springdale Frontier Days Rodeo Grounds. . . .$67,000Stanwood Police Station. . . .$100,000Starfire Commons. . . .$2,550,000Steilacoom Tribal Cultural Center and Museum. . . .$309,000Steilacoom-Pierce County NetZero Resiliency Center. . . .$1,133,000Sultan BGC Gymnasium Restroom Project. . . .$155,000Sultan Osprey Park Sports Field Expansion. . . .$798,000Suyematsu Farm Preservation. . . .$124,000Tacoma Historical Society. . . .$2,000,000Tacoma Urban Performing Arts Center. . . .$1,622,000Tahoma SD Playground Accessibility. . . .$378,000Tasveer Film Arts Center. . . .$1,030,000Terminal 4 Expansion & Redevelopment Project. . . .$3,500,000The Nyholm Windmill Relocation and Restoration. . . .$118,000The Pickford Theater on Grand. . . .$237,000The Willows. . . .$1,000,000Thurston County Medical Equipment Bank. . . .$103,000Toppenish Police Station & City Services. . . .$515,000Trent Elementary Community Upgrades. . . .$225,000Tukwila Health & Wellness Center Project. . . .$1,030,000TYT Feasibility Study and Site Preparation. . . .$62,000Uplift Northwest Training Center & HQ Remodel. . . .$1,030,000Upper Kittitas County Community Recreation Center. . . .$155,000Upper Yakima River Spring Chinook Supplementation. . . .$305,000Vashon Community Pool. . . .$70,000Veterans Memorial Park - Revised. . . .$618,000Voice of Vashon Digital Renovation Project. . . .$167,000Wagner Performing Arts Center Restrooms. . . .$443,000Wahkiakum Community Learning Center. . . .$248,000Walla Walla County Fairgrounds Grandstand Renovation. . . .$25,000Walla Walla Interpretive Signage. . . .$27,000Waller Grange. . . .$84,000Wallingford Boys and Girls Club. . . .$798,000Wapato Lions Park Youth Soccer Field Improvements. . . .$80,000Washington Poison Center. . . .$79,000Washington State Horse Park Facilities Expansion. . . .$375,000((Washougal Community Library Building Project. . . .$1,818,000))Wastewater Treatment Facility. . . .$1,000,000Water Reservoir Mixer. . . .$232,000Water Resilience and Efficiency Project. . . .$3,000,000Water System Improvements. . . .$150,000Waterfront Pedestrian Safety & Accessibility. . . .$1,500,000Wellness House Yakima. . . .$25,000West Mason Fire Headquarters Modernization. . . .$515,000West Wall of Key Peninsula Civic Center. . . .$103,000Western Skamania County Public Safety Complex. . . .$940,000Whitehawk Gratzer Parks Master Plan. . . .$77,000Wilkeson Infrastructure Improvement Projects. . . .$452,000Willapa Harbor Healthcare Facility Replacement. . . .$285,000Winter Hospitality Overflow Accessibility. . . .$515,000Woodcrest Neighborhood Utility Improvement Project. . . .$1,500,000Yakima Valley Public Market. . . .$743,000YWCA Clark County Housing & Empowerment Campus. . . .$400,000(9) $2,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Port of Chehalis Hydrogen Fueling Station and Production Facility project.(10) $440,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the UW Air Quality Monitoring project.(11) $3,000,000 of the model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Budd Inlet Sediment Clean Up project.(12) $1,000,000 of the model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Lakebay Marina Creosote Piling Removal project. The requirements of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to the project in this subsection.(13) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,440,000Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$4,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($194,932,000))Â Â Â Â Â $192,714,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($201,372,000))Â Â Â Â Â $199,154,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($201,372,000))Â Â Â Â Â $199,154,000Sec. 7010. 2022 c 296 s 1032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEGrants for Affordable Housing Development Connections (91001685)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for grants to local governments and public utility districts for system development charges and utility improvements for new affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income households. Where applicable, the extension must be consistent with the approved comprehensive plans under the growth management act and must be within the established boundaries of the urban growth area.(2) $7,600,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation, $4,500,000 of the capital community assistance accountâstate appropriation, and $16,300,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation in this section are provided solely for grants to local governments or public utilities located within a jurisdiction that imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.530(1)(a)(ii), 82.14.530(1)(b)(i)(B), 82.14.540, or 84.52.105.(3) $10,700,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation and $4,500,000 of the capital community assistance accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for grants to local governments or public utilities located within:(a) A city or county with a population of 150,000 or less; and(b) A jurisdiction that imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.530(1)(a)(ii) or 82.14.530(1)(b)(i)(B).(4) The department shall coordinate with the office of financial management and the governor's office to develop a process for project submittal, project selection criteria, review, and monitoring, and tracking the housing development projects that receive affordable housing development connections grants under this section. To be eligible for funding under this section, an applicant must demonstrate, at minimum:(a) That affordable housing development will begin construction within 24 months of the grant award; and(b) A strong probability of serving the original target group or income level for a period of at least 25 years.(5) $1,700,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Port Townsend Utility Connection Project. The funding provided in this subsection is not subject to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.(6) To ensure compliance with conditions of the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund, all expenditures from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery accountâfederal appropriation in this section must be obligated by December 31, 2024.(7) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply.(a) "Affordable housing" and has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.(b) "Low-income household" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.(c) "System development charges" means charges for new drinking water, wastewater, or stormwater connections when a local government or public utility has waived standard fees normally applied to developers for connection charges on affordable housing projects.(d) "Utility improvements" means drinking water, wastewater, or stormwater utility improvements.Appropriation:Coronavirus State Fiscal RecoveryAccountâFederal. . . .$27,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$18,300,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$45,300,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$45,300,000Sec. 7011. 2022 c 296 s 1043 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Dental Capacity Grants (91001660)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Funding provided in this section must be used for the construction and equipment directly associated with dental facilities. The funding provided in this section is for projects that are maintained for at least a 10-year period and provide capacity to address unmet patient need and increase efficiency in dental access.(2) The amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Dental Expansion for Maple Street Clinic (Spokane). . . .$309,000HealthPoint (Auburn). . . .$721,000HealthPoint (Renton). . . .$309,000ICHS Holly Park - Revised (Seattle). . . .$106,000ICHS International District (Seattle). . . .$106,000International Community Health Services (Bellevue). . . .$106,000International Community Health Services (Shoreline). . . .$106,000NEW Health CHC Dental Expansion (Newport). . . .$1,900,000Peninsula Community Health Services (Gig Harbor). . . .$490,000Sea Mar Community Health Center (Kent). . . .$1,042,000Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic (Kennewick). . . .$1,030,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,225,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,225,000Sec. 7012. 2023 c 474 s 3054 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION2023-25 State Parks Capital Projects Pool (92001128)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The following projects are the only projects eligible for funding provided in this section.(a) $23,548,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following pool of eligible projects owned by the state parks and recreation commission.Cape Disappointment: Campground Access Road CulvertsCape Disappointment - Welcome Center and Entrance ImprovementsFort Worden PDA Fire Alarm System Modifications and UpgradesLake Sylvia Culvert ReplacementLarrabee Water System ReplacementMillersylvania Replace Original 1940's Water SystemNW Region Wide Culvert ReplacementsPalouse to Cascade Trail - Kittitas Depot Historic PreservationSun Lakes Replace Primary Lift StationWallace Falls Water System Replacement(b) $1,375,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the statewide fish barrier removal project.(2) ((The commission shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature the list of projects with funding levels, allotments, and schedules for the projects in this section by January 1, 2024))Upon the completion and closeout of all of the projects identified in subsection (1) of this section, any remaining unobligated funding from the state building construction accountâstate reappropriation may be used for statewideâforest health enhancementâwildfire risk reduction, the Fort Flagler welcome center, and marine facilities rehabilitation projects.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$1,375,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$23,548,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$24,923,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$99,692,000TOTAL. . . .$124,615,000Sec. 7013. 2025 c 414 s 1042 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEMedically Tailored Meals of Washington Coalition - Revised (92002197)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,625,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,625,000SUBPART B: ACCOUNT CHANGESSec. 7014. 2025 c 414 s 3026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Chehalis Basin Strategy (40000724)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($67,779,000))$4,089,000 of the state building construction accountâstate and (($2,000,000))$65,690,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for Chehalis Basin board-approved projects:(a) To protect and restore aquatic species habitat, including: Construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition planning and project development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; postconstruction and acquisition monitoring and adaptive management; and engagement of state agencies, tribes, conservation partners, landowners, and other parties;(b) To reduce flood damage, including: Construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition project planning and development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; completion of environmental review and endangered species act consultation on the proposed flood protection facility; refinement and evaluation of the local action non-dam alternative; and engagement of state agencies, tribes, project sponsors, landowners, and other parties; and(c) That advance both the habitat restoration and the flood damage reduction goals of the Chehalis Basin strategy using a multibenefit approach, including: Community outreach and education; construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition planning and project development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; postconstruction and acquisition monitoring and adaptive management; and engagement of federal, state, and local agencies, tribes, conservation partners, landowners, and other parties.(2) $5,250,000 of the ((state building construction accountâstate))natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the staffing and operations of the office of Chehalis Basin and Chehalis Basin board to oversee the development, implementation, and amendment of the Chehalis Basin strategy, and this is the maximum amount the board may expend for this purpose. Oversight operations include, but are not limited to: Providing financial accountability, project management, technical assistance of grants and contracts associated with the subprojects funded through this section, and board meeting administration and facilitation.(3) Specific projects must be approved by at least six of the seven voting members of the Chehalis Basin board. The Chehalis Basin board has the discretion to allocate the funding between subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section as needed to meet the objectives of this appropriation and if approved by at least six of the seven voting members of the board. However, $5,250,000 is the maximum amount the department may expend for the purposes of subsection (2) of this section.(4) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($2,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $70,940,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($73,029,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,089,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$75,029,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$300,116,000TOTAL. . . .$375,145,000Sec. 7015. 2025 c 414 s 3063 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000564)The ((appropriations))appropriation in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The ((appropriations))appropriation in this section ((are))is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-6-2025, developed April 26, 2025.(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed three percent of the total grant award.(3) The department of fish and wildlife may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration. The portion of the funds retained for technical assistance may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.(4) ((The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act))For any grant of funds awarded to a federally recognized tribe using funds from the natural climate solutions account, the recreation and conservation office must offer the tribe the option to receive such funds on a reimbursement basis or through incremental advance payments.Appropriation:((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$27,002,000))Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($5,143,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,545,000((State Taxable Building ConstructionAccountâState. . . .$400,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$32,545,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$130,180,000TOTAL. . . .$162,725,000Sec. 7016. 2025 c 414 s 3064 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000566)(1) The ((appropriations))appropriation in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The ((appropriations))appropriation in this section ((are))is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. ((RCO-7-2025))RCO-1-2026, developed ((April 26, 2025))February 23, 2026.(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed three percent of the total grant award.(3) The department of fish and wildlife may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration. The portion of the funds retained for technical assistance may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.(4) ((The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act))For any grant of funds awarded to a federally recognized tribe using funds from the natural climate solutions account, the recreation and conservation office must offer the tribe the option to receive such funds on a reimbursement basis or through incremental advance payments.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($8,997,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,665,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,668,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,665,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$62,660,000TOTAL. . . .$78,325,000Sec. 7017. 2025 c 414 s 3059 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000554)The ((appropriations))appropriation in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The ((appropriations))appropriation in this section ((are))is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-2-2025, developed April 26, 2025.(2) The recreation and conservation office may retain a portion of the funds appropriated to projects for the administration of grants. The portion of funds retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.(3) The Puget Sound partnership may retain up to $250,000 of the funds appropriated in this section for program administration.(4) ((The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act))For any grant of funds awarded to a federally recognized tribe using funds from the natural climate solutions account, the recreation and conservation office must offer the tribe the option to receive such funds on a reimbursement basis or through incremental advance payments.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($10,100,000))Â Â Â Â Â $60,538,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$50,438,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$60,538,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$242,152,000TOTAL. . . .$302,690,000Sec. 7018. 2025 c 414 s 3058 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Salmon Recovery Funding Board Riparian Grant Programs (40000552)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (((1))) The recreation and conservation office may retain a portion of the funds appropriated to projects for the administration of grants. The portion of funds retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.(((2) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.))Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$20,000,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$20,000,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000TOTAL. . . .$100,000,000Sec. 7019. 2025 c 414 s 3065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Washington Coastal Restoration and Resiliency Initiative (40000568)The ((appropriations))appropriation in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The ((appropriations))appropriation in this section ((are))is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-8-2025, developed April 26, 2025.(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.(3) ((The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act))For any grant of funds awarded to a federally recognized tribe using funds from the natural climate solutions account, the recreation and conservation office must offer the tribe the option to receive such funds on a reimbursement basis or through incremental advance payments.Appropriation:((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,800,000))Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($3,836,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,636,000((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$9,636,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$38,544,000TOTAL. . . .$48,180,000Sec. 7020. 2025 c 414 s 3056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Washington Wildlife Recreation Program (40000548)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-1-2025, developed April 26, 2025.(2) The Farm and Forest Account and the Habitat Conservation Account appropriations in this section are subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Farm and Forest AccountâState. . . .(($12,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $377,000Habitat Conservation AccountâState. . . .(($54,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,000,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$60,623,000Outdoor Recreation AccountâState. . . .$54,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$120,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$480,000,000TOTAL. . . .$600,000,000Sec. 7021. 2025 c 414 s 5022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONInfrastructure Renewal 25-27 (40000159)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$39,350,000((University of Washington BuildingAccountâState. . . .$39,350,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$39,350,000Sec. 7022. 2025 c 414 s 5024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Bothell - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 25-27 (40000161)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,530,000((University of Washington BuildingAccountâState. . . .$4,530,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$18,120,000TOTAL. . . .$22,650,000Sec. 7023. 2025 c 414 s 5020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Major Infrastructure (30000808)Reappropriation:University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$6,577,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,300,000((University of Washington BuildingAccountâState. . . .$10,300,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,223,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$42,300,000TOTAL. . . .$109,400,000Sec. 7024. 2025 c 414 s 5025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Seattle - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 25-27 (40000163)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$22,080,000((University of Washington BuildingAccountâState. . . .$22,080,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$88,320,000TOTAL. . . .$110,400,000Sec. 7025. 2025 c 414 s 5026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Tacoma - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 25-27 (40000164)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,415,000((University of Washington BuildingAccountâState. . . .$5,415,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,660,000TOTAL. . . .$27,075,000Sec. 7026. 2025 c 414 s 5023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Tacoma - Campus Power Repairs (Phase 3) (40000160)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,900,000((University of Washington BuildingAccountâState. . . .$3,900,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,900,000Sec. 7027. 2025 c 414 s 5035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Program (91000046)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$45,000,000((Washington State University BuildingAccountâState. . . .$45,000,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$180,000,000TOTAL. . . .$225,000,000Sec. 7028. 2025 c 414 s 5040 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Program (91000031)Appropriation:((Eastern Washington University CapitalProjects AccountâState. . . .$9,800,000))State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($6,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,800,000((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,800,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$63,200,000TOTAL. . . .$79,000,000Sec. 7029. 2025 c 414 s 5047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Program (91000028)Appropriation:((Central Washington University CapitalProjects AccountâState. . . .$8,000,000))State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$32,000,000TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000Sec. 7030. 2025 c 414 s 5045 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYInstitutional Equipment Upgrades (40000166)Appropriation:((Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$1,000,000))State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000Sec. 7031. 2025 c 414 s 5050 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Program (91000042)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($6,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,144,000((The Evergreen State College CapitalProjects AccountâState. . . .$9,144,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,144,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$60,576,000TOTAL. . . .$75,720,000Sec. 7032. 2025 c 414 s 5054 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYAcademic Facilities Renewal - Phase I - V (40000017)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,524,000((Western Washington University CapitalProjects AccountâState. . . .$5,524,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$22,096,000TOTAL. . . .$27,620,000Sec. 7033. 2025 c 414 s 5055 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMinor Works Preservation and Program (91000014)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($1,340,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,000,000((Western Washington University CapitalProjects AccountâState. . . .$4,660,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$6,000,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,000,000TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000Sec. 7034. 2025 c 414 s 5068 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works Preservation and Program (92001125)Appropriation:((Community and Technical College CapitalProjects AccountâState. . . .$71,168,000))Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($96,806,000))Â Â Â Â Â $167,974,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$169,974,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$679,896,000TOTAL. . . .$849,870,000(End of part)PART 8MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec. 8001. 2025 c 414 s 8001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are (($73,258,483))$46,425,516 for the 2025-2027 biennium, (($410,061,655))$390,379,123 for the 2027-2029 biennium, and (($631,176,449))$584,977,090 for the 2029-2031 biennium.Sec. 8002. 2025 c 414 s 8002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: (1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.(3) Western Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a parking lot replacement. (4) Community and technical colleges: (a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin College for up to $18,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct student housing. (b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds College for up to $9,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire student housing. (c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clover Park Technical College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire and renovate an eastside training facility.(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Renton Technical College for up to $8,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to continue renovations in Building J.(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an athletic field and related support amenities.(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to make necessary targeted improvements to field lighting, grandstands, and support facilities at the David Story field.(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the east wing of the main building.Sec. 8003. 2025 c 414 s 8003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: (1) To ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent, agencies must complete a predesign for state construction projects with a total anticipated cost in excess of (($10,000,000))$15,000,000. For purposes of this section, "total anticipated cost" means the sum of the anticipated cost of the predesign, design, and construction phases of the project.(2) Appropriations for design may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign.(3) The predesign must explore at least three project alternatives. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. The chosen alternative should be the most reasonable and cost-effective solution. The predesign document must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis, and an analysis of the life-cycle costs of the alternatives explored, in accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management.(4) For projects exceeding the (($10,000,000))$15,000,000 predesign threshold established in this section, the office of financial management may make an exception to some or all of the predesign requirements in this section. The office of financial management shall report any exception to the fiscal committees of the legislature:(a) A description of the major capital project for which the predesign waiver is made;(b) An explanation of the reason for the waiver; and(c) A rough order of magnitude cost estimate for the project's design and construction.(5) In deliberations related to submitting an exception under this section, the office of financial management shall consider the following factors:(a) Whether there is any determination to be made regarding the site of the project;(b) Whether there is any determination to be made regarding whether the project will involve renovation, new construction, or both;(c) Whether, within six years of submitting the request for funding, the agency has completed, or initiated the construction of, a substantially similar project;(d) Whether there is any anticipated change to the project's program or the services to be delivered at the facility;(e) Whether the requesting agency indicates that the project may not require some or all of the predesign requirements in this section due to a lack of complexity; and(f) Whether any other factors related to project complexity or risk, as determined by the office of financial management, could reduce the need for, or scope of, a predesign.(6) If under this section, some or all predesign requirements are waived, the office of financial management may instead propose a professional project cost estimate instead of a request for predesign funding.Sec. 8004. 2025 c 414 s 8004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: (1) The legislature finds that use of life-cycle cost analysis will aid public entities, architects, engineers, and contractors in making design and construction decisions that positively impact both the initial construction cost and the ongoing operating and maintenance cost of a project. To ensure that the total cost of a project is accounted for and the most reasonable and cost efficient design is used, agencies shall develop life-cycle costs for any construction project over $10,000,000. The life-cycle costs must represent the present value sum of capital costs, installation costs, operating costs, and maintenance costs over the life expectancy of the project. The legislature further finds the most effective approach to the life-cycle cost analysis is to integrate it into the early part of the design process.(2) Agencies must develop a minimum of three project alternatives for use in the life-cycle cost analysis. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. Agencies must choose the most reasonable and cost-effective solution, as supported by the life-cycle cost analysis. A brief description of each project alternative and why it was chosen must be included in the life-cycle cost analysis section of the predesign.(3) ((The office of financial management))The department of commerce shall: (a) Make available a life-cycle cost model to be used for analysis; (b) in consultation with the department of enterprise services, provide assistance in using the life-cycle cost model; and (c) update the life-cycle cost model annually including assumptions for inflation rates, discount rates, and energy rates.(4) Agencies shall consider architectural and engineering firms' and general contractors' experience using life-cycle costs, operating costs, and energy efficiency measures when selecting an architectural and engineering firm, or when selecting contractors using alternative contracting methods.Sec. 8005. 2025 c 414 s 8016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: (1) For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, unless otherwise specified for a single purpose in this act or chapter 414, Laws of 2025, agencies are appropriated one lump sum for minor works projects. It is the intent of the legislature that appropriated funds be spent in the biennium for which they are appropriated.(2) Minor works projects may not exceed $4,000,000 for institutions of higher education and $2,000,000 for all other agencies. Administrative fees may not exceed four percent for each project.(3) Except as provided by the legislature, agencies are encouraged to prioritize minor works projects based on:(a) Health and safety of employees or clients served;(b) The amount of use of a given facility or system;(c) The avoidance of future increased costs of repair or maintenance; and(d) The avoidance of increased operating costs.(4) Minor works appropriations may not be used for:(a) Projects that are a phase of a larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time, would exceed the amounts provided in subsection (2) of this section;(b) Studies, planning, or design, except for technical or engineering reviews or designs that lead directly to and support a minor works project;(c) Movable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office of financial management, including rolling stock and computers;(d) Software not dedicated to control of a specialized system;(e) Moving expenses;(f) Land or facility acquisition; or(g) Funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized by the office of financial management for exigent circumstances with notice to the legislative fiscal committees.(5) If a minor works appropriation does not specify it is to be used for preservation or program improvements, up to 25 percent of the appropriation may be used for program improvements. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act qualify as preservation improvements.(6) Agencies must use reappropriations before newly appropriated amounts without regard to lists or projects that were submitted at the time the funds were appropriated.(7) No later than ((December 15th))October 1st of each even numbered year, agencies must submit to the governor, house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee, a list of minor works projects completed or in progress for the current biennium including: Project status, project cost, amount expended, and amount encumbered for projects not yet complete.(8) Requests for minor works appropriations for the next biennium must take into account minor works amounts to be reappropriated and the amount of minor works projects that can reasonably be completed in the next biennium.Sec. 8006. 2025 c 414 s 8019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâTRANSFERS(1) Public Works Assistance Account: For transferto the water pollution control revolving accountâstate,up to $20,500,000 for fiscal year 2026 and up to$20,500,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$41,000,000(2) Public Works Assistance Account: For transferto the drinking water assistance accountâstate, up to(($12,500,000))$15,522,000 for fiscal year 2026 and upto (($12,500,000))$16,398,000 for fiscal year2027. . . .(($25,000,000))$31,920,000(3) Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState:For transfer to the model toxics control capitalaccountâstate, up to $15,000,000 for fiscal year2026 and up to (($15,000,0000))$15,000,000 for fiscalyear 2027. . . .$30,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8007. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:It is the intent of the legislature to support the future construction of a new Washington state library-archives building for the office of the secretary of state on the former site of the general administration building.Sec. 8008. 2025 c 414 s 8023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: Any agency receiving appropriations in this act from climate commitment act accounts created in RCW 70A.65.240 through 70A.65.280 must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures as described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the agency must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8009. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must develop requests for omnibus capital appropriations for the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium for implementation of the school construction assistance program (SCAP) revision planning study proposals specified in this section.(2) The legislature finds that the school construction assistance program must continue to develop in support of school districts' diverse and complex facility needs. Further, the legislature deeply values school districts' engagement in the SCAP revision planning study process and finds that this study represents a critical step in the continuing efforts to improve the program. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to prepare for the school construction assistance program's revision through the initial implementation steps outlined in this section.(3) Except as provided for in subsection (4) of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must perform the planning and analysis, including fiscal estimates, that would be necessary for the office, pending funding and rule making, to implement the following proposals of the SCAP revision planning study, as published on the "Reports to the Legislature" website, dated November 18, 2025:(a) Proposal 1: Improved planning framework with education and outreach support;(b) Proposal 4: Develop an education specification prototype;(c) Proposal 7: Allow phased modernizations;(d) Proposal 8: Streamline and enhance D-Form process; and(e) The grade band configuration and enrollment projection elements of proposal 9 (update SCAP calculation methodologies).(4) In the planning and analysis performed under subsection (3) of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must be faithful to the spirit and framework of the specified SCAP revision planning study's proposals, but may adapt or modify the proposals for the purpose of improving their integration into the school construction assistance program's administrative rules and for the purpose of compliance with the program's governing statutes. Further, to the extent that the office adapts or modifies any of the SCAP revision proposals pursuant to this section, it must describe these changes in the biennial appropriations request submitted under subsection (5) of this section.(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall request any funding required for implementation of the SCAP revision proposals listed in this section, including for any related rule making, as part of the office's request for omnibus capital appropriations in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8010. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:The legislature finds that affordable local government infrastructure is necessary to support affordable communities and new housing construction, amongst other state priorities.Â The lack of comprehensive statewide data on the condition and capacity of water, wastewater, stormwater, roads, bridges, and solid waste systems poses growing risks to public health, environmental quality, housing availability, and economic vitality. Local and tribal governments lack sufficient resources to maintain, repair, and expand aging infrastructure, demonstrating that existing funding and capacity are inadequate to meet current and future infrastructure needs. To that end, the public works board may, within existing resources and utilizing professional services as needed, assess statewide tribal and local government infrastructure needs and evaluate financing options to address funding gaps, in consultation with the interagency, multijurisdictional system improvement team established in RCW 43.155.150. The public works board must include any relevant findings in the biennial reports required in RCW 43.155.150(6).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8011. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:(1) The legislature finds that local and community projects, as well as other direct appropriations, are a vital means of responding directly to pressing and emergent community needs across the state. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide the department of commerce with direction regarding the implementation of these projects, including changes to their scope and location, so as to facilitate their timely completion and in a manner that is consistent with legislative intent.(2) For change requests received by the department between the effective date of this act and the end of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department of commerce may approve change requests for noncompetitively awarded grants that are appropriated on a line item basis and administered by the department in parts I and VI of this act that meet one or more of the following conditions:(a) The change request is for a new entity to administer the appropriated funding, the new entity has the capacity to administer the funding, there is a documented agreement between the entities, and the change request is the only requested change for the project;(b) The change request maintains the same scope, purpose, and recipient of the project, but changes the project's location within the same legislative district;(c) The change request is due to the project receiving funding at a lower level than requested and the entity is requesting to use the appropriated amount for one or more, but fewer than all, of the project's components;(d) The change request is to move funding between the project's components, or to add new components to the project, but the requested change will still meet the overall project goals, as determined by the department of commerce; or(e) The change request is due to the project experiencing higher than estimated bids and the entity is requesting to use the funding for one or more, but fewer than all, of the project's components.(3) For change requests received by the department between the effective date of this act and the end of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department of commerce may not approve change requests for noncompetitively awarded grants that are appropriated on a line item basis and administered by the department in parts I and VI of this act that meet any of the following conditions:(a) The change request would alter the fundamental purpose or object of the project;(b) The change request would move the location of the project from one legislative district to another; or(c) The change request proposes to spend funding on a component that does not meet the overall goal of the project and the component is not a part of the original project.(4) Between July 1, 2026, and June 30, 2027, the department of commerce must send quarterly project change request reports pursuant to this section to the following: (a) The chair and ranking member of the house of representatives capital budget committee; (b) to the capital budget leads of the senate ways and means committee; and (c) to the coordinating capital budget staff of these committees. Each quarterly report pursuant to this section must comply with the following conditions:(a) The report must outline all project changes requested of the department pursuant to this section for the most recent quarter. At a minimum, the quarterly report must include the following information: (a) The project title and grantee; (b) the act and section under which the project was appropriated; (c) the legislative district of the project; (d) a summary of the original project; (e) a summary of the change request; (f) the amount of the original grant; (h) the balance of the grant; (i) the contract status of the grant; (j) the department's decisions regarding approved change requests; and (k) the department's planned decisions regarding the rejection of change requests.(5) Between July 1, 2026, and June 30, 2027, the department of commerce is subject to the following conditions:(a) The department must submit the quarterly change report in this section no later than the first business day of each quarter.(b) The department may not reject project change requests pursuant to this section until 10 business days following the submission of a quarterly report in this section.(c) On December 15, 2026, the department must submit a supplemental report to the following: (a) The chair and ranking member of the house of representatives capital budget committee; (b) to the capital budget leads of the senate ways and means committee; and (c) to the coordinating capital budget staff of these committees. The supplemental report must include all of the information in subsection (4)(a) of this section for each project change request that was not approved by the department between July 1, 2026, and December 14, 2026. The supplemental report must also identify the specific legislative action for each project that would be required by the department in order for the project changes to move forward as requested by the grantees.(6) As of the effective date of this act, noncompetitively awarded grants that are appropriated on a line item basis and administered by the department of commerce in parts I and VI of this act may generally be used to pay for the following construction-related expenses incurred: (a) Design, architectural, and engineering work; (b) building permits and fees; (c) archaeological and historical review; (d) construction labor and materials; (e) demolition and site preparation; (f) capitalized equipment; (g) information technology infrastructure (cables and wiring); (h) construction management from external sources only; (i) initial furnishings; (j) landscaping; and (k) real property when purchased specifically for the project, and associated costs.(7) As of the effective date of this act, noncompetitively awarded grants that are appropriated on a line item basis and administered by the department of commerce in parts I and VI of this act may not be used for the following purposes, unless otherwise approved by the department in the furtherance of legislative intent: (a) Internal administrative activities; (b) mortgage or loan payments; (c) labor or project/construction management from internal sources; (d) fundraising activities; (e) feasibility studies; (f) computers or office equipment; (g) rolling stock (such as vehicles); (h) lease payments for rental of equipment or facilities; (i) any maintenance or operating costs; (j) property leases (including long-term); (k) the moving of equipment, furniture, etc., between facilities; and (l) any in-kind labor.Sec. 8012. 2025 c 414 s 8018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:(((1))) The legislature intends that appropriations for grant programs and community projects be spent in a timely manner in order to accomplish the goal for which they were appropriated. In furtherance of this goal, the legislature does not intend to reappropriate moneys for projects for which a contract has not been executed within four years from the date of appropriation or for which appropriations have not been spent within six years of appropriation for grant programs and community projects appropriated from the state building construction account. Nothing in this section operates as a guarantee of reappropriation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8013. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:The Department of Health shall name the South Laboratory Addition, funded in section 6214, chapter 414, Laws of 2025, the "Mary C. Selecky Environmental Laboratories" in honor of the former Washington State Secretary of Health Mary Selecky and the lasting impact of her work in public health.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8014. 2025 c 414 s 8020 (uncodified) is repealed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8015. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8016. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8017. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.(End of part)--- END ---